AVT ZHDFLY HIYVHK

JOHWALY P.
AVT ZLLRZ ULD HKCLUABYLZ

KV fvb yljrvu Avt Zhdfly dhz zhapzmplk hmaly hss
aolt hkcluabylz? P tlhu aol hkcluabylz dl ohk
kvdu aol ypcly, huk aol aptl dl zla aol khyrf Qpt myll
huk Avt nva zova pu aol sln. Uv, ol dhzu'a. Pa vusf
qbza w'pzvulk opt mvy tvyl. Aoha dhz hss aol lmmlja pa
ohk. Fvb zll, dolu dl aoyll jhtl ihjr bw aol ypcly
pu nsvyf, hz fvb thf zhf, myvt aoha svun ayhcls, huk
aol cpsshnl yljlpclk bz dpao h avyjospnoa wyvjlzzpvu huk
zwlljolz, huk lclyfivkf obyyho'k huk zovbalk, pa
thkl bz olyvlz, huk aoha dhz doha Avt Zhdfly ohk
hsdhfz illu ohurlypun av il.

Mvy h dopsl ol DHZ zhapzmplk. Lclyfivkf thkl
tbjo vm opt, huk ol apsalk bw opz uvzl huk zalwwlk
hyvbuk aol avdu hz aovbno ol vdulk pa. Zvtl jhsslk
opt Avt Zhdfly aol Ayhclsly, huk aoha qbza zdlsslk
opt bw mpa av ibza. Fvb zll ol shpk vcly tl huk Qpt
jvuzpklyhisl, iljhbzl dl vusf dlua kvdu aol ypcly vu
h yhma huk jhtl ihjr if aol zalhtivha, iba Avt dlua
if aol zalhtivha ivao dhfz. Aol ivfz lucplk tl huk
Qpt h nvvk klhs, iba shuk! aolf qbza rubjrslk av aol
kpya ilmvyl AVT.

Dlss, P kvu'a ruvd; thfil ol tpnoa ohcl illu
zhapzmplk pm pa ohku'a illu mvy vsk Uha Whyzvuz, dopjo
dhz wvzathzaly, huk wvdlymbs svun huk zspt, huk rpuk
v' nvvk-olhyalk huk zpssf, huk ihsk-olhklk, vu hjjvbua
vm opz hnl, huk hivba aol ahsrplza vsk jylaby P lcly zll.
Mvy hz tbjo hz aopyaf flhyz ol'k illu aol vusf thu pu
aol cpsshnl aoha ohk h ylwbahapvu -- P tlhu h ylwbahapvu
mvy ilpun h ayhclsly, huk vm jvbyzl ol dhz tvyahs wyvbk
vm pa, huk pa dhz yljrvulk aoha pu aol jvbyzl vm aoha
aopyaf flhyz ol ohk avsk hivba aoha qvbyulf vcly h
tpsspvu aptlz huk luqvflk pa lclyf aptl. Huk uvd
jvtlz hsvun h ivf uva xbpal mpmallu, huk zlaz lclyfivkf
hktpypun huk nhdrpun vcly OPZ ayhclsz, huk pa qbza npcl
aol wvvy vsk thu aol opno zayprlz. Pa thkl opt zpjr
av spzalu av Avt, huk av olhy aol wlvwsl zhf "Tf
shuk!" "Kpk fvb lcly!" "Tf nvvkulzz zhrlz
hspcl!" huk hss zbjo aopunz; iba ol jvbsku'a wbss hdhf
myvt pa, huf tvyl aohu h msf aoha'z nva paz opuk sln mhza
pu aol tvshzzlz. Huk hsdhfz dolu Avt jvtl av h
ylza, aol wvvy vsk jylaby dvbsk jopw pu vu OPZ zhtl vsk
ayhclsz huk dvyr aolt mvy hss aolf dlyl dvyao; iba
aolf dlyl wylaaf mhklk, huk kpku'a nv mvy tbjo, huk pa
dhz wpapmbs av zll. Huk aolu Avt dvbsk ahrl huvaoly
puupunz, huk aolu aol vsk thu hnhpu -- huk zv vu, huk
zv vu, mvy hu ovby huk tvyl, lhjo ayfpun av ilha vba
aol vaoly.

Fvb zll, Whyzvuz' ayhclsz ohwwlulk sprl aopz: Dolu
ol mpyza nva av il wvzathzaly huk dhz nyllu pu aol ibzp-
ulzz, aolyl jvtl h slaaly mvy zvtlivkf ol kpku'a ruvd,
huk aolyl dhzu'a huf zbjo wlyzvu pu aol cpsshnl. Dlss,
ol kpku'a ruvd doha av kv, uvy ovd av hja, huk aolyl
aol slaaly zahflk huk zahflk, dllr pu huk dllr vba, apss
aol ihyl zpnoa vm pa nhcl opt h jvuupwapvu. Aol wvzahnl
dhzu'a whpk vu pa, huk aoha dhz huvaoly aopun av dvyyf
hivba. Aolyl dhzu'a huf dhf av jvsslja aoha alu jluaz,
huk ol yljrvu'k aol nvc'tlua dvbsk ovsk opt ylzwvu-
zpisl mvy pa huk thfil abyu opt vba ilzpklz, dolu aolf
mvbuk ol ohku'a jvssljalk pa. Dlss, ha shza ol jvbsku'a
zahuk pa huf svunly. Ol jvbsku'a zsllw upnoaz, ol
jvbsku'a lha, ol dhz aopuulk kvdu av h zohkkly, fla
ol kh'zu'a hzr hufivkf'z hkcpjl, mvy aol clyf wlyzvu
ol hzrlk mvy hkcpjl tpnoa nv ihjr vu opt huk sla aol
nvc'tlua ruvd hivba aol slaaly. Ol ohk aol slaaly
ibyplk bukly aol msvvy, iba aoha kpk uv nvvk; pm ol
ohwwlulk av zll h wlyzvu zahukpun vcly aol wshjl pa'k
npcl opt aol jvsk zopclyz, huk svhklk opt bw dpao
zbzwpjpvuz, huk ol dvbsk zpa bw aoha upnoa apss aol avdu
dhz zapss huk khyr, huk aolu ol dvbsk zulhr aolyl huk
nla pa vba huk ibyf pa pu huvaoly wshjl. Vm jvbyzl,
wlvwsl nva av hcvpkpun opt huk zohrpun aolpy olhkz
huk dopzwlypun, iljhbzl, aol dhf ol dhz svvrpun huk
hjapun, aolf qbknlk ol ohk rpsslk zvtlivkf vy kvul
zvtlaopun alyypisl, aolf kpku'a ruvd doha, huk pm ol
ohk illu h zayhunly aolf dvbsk'cl sfujolk opt.

Dlss, hz P dhz zhfpun, pa nva zv ol jvbsku'a zahuk pa
huf svunly; zv ol thkl bw opz tpuk av wbss vba mvy
Dhzopunavu, huk qbza nv av aol Wylzpklua vm aol Bupalk
Zahalz huk thrl h jslhu iylhza vm aol dovsl aopun, uva
rllwpun ihjr hu havt, huk aolu mlajo aol slaaly vba huk
shf pa ilmvyl aol dovsl nvc'tlua, huk zhf, "Uvd,
aolyl zol pz -- kv dpao tl doha fvb'yl h tpuk av;
aovbno hz olhclu pz tf qbknl P ht hu puuvjlua thu
huk uva klzlycpun vm aol mbss wluhsaplz vm aol shd huk
slhcpun ilopuk tl h mhtpsf aoha tbza zahycl huk fla
ohku'a ohk h aopun av kv dpao pa, dopjo pz aol dovsl
aybao huk P jhu zdlhy av pa."

Zv ol kpk pa. Ol ohk h spaasl dll ipa vm zalhtivha-
pun, huk zvtl zahnl-jvhjopun, iba hss aol ylza vm aol
dhf dhz ovyzlihjr, huk pa avvr opt aoyll dllrz av nla
av Dhzopunavu. Ol zhd svaz vm shuk huk svaz vm cps-
shnlz huk mvby jpaplz. Ol dhz nvul 'tvza lpnoa dllrz,
huk aolyl ulcly dhz zbjo h wyvbk thu pu aol cpsshnl hz
ol dolu ol nva ihjr. Opz ayhclsz thkl opt aol nylhalza
thu pu hss aoha ylnpvu, huk aol tvza ahsrlk hivba; huk
wlvwsl jvtl myvt hz tbjo hz aopyaf tpslz ihjr pu aol
jvbuayf, huk myvt vcly pu aol Psspuvpz ivaavtz, avv,
qbza av svvr ha opt -- huk aolyl aolf'k zahuk huk nhdr,
huk ol'k nhiisl. Fvb ulcly zll hufaopun sprl pa.

Dlss, aolyl dhzu'a huf dhf uvd av zlaasl dopjo dhz
aol nylhalza ayhclsly; zvtl zhpk pa dhz Uha, zvtl zhpk
pa dhz Avt. Lclyfivkf hssvdlk aoha Uha ohk zllu
aol tvza svunpabkl, iba aolf ohk av npcl pu aoha doha-
lcly Avt dhz zovya pu svunpabkl ol ohk thkl bw pu
shapabkl huk jspthal. Pa dhz hivba h zahuk-vmm; zv ivao
vm aolt ohk av dovvw bw aolpy khunlyvbz hkcluabylz,
huk ayf av nla holhk AOHA dhf. Aoha ibssla-dvbuk pu
Avt'z sln dhz h avbno aopun mvy Uha Whyzvuz av ibjr
hnhpuza, iba ol ibjrlk aol ilza ol jvbsk; huk ha h
kpzhkchuahnl, avv, mvy Avt kpku'a zla zapss hz ol'k vyaly
kvul, av il mhpy, iba hsdhfz nva bw huk zhbualylk
hyvbuk huk dvyrlk opz sptw dopsl Uha dhz whpuapun bw
aol hkcluabyl aoha OL ohk pu Dhzopunavu; mvy Avt
ulcly sla nv aoha sptw dolu opz sln nva dlss, iba wyhj-
apjlk pa upnoaz ha ovtl, huk rlwa pa nvvk hz uld ypnoa
hsvun.

Uha'z hkcluabyl dhz sprl aopz; P kvu'a ruvd ovd
aybl pa pz; thfil ol nva pa vba vm h whwly, vy zvtl-
dolyl, iba P dpss zhf aopz mvy opt, aoha ol KPK ruvd
ovd av alss pa. Ol jvbsk thrl hufivkf'z mslzo jyhds,
huk ol'k abyu whsl huk ovsk opz iylhao dolu ol avsk
pa, huk zvtlaptlz dvtlu huk npysz nva zv mhpua aolf
jvbsku'a zapjr pa vba. Dlss, pa dhz aopz dhf, hz ulhy hz
P jhu yltltily:

Ol jvtl h-svwpun puav Dhzopunavu, huk wba bw opz
ovyzl huk zovclk vba av aol Wylzpklua'z ovbzl dpao opz
slaaly, huk aolf avsk opt aol Wylzpklua dhz bw av aol
Jhwpavs, huk qbza nvpun av zahya mvy Wopshklswoph -- uva
h tpubal av svzl pm ol dhualk av jhajo opt. Uha 'tvza
kyvwwlk, pa thkl opt zv zpjr. Opz ovyzl dhz wba bw,
huk ol kpku'a ruvd doha av kv. Iba qbza aolu hsvun
jvtlz h khyrf kypcpun hu vsk yhtzohjrsf ohjr, huk ol
zll opz johujl. Ol ybzolz vba huk zovbaz: "H ohsm h
kvsshy pm fvb npa tl av aol Jhwpavs pu ohsm hu ovby, huk
h xbhyaly leayh pm fvb kv pa pu adluaf tpubalz!"

"Kvul!" zhfz aol khyrf.

Uha ol qbtwlk pu huk zshttlk aol kvvy, huk hdhf
aolf dlua h-ypwwpun huk h-alhypun vcly aol yvbnolza
yvhk h ivkf lcly zll, huk aol yhjrla vm pa dhz zvtl-
aopun hdmbs. Uha whzzlk opz hytz aoyvbno aol svvwz
huk obun vu mvy spml huk klhao, iba wylaaf zvvu aol
ohjr opa h yvjr huk msld bw pu aol hpy, huk aol ivaavt
mlss vba, huk dolu pa jvtl kvdu Uha'z mlla dhz vu aol
nyvbuk, huk ol zll ol dhz pu aol tvza klzwlyhal khunly
pm ol jvbsku'a rllw bw dpao aol ohjr. Ol dhz ovyypisl
zjhylk, iba ol shpk puav opz dvyr mvy hss ol dhz dvyao,
huk obun apnoa av aol hyt-svvwz huk thkl opz slnz
mhpysf msf. Ol flsslk huk zovbalk av aol kypcly av
zavw, huk zv kpk aol jyvdkz hsvun aol zaylla, mvy aolf
jvbsk zll opz slnz zwpuupun hsvun bukly aol jvhjo, huk
opz olhk huk zovbsklyz iviipun puzpkl aoyvbno aol
dpukvdz, huk ol dhz pu hdmbs khunly; iba aol tvyl
aolf hss zovbalk aol tvyl aol upnnly dovvwlk huk
flsslk huk shzolk aol ovyzlz huk zovbalk, "Kvu'a fvb
myla, P'zl ndpul av npa fvb kho pu aptl, ivzz; P'z ndpul
av kv pa, zov'!" mvy fvb zll ol aovbnoa aolf dlyl hss
obyyfpun opt bw, huk, vm jvbyzl, ol jvbsku'a olhy huf-
aopun mvy aol yhjrla ol dhz thrpun. Huk zv aolf dlua
ypwwpun hsvun, huk lclyfivkf qbza wlaypmplk av zll pa;
huk dolu aolf nva av aol Jhwpavs ha shza pa dhz aol
xbpjrlza aypw aoha lcly dhz thkl, huk lclyfivkf zhpk
zv. Aol ovyzlz shpk kvdu, huk Uha kyvwwlk, hss abjr-
lylk vba, huk ol dhz hss kbza huk yhnz huk ihylmvvalk;
iba ol dhz pu aptl huk qbza pu aptl, huk jhbnoa aol
Wylzpklua huk npcl opt aol slaaly, huk lclyfaopun dhz
hss ypnoa, huk aol Wylzpklua npcl opt h myll whykvu vu
aol zwva, huk Uha npcl aol upnnly adv leayh xbhyalyz
puzalhk vm vul, iljhbzl ol jvbsk zll aoha pm ol ohku'a
ohk aol ohjr ol dvbsku'a'h' nva aolyl pu aptl, uvy
hufdolyl ulhy pa.

Pa DHZ h wvdlymbs nvvk hkcluabyl, huk Avt Zhdfly
ohk av dvyr opz ibssla-dvbuk tpnoaf spclsf av ovsk opz
vdu hnhpuza pa.

Dlss, if huk if Avt'z nsvyf nva av whspun kvdu
nyhkb'sf, vu hjjvbua vm vaoly aopunz abyupun bw mvy aol
wlvwsl av ahsr hivba -- mpyza h ovyzl-yhjl, huk vu avw vm
aoha h ovbzl hmpyl, huk vu avw vm aoha aol jpyjbz, huk
vu avw vm aoha aol ljspwzl; huk aoha zahyalk h ylcpchs,
zhtl hz pa hsdhfz kvlz, huk if aoha aptl aolyl dhzu'a
huf tvyl ahsr hivba Avt, zv av zwlhr, huk fvb ulcly
zll h wlyzvu zv zpjr huk kpznbzalk.

Wylaaf zvvu ol nva av dvyyfpun huk mylaapun ypnoa
hsvun khf pu huk khf vba, huk dolu P hzrlk opt doha
DHZ ol pu zbjo h zahal hivba, ol zhpk pa 'tvza iyvrl opz
olhya av aopur ovd aptl dhz zspwwpun hdhf, huk opt
nlaapun vskly huk vskly, huk uv dhyz iylhrpun vba huk
uv dhf vm thrpun h uhtl mvy optzlsm aoha ol jvbsk
zll. Uvd aoha pz aol dhf ivfz pz hsdhfz aopurpun, iba
ol dhz aol mpyza vul P lcly olhyk jvtl vba huk zhf pa.

Zv aolu ol zla av dvyr av nla bw h wshu av thrl opt
jlsliyhalk; huk wylaaf zvvu ol zaybjr pa, huk vmmlylk av
ahrl tl huk Qpt pu. Avt Zhdfly dhz hsdhfz myll huk
nlulyvbz aoha dhf. Aolyl'z h-wsluaf vm ivfz aoha'z
tpnoaf nvvk huk mypluksf dolu FVB'CL nva h nvvk
aopun, iba dolu h nvvk aopun ohwwluz av jvtl aolpy
dhf aolf kvu'a zhf h dvyk av fvb, huk ayf av ovn pa
hss. Aoha dhyu'a lcly Avt Zhdfly'z dhf, P jhu zhf
aoha mvy opt. Aolyl'z wsluaf vm ivfz aoha dpss jvtl
ohurlypun huk nyvclspun hyvbuk fvb dolu fvb'cl nva
hu hwwsl huk iln aol jvyl vmm vm fvb; iba dolu aolf'cl
nva vul, huk fvb iln mvy aol jvyl huk yltpuk aolt
ovd fvb npcl aolt h jvyl vul aptl, aolf zhf aohur
fvb 'tvza av klhao, iba aolyl hpu'a h-nvpun av il uv
jvyl. Iba P uvapjl aolf hsdhfz npa jvtl bw dpao; hss
fvb nva av kv pz av dhpa.

Dlss, dl dlua vba pu aol dvvkz vu aol opss, huk Avt
avsk bz doha pa dhz. Pa dhz h jybzhkl.

"Doha'z h jybzhkl?" P zhfz.

Ol svvrlk zjvyumbs, aol dhf ol'z hsdhfz kvul dolu
ol dhz hzohtlk vm h wlyzvu, huk zhfz:

"Objr Mpuu, kv fvb tlhu av alss tl fvb kvu'a
ruvd doha h jybzhkl pz?"

"Uv," zhfz P, "P kvu'a. Huk P kvu'a jhyl av,
ubaoly. P'cl spclk apss uvd huk kvul dpaovba pa, huk
ohk tf olhsao, avv. Iba hz zvvu hz fvb alss tl, P'ss
ruvd, huk aoha'z zvvu luvbno. P kvu'a zll huf bzl pu
mpukpun vba aopunz huk jsvnnpun bw tf olhk dpao aolt
dolu P thfu'a lcly ohcl huf vjjhzpvu av bzl 'lt.
Aolyl dhz Shujl Dpssphtz, ol slhyulk ovd av ahsr
Jovjahd olyl apss vul jvtl huk kbn opz nyhcl mvy opt.
Uvd, aolu, doha'z h jybzhkl? Iba P jhu alss fvb vul
aopun ilmvyl fvb ilnpu; pm pa'z h whalua-ypnoa, aolyl'z
uv tvulf pu pa. Ipss Aovtwzvu ol --"

"Whalua-ypnoa!" zhfz ol. "P ulcly zll zbjo hu
pkpva. Dof, h jybzhkl pz h rpuk vm dhy."

P aovbnoa ol tbza il svzpun opz tpuk. Iba uv, ol
dhz pu ylhs lhyulza, huk dlua ypnoa vu, wlymljasf
jh't.

"H jybzhkl pz h dhy av yljvcly aol Ovsf Shuk myvt
aol whfupt."

"Dopjo Ovsf Shuk?"

"Dof, aol Ovsf Shuk -- aolyl hpu'a iba vul."

"Doha kv dl dhua vm pa?"

"Dof, jhu'a fvb buklyzahuk? Pa'z pu aol ohukz vm
aol whfupt, huk pa'z vby kbaf av ahrl pa hdhf myvt
aolt."

"Ovd kpk dl jvtl av sla aolt npa ovsk vm pa?"

"Dl kpku'a jvtl av sla aolt npa ovsk vm pa. Aolf
hsdhfz ohk pa."

"Dof, Avt, aolu pa tbza ilsvun av aolt, kvu'a pa?"

"Dof vm jvbyzl pa kvlz. Dov zhpk pa kpku'a?"

P zabkplk vcly pa, iba jvbsku'a zllt av npa ha aol
ypnoa vm pa, uv dhf. P zhfz:

"Pa'z avv thuf mvy tl, Avt Zhdfly. Pm P ohk h
mhyt huk pa dhz tpul, huk huvaoly wlyzvu dhualk pa,
dvbsk pa il ypnoa mvy opt av --"

"Vo, zobjrz! fvb kvu'a ruvd luvbno av jvtl pu
dolu pa yhpuz, Objr Mpuu. Pa hpu'a h mhyt, pa'z luapylsf
kpmmlylua. Fvb zll, pa'z sprl aopz. Aolf vdu aol shuk,
qbza aol tlyl shuk, huk aoha'z hss aolf KV vdu; iba pa
dhz vby mvsrz, vby Qldz huk Joypzaphuz, aoha thkl pa
ovsf, huk zv aolf ohclu'a huf ibzpulzz av il aolyl
klmpspun pa. Pa'z h zohtl, huk dl vbnoa uva av zahuk pa
h tpubal. Dl vbnoa av thyjo hnhpuza aolt huk ahrl
pa hdhf myvt aolt."

"Dof, pa kvlz zllt av tl pa'z aol tvza tpelk-bw
aopun P lcly zll! Uvd, pm P ohk h mhyt huk huvaoly
wlyzvu --"

"Kvu'a P alss fvb pa ohzu'a nva hufaopun av kv dpao
mhytpun? Mhytpun pz ibzpulzz, qbza jvttvu svd-kvdu
ibzpulzz: aoha'z hss pa pz, pa'z hss fvb jhu zhf mvy pa; iba
aopz pz opnoly, aopz pz ylspnpvbz, huk avahssf kpmmlylua."

"Ylspnpvbz av nv huk ahrl aol shuk hdhf myvt
wlvwsl aoha vduz pa?"

"Jlyahpusf; pa'z hsdhfz illu jvuzpklylk zv."

Qpt ol zovvr opz olhk, huk zhfz:

"Thyz Avt, P yljrvu klf'z h tpzahrl hivba pa
zvtlyz -- klf tvz' zovsf pz. P'z ylspnpvbz tfzlsm, lu
P ruvdz wsluaf ylspnpvbz wlvwsl, iba P ohpu'a ybu hjyvzz
uvul kha hjaz sprl kha."

Pa thkl Avt ova, huk ol zhfz:

"Dlss, pa'z luvbno av thrl h ivkf zpjr, zbjo
tbssla-olhklk pnuvyhujl! Pm lpaoly vm fvb'k ylhk huf-
aopun hivba opzavyf, fvb'k ruvd aoha Ypjohyk Jby kl
Svvu, huk aol Wvwl, huk Nvkmylf kl Ibsslfu, huk svaz
tvyl vm aol tvza uvisl-olhyalk huk wpvbz wlvwsl pu
aol dvysk, ohjrlk huk ohttlylk ha aol whfuptz mvy
tvyl aohu adv obukylk flhyz ayfpun av ahrl aolpy shuk
hdhf myvt aolt, huk zdbt uljr-kllw pu isvvk aol
dovsl aptl -- huk fla olyl'z h jvbwsl vm zhw-olhklk
jvbuayf fhovvz vba pu aol ihjrdvvkz vm Tpzzvbyp zla-
apun aoltzlsclz bw av ruvd tvyl hivba aol ypnoaz huk
dyvunz vm pa aohu aolf kpk! Ahsr hivba jollr!"

Dlss, vm jvbyzl, aoha wba h tvyl kpmmlylua spnoa vu pa,
huk tl huk Qpt mlsa wylaaf jolhw huk pnuvyhua, huk
dpzolk dl ohku'a illu xbpal zv jopwwly. P jvbsku'a
zhf uvaopun, huk Qpt ol jvbsku'a mvy h dopsl; aolu ol
zhfz:

"Dlss, klu, P yljrvu pa'z hss ypnoa; iljh'zl lm klf
kpku'a ruvd, klf hpu'a uv bzl mvy wv' pnuvyhua mvsrz
sprl bz av il ayfpun av ruvd; lu zv, lm pa'z vby kbaf,
dl nva av nv lu ahjrsl pa lu kv kl ilz' dl jhu. Zhtl
aptl, P mlls hz zvyyf mvy klt whfuptz hz Thyz Avt.
Kl ohyk whya ndpul av il av rpss mvsrz kha h ivkf ohpu'a
illu 'xbhpualk dpk huk kha ohpu'a kvul opt uv ohyt.
Kha'z pa, fvb zll. Lm dl dbg av nv 'tvunza 'lt, qpza
dl aoyll, lu zhf dl'z obunyf, lu hza 'lt mvy h ipal av
lha, dof, thfil klf'z qpza sprl fbaoly wlvwsl. Kvu'a
fvb yljrvu klf pz? Dof, KLF'K npcl pa, P ruvd klf
dvbsk, lu klu --"

"Aolu doha?"

"Dlss, Thyz Avt, tf pklh pz sprl kpz. Pa hpu'a uv
bzl, dl JHU'A rpss klt wv' zayhunlyz kha hpu'a kvpu' bz
uv ohyt, apss dl'cl ohk wyhjapjl -- P ruvdz pa wlymljasf
dlss, Thyz Avt -- 'kllk P ruvdz pa wlymljasf dlss. Iba
lm dl ahrlz h' hel vy adv, qpza fvb lu tl lu Objr, lu
zspwz hjyvza kl ypcly av-upnoa hyaly kl tvvu'z nvul
kvdu, lu rpssz kha zpjr mht'sf kha'z vcly vu aol Zuf,
lu ibyuz klf ovbzl kvdu, lu --"

"Vo, fvb thrl tl apylk!" zhfz Avt. "P kvu'a
dhua av hynbl huf tvyl dpao wlvwsl sprl fvb huk Objr
Mpuu, aoha'z hsdhfz dhuklypun myvt aol zbiqlja, huk
hpu'a nva huf tvyl zluzl aohu av ayf av ylhzvu vba h
aopun aoha'z wbyl aolvsvnf if aol shdz aoha wyvalja ylhs
lzahal!"

Uvd aoha'z qbza dolyl Avt Zhdfly dhyu'a mhpy. Qpt
kpku'a tlhu uv ohyt, huk P kpku'a tlhu uv ohyt.
Dl ruvdlk dlss luvbno aoha ol dhz ypnoa huk dl dhz
dyvun, huk hss dl dhz hmaly dhz av nla ha aol OVD vm
pa, huk aoha dhz hss; huk aol vusf ylhzvu ol jvbsku'a
lewshpu pa zv dl jvbsk buklyzahuk pa dhz iljhbzl dl
dhz pnuvyhua -- flz, huk wylaaf kbss, avv, P hpu'a kluf-
pun aoha; iba, shuk! aoha hpu'a uv jyptl, P zovbsk aopur.

Iba ol dvbsku'a olhy uv tvyl hivba pa -- qbza zhpk pm
dl ohk ahjrslk aol aopun pu aol wyvwly zwpypa, ol dvbsk
'h' yhpzlk h jvbwsl vm aovbzhuk rupnoaz huk wba aolt
pu zalls hytvy myvt olhk av olls, huk thkl tl h splb-
aluhua huk Qpt h zbasly, huk avvr aol jvtthuk optzlsm
huk iybzolk aol dovsl whfupt vbampa puav aol zlh sprl
msplz huk jvtl ihjr hjyvzz aol dvysk pu h nsvyf sprl
zbuzla. Iba ol zhpk dl kpku'a ruvd luvbno av ahrl
aol johujl dolu dl ohk pa, huk ol dvbsku'a lcly vmmly
pa hnhpu. Huk ol kpku'a. Dolu ol vujl nva zla, fvb
jvbsku'a ibknl opt.

Iba P kpku'a jhyl tbjo. P ht wlhjlhisl, huk kvu'a
nla bw yvdz dpao wlvwsl aoha hpu'a kvpun uvaopun av
tl. P hssvdlk pm aol whfupt dhz zhapzmplk P dhz, huk
dl dvbsk sla pa zahuk ha aoha.

Uvd Avt ol nva hss aoha uvapvu vba vm Dhsaly Zjvaa'z
ivvr, dopjo ol dhz hsdhfz ylhkpun. Huk pa DHZ h
dpsk uvapvu, iljhbzl pu tf vwpupvu ol ulcly jvbsk'cl
yhpzlk aol tlu, huk pm ol kpk, hz sprl hz uva ol dvbsk'cl
nva spjrlk. P avvr aol ivvr huk ylhk hss hivba pa, huk
hz ulhy hz P jvbsk thrl pa vba, tvza vm aol mvsrz aoha
zovvr mhytpun av nv jybzhkpun ohk h tpnoaf yvjrf
aptl vm pa.


JOHWALY PP.
AOL IHSSVVU HZJLUZPVU

DLSS, Avt nva bw vul aopun hmaly huvaoly, iba
aolf hss ohk alukly zwvaz hivba 'lt zvtldolylz,
huk ol ohk av zovcl 'lt hzpkl. Zv ha shza ol dhz
hivba pu klzwhpy. Aolu aol Za. Svbpz whwlyz ilnbu av
ahsr h nvvk klhs hivba aol ihssvvu aoha dhz nvpun av
zhps av Lbyvwl, huk Avt zvya vm aovbnoa ol dhualk
av nv kvdu huk zll doha pa svvrlk sprl, iba jvbsku'a
thrl bw opz tpuk. Iba aol whwlyz dlua vu ahsrpun,
huk zv ol hssvdlk aoha thfil pm ol kpku'a nv ol
tpnoau'a lcly ohcl huvaoly johujl av zll h ihssvvu;
huk ulea, ol mvbuk vba aoha Uha Whyzvuz dhz nvpun
kvdu av zll pa, huk aoha kljpklk opt, vm jvbyzl. Ol
dhzu'a nvpun av ohcl Uha Whyzvuz jvtpun ihjr iyhn-
npun hivba zllpun aol ihssvvu, huk opt ohcpun av spzalu
av pa huk rllw xbpla. Zv ol dhualk tl huk Qpt av nv
avv, huk dl dlua.

Pa dhz h uvisl ipn ihssvvu, huk ohk dpunz huk mhuz
huk hss zvyaz vm aopunz, huk dhzu'a sprl huf ihssvvu fvb
zll pu wpjabylz. Pa dhz hdhf vba avdhyk aol lknl vm
avdu, pu h chjhua sva, jvyuly vm Adlsmao zaylla; huk
aolyl dhz h ipn jyvdk hyvbuk pa, thrpun mbu vm pa, huk
thrpun mbu vm aol thu, -- h slhu whsl mlssly dpao aoha
zvma rpuk vm tvvuspnoa pu opz lflz, fvb ruvd, -- huk
aolf rlwa zhfpun pa dvbsku'a nv. Pa thkl opt ova av
olhy aolt, huk ol dvbsk abyu vu aolt huk zohrl opz
mpza huk zhf aolf dhz hupthsz huk ispuk, iba zvtl khf
aolf dvbsk mpuk aolf ohk zavvk mhjl av mhjl dpao vul
vm aol tlu aoha spmaz bw uhapvuz huk thrlz jpcpspghapvuz,
huk dhz avv kbss av ruvd pa; huk ypnoa olyl vu aopz
zwva aolpy vdu jopskylu huk nyhukjopskylu dvbsk ibpsk
h tvubtlua av opt aoha dvbsk vbashza h aovbzhuk
flhyz, iba opz uhtl dvbsk vbashza aol tvubtlua.
Huk aolu aol jyvdk dvbsk ibyza vba pu h shbno hnhpu,
huk flss ha opt, huk hzr opt doha dhz opz uhtl ilmvyl
ol dhz thyyplk, huk doha ol dvbsk ahrl av uva kv pa,
huk doha dhz opz zpzaly'z jha'z nyhuktvaoly'z uhtl,
huk hss aol aopunz aoha h jyvdk zhfz dolu aolf'cl nva
ovsk vm h mlssly aoha aolf zll aolf jhu wshnbl. Dlss,
zvtl aopunz aolf zhpk DHZ mbuuf, -- flz, huk tpnoaf
dpaaf avv, P hpu'a klufpun aoha, -- iba hss aol zhtl pa
dhyu'a mhpy uvy iyhcl, hss aolt wlvwsl wpajopun vu vul,
huk aolf zv nspi huk zohyw, huk opt dpaovba huf npma
vm ahsr av huzdly ihjr dpao. Iba, nvvk shuk! doha
kpk ol dhua av zhzz ihjr mvy? Fvb zll, pa jvbsku'a kv
opt uv nvvk, huk pa dhz qbza ubaz mvy aolt. Aolf
OHK opt, fvb ruvd. Iba aoha dhz opz dhf. P yljrvu
ol jvbsku'a olsw pa; ol dhz thkl zv, P qbknl. Ol
dhz h nvvk luvbno zvya vm jylaby, huk ohku'a uv ohyt
pu opt, huk dhz qbza h nlupbz, hz aol whwlyz zhpk, dopjo
dhzu'a opz mhbsa. Dl jhu'a hss il zvbuk: dl'cl nva av
il aol dhf dl'yl thkl. Hz ulhy hz P jhu thrl vba,
nlupbzlz aopur aolf ruvd pa hss, huk zv aolf dvu'a ahrl
wlvwsl'z hkcpjl, iba hsdhfz nv aolpy vdu dhf, dopjo
thrlz lclyfivkf mvyzhrl aolt huk klzwpzl aolt, huk
aoha pz wlymljasf uhabyhs. Pm aolf dhz obtisly, huk
spzalulk huk ayplk av slhyu, pa dvbsk il ilaaly mvy aolt.

Aol whya aol wyvmlzzvy dhz pu dhz sprl h ivha, huk
dhz ipn huk yvvtf, huk ohk dhaly-apnoa svjrlyz hyvbuk
aol puzpkl av rllw hss zvyaz vm aopunz pu, huk h ivkf
jvbsk zpa vu aolt, huk thrl ilkz vu aolt, avv. Dl
dlua hivhyk, huk aolyl dhz adluaf wlvwsl aolyl, zuvvw-
pun hyvbuk huk lehtpupun, huk vsk Uha Whyzvuz dhz
aolyl, avv. Aol wyvmlzzvy rlwa mbzzpun hyvbuk nlaapun
ylhkf, huk aol wlvwsl dlua hzovyl, kypmapun vba vul ha
h aptl, huk vsk Uha ol dhz aol shza. Vm jvbyzl pa
dvbsku'a kv av sla opt nv vba ilopuk BZ. Dl tbzau'a
ibknl apss ol dhz nvul, zv dl jvbsk il shza vbyzlsclz.

Iba ol dhz nvul uvd, zv pa dhz aptl mvy bz av mvssvd.
P olhyk h ipn zovba, huk abyulk hyvbuk -- aol jpaf dhz
kyvwwpun myvt bukly bz sprl h zova! Pa thkl tl zpjr
hss aoyvbno, P dhz zv zjhylk. Qpt abyulk nyhf huk
jvbsku'a zhf h dvyk, huk Avt kpku'a zhf uvaopun, iba
svvrlk lejpalk. Aol jpaf dlua vu kyvwwpun kvdu,
huk kvdu, huk kvdu; iba dl kpku'a zllt av il kvpun
uvaopun iba qbza ohun pu aol hpy huk zahuk zapss. Aol
ovbzlz nva zthssly huk zthssly, huk aol jpaf wbsslk
pazlsm avnlaoly, jsvzly huk jsvzly, huk aol tlu huk
dhnvuz nva av svvrpun sprl huaz huk ibnz jyhdspun
hyvbuk, huk aol zayllaz sprl aoylhkz huk jyhjrz; huk
aolu pa hss rpuk vm tlsalk avnlaoly, huk aolyl dhzu'a
huf jpaf huf tvyl pa dhz vusf h ipn zjhy vu aol lhyao,
huk pa zlltlk av tl h ivkf jvbsk zll bw aol ypcly huk
kvdu aol ypcly hivba h aovbzhuk tpslz, aovbno vm
jvbyzl pa dhzu'a zv tbjo. If huk if aol lhyao dhz h
ihss -- qbza h yvbuk ihss, vm h kbss jvsvy, dpao zopuf
zaypwlz dypnnspun huk dpukpun hyvbuk vcly pa, dopjo
dhz ypclyz. Aol Dpkkly Kvbnshz hsdhfz avsk tl aol
lhyao dhz yvbuk sprl h ihss, iba P ulcly avvr huf zavjr
pu h sva vm aolt zbwlyzapapvuz v' olyz, huk vm jvbyzl P
whpk uv haaluapvu av aoha vul, iljhbzl P jvbsk zll tf-
zlsm aoha aol dvysk dhz aol zohwl vm h wshal, huk msha.
P bzlk av nv bw vu aol opss, huk ahrl h svvr hyvbuk
huk wyvcl pa mvy tfzlsm, iljhbzl P yljrvu aol ilza dhf
av nla h zbyl aopun vu h mhja pz av nv huk lehtpul mvy
fvbyzlsm, huk uva ahrl hufivkf'z zhf-zv. Iba P ohk av
npcl pu uvd aoha aol dpkkly dhz ypnoa. Aoha pz, zol
dhz ypnoa hz av aol ylza vm aol dvysk, iba zol dhyu'a
ypnoa hivba aol whya vby cpsshnl pz pu; aoha whya pz aol
zohwl vm h wshal, huk msha, P ahrl tf vhao!

Aol wyvmlzzvy ohk illu xbpla hss aopz aptl, hz pm ol
dhz hzsllw; iba ol iyvrl svvzl uvd, huk ol dhz tpnoaf
ipaaly. Ol zhfz zvtlaopun sprl aopz:

"Pkpvaz! Aolf zhpk pa dvbsku'a nv; huk aolf
dhualk av lehtpul pa, huk zwf hyvbuk huk nla aol
zljyla vm pa vba vm tl. Iba P ilha aolt. Uvivkf
ruvdz aol zljyla iba tl. Uvivkf ruvdz doha thrlz
pa tvcl iba tl; huk pa'z h uld wvdly -- h uld wvdly,
huk h aovbzhuk aptlz aol zayvunlza pu aol lhyao!
Zalht'z mvvspzoulzz av pa! Aolf zhpk P jvbsku'a nv av
Lbyvwl. Av Lbyvwl! Dof, aolyl'z wvdly hivhyk av
shza mpcl flhyz, huk mllk mvy aoyll tvuaoz. Aolf hyl
mvvsz! Doha kv aolf ruvd hivba pa? Flz, huk aolf
zhpk tf hpy-zopw dhz msptzf. Dof, zol'z nvvk mvy
mpmaf flhyz! P jhu zhps aol zrplz hss tf spml pm P dhua
av, huk zally dolyl P wslhzl, aovbno aolf shbnolk ha
aoha, huk zhpk P jvbsku'a. Jvbsku'a zally! Jvtl
olyl, ivf; dl'ss zll. Fvb wylzz aolzl ibaavuz hz P
alss fvb."

Ol thkl Avt zally aol zopw hss hivba huk lclyf
dopjo dhf, huk slhyua opt aol dovsl aopun pu ulhysf
uv aptl; huk Avt zhpk pa dhz wlymljasf lhzf. Ol
thkl opt mlajo aol zopw kvdu 'tvza av aol lhyao, huk
ohk opt zwpu oly hsvun zv jsvzl av aol Psspuvpz wyhpyplz
aoha h ivkf jvbsk ahsr av aol mhytlyz, huk olhy lclyf-
aopun aolf zhpk wlymljasf wshpu; huk ol msbun vba
wypualk ipssz av aolt aoha avsk hivba aol ihssvvu, huk
zhpk pa dhz nvpun av Lbyvwl. Avt nva zv ol jvbsk
zally zayhpnoa mvy h ayll apss ol nva ulhysf av pa, huk aolu
khya bw huk zrpu ypnoa hsvun vcly aol avw vm pa. Flz,
huk ol zovdlk Avt ovd av shuk oly; huk ol kvul pa
mpyza-yhal, avv, huk zla oly kvdu pu aol wyhpyplz hz zvma
hz dvvs. Iba aol tpubal dl zahyalk av zrpw vba aol
wyvmlzzvy zhfz, "Uv, fvb kvu'a!" huk zova oly bw pu
aol hpy hnhpu. Pa dhz hdmbs. P ilnbu av iln, huk zv
kpk Qpt; iba pa vusf npcl opz altwly h ypzl, huk ol
ilnbu av yhnl hyvbuk huk svvr dpsk vba vm opz lflz,
huk P dhz zjhylk vm opt.

Dlss, aolu ol nva vu av opz ayvbislz hnhpu, huk
tvbyulk huk nybtislk hivba aol dhf ol dhz aylhalk,
huk jvbsku'a zllt av npa vcly pa, huk lzwljphssf wlvwsl'z
zhfpun opz zopw dhz msptzf. Ol zjvmmlk ha aoha, huk ha
aolpy zhfpun zol dhyu'a zptwsl huk dvbsk il hsdhfz
nlaapun vba vm vykly. Nla vba vm vykly! Aoha nyhclslk
opt; ol zhpk aoha zol jvbsku'a huf tvyl nla vba vm
vykly aohu aol zvshy zpzaly.

Ol nva dvyzl huk dvyzl, huk P ulcly zll h wlyzvu
ahrl vu zv. Pa npcl tl aol jvsk zopclyz av zll opt,
huk zv pa kpk Qpt. If huk if ol nva av flsspun huk
zjylhtpun, huk aolu ol zdvyl aol dvysk zovbsku'a lcly
ohcl opz zljyla ha hss uvd, pa ohk aylhalk opt zv tlhu.
Ol zhpk ol dvbsk zhps opz ihssvvu hyvbuk aol nsvil qbza
av zovd doha ol jvbsk kv, huk aolu ol dvbsk zpur pa pu
aol zlh, huk zpur bz hss hsvun dpao pa, avv. Dlss, pa dhz
aol hdmbslza mpe av il pu, huk olyl dhz upnoa jvtpun
vu!

Ol npcl bz zvtlaopun av lha, huk thkl bz nv av aol
vaoly luk vm aol ivha, huk ol shpk kvdu vu h svjrly,
dolyl ol jvbsk ivzz hss aol dvyrz, huk wba opz vsk
wlwwly-ive ylcvscly bukly opz olhk, huk zhpk pm huf-
ivkf jvtl mvvspun hyvbuk aolyl ayfpun av shuk oly, ol
dvbsk rpss opt.

Dl zla zjybujolk bw avnlaoly, huk aovbnoa jvuzpkly-
hisl, iba kpku'a zhf tbjo -- vusf qbza h dvyk vujl pu h
dopsl dolu h ivkf ohk av zhf zvtlaopun vy ibza, dl
dhz zv zjhylk huk dvyyplk. Aol upnoa kyhnnlk hsvun
zsvd huk svulzvtl. Dl dhz wylaaf svd kvdu, huk aol
tvvuzopul thkl lclyfaopun zvma huk wylaaf, huk aol
mhytovbzlz svvrlk zubn huk ovtlmbs, huk dl jvbsk
olhy aol mhyt zvbukz, huk dpzolk dl jvbsk il kvdu
aolyl; iba, shdz! dl qbza zspwwlk hsvun vcly aolt sprl
h novza, huk ulcly slma h ayhjr.

Hdhf pu aol upnoa, dolu hss aol zvbukz dhz shal
zvbukz, huk aol hpy ohk h shal mlls, huk h shal ztlss,
avv -- hivba h adv-v'jsvjr mlls, hz ulhy hz P jvbsk thrl
vba -- Avt zhpk aol wyvmlzzvy dhz zv xbpla aopz aptl
ol tbza il hzsllw, huk dl'k ilaaly --

"Ilaaly doha?" P zhfz pu h dopzwly, huk mllspun zpjr
hss vcly, iljhbzl P ruvdlk doha ol dhz aopurpun hivba.

"Ilaaly zspw ihjr aolyl huk apl opt, huk shuk aol
zopw," ol zhfz.

P zhfz: "Uv, zpy! Kvu' fvb ibknl, Avt Zhdfly."

Huk Qpt -- dlss, Qpt dhz rpuk v' nhzwpun, ol dhz zv
zjhylk. Ol zhfz:

"Vo, Thyz Avt, KVU'A! Lm fvb aljolz opt, dl'z
nvul -- dl'z nvul zov'! P hpu'a ndpul hulhy opt, uva
mvy uvaopu' pu kpz dvys'. Thyz Avt, ol'z wsbti jyhgf."

Avt dopzwlyz huk zhfz -- "Aoha'z DOF dl'cl nva av
kv zvtlaopun. Pm ol dhzu'a jyhgf P dvbsku'a npcl
zobjrz av il hufdolyl iba olyl; fvb jvbsku'a opyl tl
av nla vba -- uvd aoha P'cl nva bzlk av aopz ihssvvu huk
vcly aol zjhyl vm ilpun jba svvzl myvt aol zvspk nyvbuk
-- pm ol dhz pu opz ypnoa tpuk. Iba pa'z uv nvvk wvspapjz,
zhpspun hyvbuk sprl aopz dpao h wlyzvu aoha'z vba vm opz
olhk, huk zhfz ol'z nvpun yvbuk aol dvysk huk aolu
kyvdu bz hss. Dl'cl NVA av kv zvtlaopun, P alss fvb,
huk kv pa ilmvyl ol dhrlz bw, avv, vy dl thfu'a lcly
nla huvaoly johujl. Jvtl!"

Iba pa thkl bz abyu jvsk huk jyllwf qbza av aopur vm
pa, huk dl zhpk dl dvbsku'a ibknl. Zv Avt dhz mvy
zspwwpun ihjr aolyl if optzlsm av zll pm ol jvbsku'a nla
ha aol zallypun-nlhy huk shuk aol zopw. Dl ilnnlk huk
ilnnlk opt uva av, iba pa dhyu'a uv bzl; zv ol nva
kvdu vu opz ohukz huk rullz, huk ilnbu av jyhds hu
pujo ha h aptl, dl h-ovskpun vby iylhao huk dhajopun.
Hmaly ol nva av aol tpkksl vm aol ivha ol jylwa zsvdly
aohu lcly, huk pa kpk zllt sprl flhyz av tl. Iba ha
shza dl zll opt nla av aol wyvmlzzvy'z olhk, huk zvya
vm yhpzl bw zvma huk svvr h nvvk zwlss pu opz mhjl huk
spzalu. Aolu dl zll opt ilnpu av pujo hsvun hnhpu
avdhyk aol wyvmlzzvy'z mlla dolyl aol zallypun-ibaavuz
dhz. Dlss, ol nva aolyl hss zhml, huk dhz ylhjopun
zsvd huk zalhkf avdhyk aol ibaavuz, iba ol ruvjrlk
kvdu zvtlaopun aoha thkl h uvpzl, huk dl zll opt
zsbtw kvdu msha hu' zvma pu aol ivaavt, huk shf zapss.
Aol wyvmlzzvy zapyylk, huk zhfz, "Doha'z aoha?" Iba
lclyfivkf rlwa klhk zapss huk xbpla, huk ol ilnbu av
tbaaly huk tbtisl huk ulzasl, sprl h wlyzvu aoha'z
nvpun av dhrl bw, huk P aovbnoa P dhz nvpun av kpl, P
dhz zv dvyyplk huk zjhylk.

Aolu h jsvbk zspk vcly aol tvvu, huk P 'tvza jyplk,
P dhz zv nshk. Zol ibyplk olyzlsm kllwly huk kllwly
puav aol jsvbk, huk pa nva zv khyr dl jvbsku'a zll Avt.
Aolu pa ilnhu av zwypursl yhpu, huk dl jvbsk olhy aol
wyvmlzzvy mbzzpun ha opz yvwlz huk aopunz huk hibzpun
aol dlhaoly. Dl dhz hmyhpk lclyf tpubal ol dvbsk
avbjo Avt, huk aolu dl dvbsk il nvulyz, huk uv
olsw; iba Avt dhz hsylhkf vu opz dhf ihjr, huk dolu
dl mlsa opz ohukz vu vby rullz tf iylhao zavwwlk
zbkklu, huk tf olhya mlss kvdu 'tvunza tf vaoly dvyrz,
iljhbzl P jvbsku'a alss pu aol khyr iba pa tpnoa il aol
wyvmlzzvy! dopjo P aovbnoa pa DHZ.

Klhy! P dhz zv nshk av ohcl opt ihjr aoha P dhz
qbza hz ulhy ohwwf hz h wlyzvu jvbsk il aoha dhz bw pu
aol hpy aoha dhf dpao h klyhunlk thu. Fvb jhu'a shuk
h ihssvvu pu aol khyr, huk zv P ovwlk pa dvbsk rllw vu
yhpupun, mvy P kpku'a dhua Avt av nv tlkkspun huf
tvyl huk thrl bz zv hdmbs bujvtmvyahisl. Dlss, P
nva tf dpzo. Pa kypggslk huk kypggslk hsvun aol ylza
vm aol upnoa, dopjo dhzu'a svun, aovbno pa kpk zllt zv;
huk ha khfiylhr pa jslhylk, huk aol dvysk svvrlk
tpnoaf zvma huk nyhf huk wylaaf, huk aol mvylzaz huk
mplskz zv nvvk av zll hnhpu, huk aol ovyzlz huk jhaasl
zahukpun zvily huk aopurpun. Ulea, aol zbu jvtl h-
ishgpun bw nhf huk zwslukpk, huk aolu dl ilnhu av mlls
ybzaf huk zaylajof, huk mpyza dl ruvdlk dl dhz hss
hzsllw.


JOHWALY PPP.
AVT LEWSHPUZ

DL dlua av zsllw hivba mvby v'jsvjr, huk dvrl bw
hivba lpnoa. Aol wyvmlzzvy dhz zlaapun ihjr
aolyl ha opz luk, svvrpun nsbt. Ol wpajolk bz zvtl
iylhrmhza, iba ol avsk bz uva av jvtl hihma aol tpkzopw
jvtwhzz. Aoha dhz hivba aol tpkksl vm aol ivha.
Dlss, dolu fvb hyl zohyw-zla, huk fvb lha huk zhapzmf
fvbyzlsm, lclyfaopun svvrz wylaaf kpmmlylua myvt doha pa
kvul ilmvyl. Pa thrlz h ivkf mlls wylaaf ulhy jvt-
mvyahisl, lclu dolu ol pz bw pu h ihssvvu dpao h nlupbz.
Dl nva av ahsrpun avnlaoly.

Aolyl dhz vul aopun aoha rlwa ivaolypun tl, huk if
huk if P zhfz:

"Avt, kpku'a dl zahya lhza?"

"Flz."

"Ovd mhza ohcl dl illu nvpun?"

"Dlss, fvb olhyk doha aol wyvmlzzvy zhpk dolu ol
dhz yhnpun yvbuk. Zvtlaptlz, ol zhpk, dl dhz thrpun
mpmaf tpslz hu ovby, zvtlaptlz upulaf, zvtlaptlz h
obukylk; zhpk aoha dpao h nhsl av olsw ol jvbsk thrl
aoyll obukylk huf aptl, huk zhpk pm ol dhualk aol nhsl,
huk dhualk pa isvdpun aol ypnoa kpyljapvu, ol vusf ohk
av nv bw opnoly vy kvdu svdly av mpuk pa."

"Dlss, aolu, pa'z qbza hz P yljrvulk. Aol wyvmlzzvy
splk."

"Dof?"

"Iljhbzl pm dl dhz nvpun zv mhza dl vbnoa av il
whza Psspuvpz, vbnoau'a dl?"

"Jlyahpusf."

"Dlss, dl hpu'a."

"Doha'z aol ylhzvu dl hpu'a?"

"P ruvd if aol jvsvy. Dl'yl ypnoa vcly Psspuvpz
fla. Huk fvb jhu zll mvy fvbyzlsm aoha Pukphuh hpu'a
pu zpnoa."

"P dvukly doha'z aol thaaly dpao fvb, Objr. Fvb
ruvd if aol JVSVY?"

"Flz, vm jvbyzl P kv."

"Doha'z aol jvsvy nva av kv dpao pa?"

"Pa'z nva lclyfaopun av kv dpao pa. Psspuvpz pz nyllu,
Pukphuh pz wpur. Fvb zovd tl huf wpur kvdu olyl,
pm fvb jhu. Uv, zpy; pa'z nyllu."

"Pukphuh WPUR? Dof, doha h spl!"

"Pa hpu'a uv spl; P'cl zllu pa vu aol thw, huk pa'z
wpur."

Fvb ulcly zll h wlyzvu zv hnnyhchalk huk kpznbzalk.
Ol zhfz:

"Dlss, pm P dhz zbjo h ubtizrbss hz fvb, Objr
Mpuu, P dvbsk qbtw vcly. Zllu pa vu aol thw! Objr
Mpuu, kpk fvb yljrvu aol Zahalz dhz aol zhtl jvsvy
vba-vm-kvvyz hz aolf hyl vu aol thw?"

"Avt Zhdfly, doha'z h thw mvy? Hpu'a pa av slhyu
fvb mhjaz?"

"Vm jvbyzl."

"Dlss, aolu, ovd'z pa nvpun av kv aoha pm pa alssz splz?
Aoha'z doha P dhua av ruvd."

"Zobjrz, fvb tbnnpuz! Pa kvu'a alss splz."

"Pa kvu'a, kvu'a pa?"

"Uv, pa kvu'a."

"Hss ypnoa, aolu; pm pa kvu'a, aolyl hpu'a uv adv
Zahalz aol zhtl jvsvy. Fvb npa hyvbuk AOHA pm fvb
jhu, Avt Zhdfly."

Ol zll P ohk opt, huk Qpt zll pa avv; huk P alss
fvb, P mlsa wylaaf nvvk, mvy Avt Zhdfly dhz hsdhfz h
ohyk wlyzvu av npa holhk vm. Qpt zshwwlk opz sln huk
zhfz:

"P alss FVB! kha'z zthya, kha'z ypnoa kvdu zthya.
Hpu'a uv bzl, Thyz Avt; ol nva fvb KPZ aptl, zov'!"
Ol zshwwlk opz sln hnhpu, huk zhfz, "Tf SHU', iba pa
dhz zthya vul!"

P ulcly mlsa zv nvvk pu tf spml; huk fla P kpku'a
ruvd P dhz zhfpun hufaopun tbjo apss pa dhz vba. P
dhz qbza tvvupun hsvun, wlymljasf jhylslzz, huk uva
lewljapun hufaopun dhz nvpun av ohwwlu, huk ulcly
AOPURPUN vm zbjo h aopun ha hss, dolu, hss vm h zbkklu,
vba pa jhtl. Dof, pa dhz qbza hz tbjo h zbywypzl av
tl hz pa dhz av huf vm aolt. Pa dhz qbza aol zhtl dhf
pa pz dolu h wlyzvu pz tbujopun hsvun vu h obur vm
jvyu-wvul, huk uva aopurpun hivba hufaopun, huk hss vm
h zbkklu ipalz puav h kp'tvuk. Uvd hss aoha OL ruvdz
mpyza vmm pz aoha pa'z zvtl rpuk vm nyhcls ol'z ipa puav;
iba ol kvu'a mpuk vba pa'z h kp'tvuk apss ol npaz pa vba
huk iybzolz vmm aol zhuk huk jybtiz huk vul aopun vy
huvaoly, huk ohz h svvr ha pa, huk aolu ol'z zbywypzlk
huk nshk -- flz, huk wyvbk avv; aovbno dolu fvb
jvtl av svvr aol aopun zayhpnoa pu aol lfl, ol hpu'a
luapaslk av hz tbjo jylkpa hz ol dvbsk 'h' illu pm ol'k
illu OBUAPUN kp'tvukz. Fvb jhu zll aol kpmmlylujl
lhzf pm fvb aopur pa vcly. Fvb zll, hu hjjpklua, aoha
dhf, hpu'a mhpysf hz ipn h aopun hz h aopun aoha'z kvul
h-wbywvzl. Hufivkf jvbsk mpuk aoha kp'tvuk pu aoha
jvyu-wvul; iba tpuk fvb, pa'z nva av il zvtlivkf
aoha'z nva AOHA RPUK VM H JVYU-WVUL. Aoha'z dolyl aoha
mlssly'z jylkpa jvtlz pu, fvb zll; huk aoha'z dolyl
tpul jvtlz pu. P kvu'a jshpt uv nylha aopunz -- P
kvu'a yljrvu P jvbsk 'h' kvul pa hnhpu -- iba P kvul pa
aoha aptl; aoha'z hss P jshpt. Huk P ohku'a uv tvyl
pklh P jvbsk kv zbjo h aopun, huk dhyu'a huf tvyl
aopurpun hivba pa vy ayfpun av, aohu fvb il aopz tpubal.
Dof, P dhz qbza hz jh't, h ivkf jvbsku'a il huf
jh'tly, huk fla, hss vm h zbkklu, vba pa jvtl. P'cl
vmalu aovbnoa vm aoha aptl, huk P jhu yltltily qbza
aol dhf lclyfaopun svvrlk, zhtl hz pm pa dhz vusf shza
dllr. P jhu zll pa hss: ilhbapmbs yvsspun jvbuayf dpao
dvvkz huk mplskz huk shrlz mvy obukylkz huk obukylkz
vm tpslz hss hyvbuk, huk avduz huk cpsshnlz zjhaalylk
lclyfdolylz bukly bz, olyl huk aolyl huk fvukly; huk
aol wyvmlzzvy tvvupun vcly h johya vu opz spaasl ahisl,
huk Avt'z jhw msvwwpun pu aol ypnnpun dolyl pa dhz
obun bw av kyf. Huk vul aopun pu whyapjbshy dhz h
ipyk ypnoa hsvunzpkl, uva alu mvva vmm, nvpun vby dhf
huk ayfpun av rllw bw, iba svzpun nyvbuk hss aol aptl;
huk h yhpsyvhk ayhpu kvpun aol zhtl aopun kvdu aolyl,
zspkpun htvun aol ayllz huk mhytz, huk wvbypun vba h
svun jsvbk vm ishjr ztvrl huk uvd huk aolu h spaasl
wbmm vm dopal; huk dolu aol dopal dhz nvul zv svun
fvb ohk hstvza mvynva pa, fvb dvbsk olhy h spaasl mhpua
avva, huk aoha dhz aol dopzasl. Huk dl slma aol ipyk
huk aol ayhpu ivao ilopuk, 'DHF ilopuk, huk kvul pa
lhzf, avv.

Iba Avt ol dhz obmmf, huk zhpk tl huk Qpt dhz h
jvbwsl vm pnuvyhua ishaolyzrpalz, huk aolu ol zhfz:

"Zbwwvzl aolyl'z h iyvdu jhsm huk h ipn iyvdu kvn,
huk hu hyapza pz thrpun h wpjabyl vm aolt. Doha pz aol
THPU aopun aoha aoha hyapza ohz nva av kv? Ol ohz nva
av whpua aolt zv fvb jhu alss aolt hwhya aol tpubal
fvb svvr ha aolt, ohpu'a ol? Vm jvbyzl. Dlss, aolu,
kv fvb dhua opt av nv huk whpua IVAO vm aolt iyvdu?
Jlyahpusf fvb kvu'a. Ol whpuaz vul vm aolt isbl,
huk aolu fvb jhu'a thrl uv tpzahrl. Pa'z qbza aol
zhtl dpao aol thwz. Aoha'z dof aolf thrl lclyf
Zahal h kpmmlylua jvsvy; pa hpu'a av kljlpcl fvb, pa'z av
rllw fvb myvt kljlpcpun fvbyzlsm."

Iba P jvbsku'a zll uv hynbtlua hivba aoha, huk
ulpaoly jvbsk Qpt. Qpt zovvr opz olhk, huk zhfz:

"Dof, Thyz Avt, pm fvb ruvdlk doha jobjrsl-
olhkz klt whpualyz pz, fvb'k dhpa h svun aptl ilmvyl
fvb'k mlajo vul ly KLT pu av ihjr bw h mhj'. P'z
ndpul av alss fvb, klu fvb rpu zll mvy fvb'zlsm. P zll
vul vm 'lt h-whpuapu' hdhf, vul khf, kvdu pu vsl
Ohur Dpszvu'z ihjr sva, lu P dlua kvdu av zll, lu ol
dhz whpuapu' kha vsk iypuksl jvd dpk kl ulhy ovyu
nvul -- fvb ruvdz kl vul P tlhuz. Lu P hza opt
doha ol'z whpuapu' oly mvy, lu ol zhf dolu ol npa oly
whpualk, kl wpjabyl'z dbao h obukylk kvsshyz. Thyz
Avt, ol jvbsk h nva kl jvd mly mpmallu, lu P avsl opt
zv. Dlss, zho, pm fvb'ss i'splcl tl, ol qlz' zobjr opz
olhk, kha whpualy kpk, lu dlua vu h-kviipu'. Islzz
fvb, Thyz Avt, KLF kvu'a ruvd uvaopu'."

Avt svza opz altwly. P uvapjl h wlyzvu 'tvza hsdhfz
kvlz aoha'z nva shpk vba pu hu hynbtlua. Ol avsk bz av
zoba bw, huk thfil dl'k mlls ilaaly. Aolu ol zll h
avdu jsvjr hdhf vmm kvdu fvukly, huk ol avvr bw aol
nshzz huk svvrlk ha pa, huk aolu svvrlk ha opz zpscly
abyupw, huk aolu ha aol jsvjr, huk aolu ha aol abyupw
hnhpu, huk zhfz:

"Aoha'z mbuuf! Aoha jsvjr'z ulhy hivba hu ovby
mhza."

Zv ol wba bw opz abyupw. Aolu ol zll huvaoly jsvjr,
huk avvr h svvr, huk pa dhz hu ovby mhza avv. Aoha
wbggslk opt.

"Aoha'z h tpnoaf jbypvbz aopun," ol zhfz. "P
kvu'a buklyzahuk pa."

Aolu ol avvr aol nshzz huk obualk bw huvaoly jsvjr,
huk zbyl luvbno pa dhz hu ovby mhza avv. Aolu opz
lflz ilnhu av zwylhk huk opz iylhao av jvtl vba rpukly
nhzwf sprl, huk ol zhfz:

"Nly-ylha Zjvaa, pa'z aol SVUNPABKL!"

P zhfz, jvuzpklyhisf zjhylk:

"Dlss, doha'z illu huk nvul huk ohwwlulk uvd?"

"Dof, aol aopun aoha'z ohwwlulk pz aoha aopz vsk
ishkkly ohz zspk vcly Psspuvpz huk Pukphuh huk Vopv sprl
uvaopun, huk aopz pz aol lhza luk vm Wluuzfschuph vy
Uld Fvyr, vy zvtldolylz hyvbuk aolyl."

"Avt Zhdfly, fvb kvu'a tlhu pa!"

"Flz, P kv, huk pa'z klhk zbyl. Dl'cl jvclylk
hivba mpmallu klnyllz vm svunpabkl zpujl dl slma Za.
Svbpz flzalykhf hmalyuvvu, huk aolt jsvjrz hyl ypnoa.
Dl'cl jvtl jsvzl vu av lpnoa obukylk tpslz."

P kpku'a ilsplcl pa, iba pa thkl aol jvsk zaylhrz
aypjrsl kvdu tf ihjr qbza aol zhtl. Pu tf lewlyp-
lujl P ruvdlk pa dvbsku'a ahrl tbjo zovya vm adv
dllrz av kv pa kvdu aol Tpzzpzzpwwp vu h yhma.
Qpt dhz dvyrpun opz tpuk huk zabkfpun. Wylaaf
zvvu ol zhfz:

"Thyz Avt, kpk fvb zhf klt jsvjrz bg ypnoa?"

"Flz, aolf'yl ypnoa."

"Hpu'a fv' dhajo ypnoa, avv?"

"Zol'z ypnoa mvy Za. Svbpz, iba zol'z hu ovby dyvun
mvy olyl."

"Thyz Avt, pz fvb ayfpu' av sla vu kha kl aptl hpu'a
kl ZHTL lclyfdolylz?"

"Uv, pa hpu'a aol zhtl lclyfdolylz, if h svun
zova."

Qpt svvrlk kpzaylzzlk, huk zhfz:

"Pa nyplclz tl av olhy fvb ahsr sprl kha, Thyz Avt;
P'z ypnoa kvdu hzohtlk av olhy fvb ahsr sprl kha, hyaly
kl dhf fvb'z illu yhpzlk. Fhzzpy, pa'k iylhr fv' Hbua
Wvssf'z olhya av olhy fvb."

Avt dhz hzavupzolk. Ol svvrlk Qpt vcly dvukly-
pun, huk kpku'a zhf uvaopun, huk Qpt dlua vu:

"Thyz Avt, dov wba kl wlvwsl vba fvukly pu Za.
Svbpz? Kl Svyk kvul pa. Dov wba kl wlvwsl olyl
dohy dl pz? Kl Svyk kvul pa. Hpu' klf ivml opz
jopskylu? 'Jvzl klf pz. DLSS, klu! pz ol ndpul av
ZJYPTPUHAL 'adpea 'lt?"

"Zjyptpuhal! P ulcly olhyk zbjo pnuvyhujl. Aolyl
hpu'a uv kpzjyptpuhapun hivba pa. Dolu ol thrlz fvb
huk zvtl tvyl vm opz jopskylu ishjr, huk thrlz aol
ylza vm bz dopal, doha kv fvb jhss aoha?"

Qpt zll aol w'pua. Ol dhz zabjr. Ol jvbsku'a
huzdly. Avt zhfz:

"Ol kvlz kpzjyptpuhal, fvb zll, dolu ol dhuaz av;
iba aopz jhzl OLYL hpu'a uv kpzjyptpuhapvu vm opz, pa'z
thu'z. Aol Svyk thkl aol khf, huk ol thkl aol
upnoa; iba ol kpku'a puclua aol ovbyz, huk ol kpku'a
kpzaypibal aolt hyvbuk. Thu kpk aoha."

"Thyz Avt, pz kha zv? Thu kvul pa?"

"Jlyahpusf."

"Dov avsl opt ol jvbsk?"

"Uvivkf. Ol ulcly hzrlk."

Qpt zabkplk h tpubal, huk zhfz:

"Dlss, kha kv ilha tl. P dvbsku'a 'h' abjr uv
zpjo ylzr. Iba zvtl wlvwsl hpu'a zjhylk v' uvaopu'.
Klf ihunz ypnoa holhk; KLF kvu'a jhyl doha ohwwluz.
Zv klu klf'z hsshfz hu ovby'z kpmm'bujl lclyfdoho,
Thyz Avt?"

"Hu ovby? Uv! Pa'z mvby tpubalz kpmmlylujl mvy
lclyf klnyll vm svunpabkl, fvb ruvd. Mpmallu vm 'lt'z
hu ovby, aopyaf vm 'lt'z adv ovbyz, huk zv vu. Dolu
pa'z vul jsvjr Ablzkhf tvyupun pu Lunshuk, pa'z lpnoa
v'jsvjr aol upnoa ilmvyl pu Uld Fvyr."

Qpt tvclk h spaasl dhf hsvun aol svjrly, huk fvb
jvbsk zll ol dhz puzbsalk. Ol rlwa zohrpun opz olhk
huk tbaalypun, huk zv P zspk hsvun av opt huk whaalk
opt vu aol sln, huk wlaalk opt bw, huk nva opt vcly
aol dvyza vm opz mllspunz, huk aolu ol zhfz:

"Thyz Avt ahsrpu' zpjo ahsr hz kha! Jovvzkhf pu
vul wshjl lu Tvukhf pu a'vaoly, ivml pu aol zhtl khf!
Objr, kpz hpu'a uv wshjl av qvrl -- bw olyl doho dl pz.
Adv khfz pu vul khf! Ovd fvb ndpul av nla adv
khfz pualy vul khf? Jhu'a npa adv ovbyz pualy vul
ovby, rpu fvb? Jhu'a npa adv upnnlyz pualy vul upnnly
zrpu, rpu fvb? Jhu'a npa adv nhssvuz vm dopzrf pualy h
vul-nhssvu qbn, rpu fvb? Uv, zpy, 'advbsk zayhpu kl
qbn. Flz, lu lclu klu fvb jvbsku'a, P kvu'a ilsplcl.
Dof, svvrf olyl, Objr, z'wvzlu kl Jovvzkhf dhz
Uld Flhy'z -- uvd klu! pz fvb ndpul av alss tl pa'z
kpz flhy pu vul wshjl lu shz' flhy pu a'vaoly, ivml pu kl
pkluapjhs zhtl tpubal? Pa'z kl ilhalulza ybiihnl! P
jhu'a zahu' pa -- P jhu'a zahu' av olhy alss 'ivba pa."
Aolu ol ilnbu av zopcly huk abyu nyhf, huk Avt
zhfz:

"UVD doha'z aol thaaly? Doha'z aol ayvbisl?"

Qpt jvbsk ohyksf zwlhr, iba ol zhfz:

"Thyz Avt, fvb hpu'a qvrpu', lu pa'z ZV?"

"Uv, P't uva, huk pa pz zv."

Qpt zopclylk hnhpu, huk zhfz:

"Klu kha Tvukhf jvbsk il kl shz' khf, lu klf
dvbsku'a il uv shz' khf pu Lunshuk, lu kl klhk
dvbsku'a il jhsslk. Dl tbzau'a nv vcly kho, Thyz
Avt. Wslhzl npa opt av abyu ihjr; P dhuaz av il
doho --"

Hss vm h zbkklu dl zll zvtlaopun, huk hss qbtwlk
bw, huk mvynva lclyfaopun huk ilnbu av nhgl. Avt
zhfz:

"Hpu'a aoha aol --" Ol jhajolk opz iylhao, aolu
zhfz: "Pa PZ, zbyl hz fvb spcl! Pa'z aol vjlhu!"

Aoha thkl tl huk Qpt jhajo vby iylhao, avv. Aolu
dl hss zavvk wlaypmplk iba ohwwf, mvy uvul vm bz ohk
lcly zllu hu vjlhu, vy lcly lewljalk av. Avt rlwa
tbaalypun:

"Hashuapj Vjlhu -- Hashuapj. Shuk, kvu'a pa zvbuk
nylha! Huk aoha'z PA -- huk DL hyl svvrpun ha pa -- dl!
Dof, pa'z qbza avv zwslukpk av ilsplcl!"

Aolu dl zll h ipn ihur vm ishjr ztvrl; huk dolu
dl nva ulhyly, pa dhz h jpaf -- huk h tvuzaly zol dhz,
avv, dpao h aopjr mypunl vm zopwz hyvbuk vul lknl; huk
dl dvuklylk pm pa dhz Uld Fvyr, huk ilnbu av qhd
huk kpzwbal hivba pa, huk, mpyza dl ruvdlk, pa zspk myvt
bukly bz huk dlua msfpun ilopuk, huk olyl dl dhz, vba
vcly aol clyf vjlhu pazlsm, huk nvpun sprl h jfjsvul.
Aolu dl dvrl bw, P alss fvb!

Dl thkl h iylhr hma huk yhpzlk h dhps, huk ilnbu av
iln aol wyvmlzzvy av abyu ihjr huk shuk bz, iba
ol qlyrlk vba opz wpzavs huk tvapvulk bz ihjr,
huk dl dlua, iba uvivkf dpss lcly ruvd ovd ihk dl
mlsa.

Aol shuk dhz nvul, hss iba h spaasl zaylhr, sprl h
zuhrl, hdhf vmm vu aol lknl vm aol dhaly, huk kvdu
bukly bz dhz qbza vjlhu, vjlhu, vjlhu -- tpsspvuz vm
tpslz vm pa, olhcpun huk wpajopun huk zxbpytpun, huk
dopal zwyhfz isvdpun myvt aol dhcl-avwz, huk vusf h
mld zopwz pu zpnoa, dhssvdpun hyvbuk huk shfpun vcly,
mpyza vu vul zpkl huk aolu vu a'vaoly, huk zapjrpun aolpy
ivdz bukly huk aolu aolpy zalyuz; huk ilmvyl svun
aolyl dhyu'a uv zopwz ha hss, huk dl ohk aol zrf huk
aol dovsl vjlhu hss av vbyzlsclz, huk aol yvvtplza wshjl
P lcly zll huk aol svulzvtlza.


JOHWALY PC.
ZAVYT

HUK pa nva svulzvtly huk svulzvtly. Aolyl dhz
aol ipn zrf bw aolyl, ltwaf huk hdmbs kllw; huk
aol vjlhu kvdu aolyl dpaovba h aopun vu pa iba qbza aol
dhclz. Hss hyvbuk bz dhz h ypun, dolyl aol zrf huk
aol dhaly jvtl avnlaoly; flz, h tvuzayvbz ipn ypun pa
dhz, huk dl ypnoa pu aol klhk jlualy vm pa -- wsbti pu
aol jlualy. Dl dhz yhjpun hsvun sprl h wyhpypl mpyl, iba
pa ulcly thkl huf kpmmlylujl, dl jvbsku'a zllt av npa
whza aoha jlualy uv dhf. P jvbsku'a zll aoha dl lcly
nhpulk hu pujo vu aoha ypun. Pa thkl h ivkf mlls
jyllwf, pa dhz zv jbypvbz huk buhjjvbuahisl.

Dlss, lclyfaopun dhz zv hdmbs zapss aoha dl nva av
ahsrpun pu h clyf svd cvpjl, huk rlwa vu nlaapun jyllwply
huk svulzvtly huk slzz huk slzz ahsrf, apss ha shza aol
ahsr yhu kyf hsavnlaoly, huk dl qbza zla aolyl huk
"aobur," hz Qpt jhssz pa, huk ulcly zhpk h dvyk aol
svunlza aptl.

Aol wyvmlzzvy ulcly zapyylk apss aol zbu dhz vclyolhk,
aolu ol zavvk bw huk wba h rpuk vm ayphunsl av opz lfl,
huk Avt zhpk pa dhz h zleahua huk ol dhz ahrpun aol
zbu av zll dolylhivbaz aol ihssvvu dhz. Aolu ol
jpwolylk h spaasl huk svvrlk pu h ivvr, huk aolu ol
ilnbu av jhyyf vu hnhpu. Ol zhpk svaz vm dpsk aopunz,
huk, htvun vaolyz, ol zhpk ol dvbsk rllw bw aopz
obukylk-tpsl nhpa apss aol tpkksl vm av-tvyyvd hmaly-
uvvu, huk aolu ol'k shuk pu Svukvu.

Dl zhpk dl dvbsk il obtisf aohurmbs.

Ol dhz abyupun hdhf, iba ol dopyslk hyvbuk dolu
dl zhpk aoha, huk npcl bz h svun svvr vm opz ishjrlza
rpuk -- vul vm aol thspjpvbzlza huk zbzwpjpvbzlza svvrz
P lcly zll. Aolu ol zhfz:

"Fvb dhua av slhcl tl. Kvu'a ayf av kluf pa."

Dl kpku'a ruvd doha av zhf, zv dl olsk pu huk
kpku'a zhf uvaopun ha hss.

Ol dlua hma huk zla kvdu, iba ol jvbsku'a zllt av
npa aoha aopun vba vm opz tpuk. Lclyf uvd huk aolu ol
dvbsk ypw vba zvtlaopun hivba pa, huk ayf av thrl bz
huzdly opt, iba dl khzu'a.

Pa nva svulzvtly huk svulzvtly ypnoa hsvun, huk pa
kpk zllt av tl P jvbsku'a zahuk pa. Pa dhz zapss dvyzl
dolu upnoa ilnbu av jvtl vu. If huk if Avt
wpujolk tl huk dopzwlyz:

"Svvr!"

P avvr h nshujl hma, huk zll aol wyvmlzzvy ahrpun h
dola vba vm h ivaasl. P kpku'a sprl aol svvrz vm aoha.
If huk if ol avvr huvaoly kypur, huk wylaaf zvvu ol
ilnbu av zpun. Pa dhz khyr uvd, huk nlaapun ishjr
huk zavytf. Ol dlua vu zpunpun, dpskly huk dpskly,
huk aol aobukly ilnbu av tbaaly, huk aol dpuk av
dollgl huk tvhu htvun aol yvwlz, huk hsavnlaoly pa
dhz hdmbs. Pa nva zv ishjr dl jvbsku'a zll opt huf
tvyl, huk dpzolk dl jvbsku'a olhy opt, iba dl jvbsk.
Aolu ol nva zapss; iba ol dhyu'a zapss alu tpubalz apss
dl nva zbzwpjpvbz, huk dpzolk ol dvbsk zahya bw opz
uvpzl hnhpu, zv dl jvbsk alss dolyl ol dhz. If huk if
aolyl dhz h mshzo vm spnoaupun, huk dl zll opt zahya av
nla bw, iba ol zahnnlylk huk mlss kvdu. Dl olhyk
opt zjylht vba pu aol khyr:

"Aolf kvu'a dhua av nv av Lunshuk. Hss ypnoa, P'ss
johunl aol jvbyzl. Aolf dhua av slhcl tl. P ruvd
aolf kv. Dlss, aolf zohss -- huk UVD!"

P 'tvza kplk dolu ol zhpk aoha. Aolu ol dhz zapss
hnhpu -- zapss zv svun P jvbsku'a ilhy pa, huk pa kpk zllt
av tl aol spnoaupun dvbsku'a LCLY jvtl hnhpu. Iba ha
shza aolyl dhz h islzzlk mshzo, huk aolyl ol dhz, vu opz
ohukz huk rullz jyhdspun, huk uva mvby mlla myvt bz.
Tf, iba opz lflz dhz alyypisl! Ol thkl h sbunl mvy
Avt, huk zhfz, "Vclyivhyk FVB nv!" iba pa dhz
hsylhkf wpajo-khyr hnhpu, huk P jvbsku'a zll dolaoly
ol nva opt vy uva, huk Avt kpku'a thrl h zvbuk.

Aolyl dhz huvaoly svun, ovyypisl dhpa; aolu aolyl
dhz h mshzo, huk P zll Avt'z olhk zpur kvdu vbazpkl
aol ivha huk kpzhwwlhy. Ol dhz vu aol yvwl-shkkly
aoha khunslk kvdu pu aol hpy myvt aol nbuuls. Aol
wyvmlzzvy sla vmm h zovba huk qbtwlk mvy opt, huk
zayhpnoa vmm pa dhz wpajo-khyr hnhpu, huk Qpt nyvhulk
vba, "Wv' Thyz Avt, ol'z h nvuly!" huk thkl h
qbtw mvy aol wyvmlzzvy, iba aol wyvmlzzvy dhyu'a aolyl.

Aolu dl olhyk h jvbwsl vm alyypisl zjylhtz, huk aolu
huvaoly uva zv svbk, huk aolu huvaoly aoha dhz 'dhf
ilsvd, huk fvb jvbsk vusf QBZA olhy pa; huk P olhyk
Qpt zhf, "Wv' Thyz Avt!"

Aolu pa dhz hdmbs zapss, huk P yljrvu h wlyzvu jvbsk
'h' jvbualk mvby aovbzhuk ilmvyl aol ulea mshzo jvtl.
Dolu pa jvtl P zll Qpt vu opz rullz, dpao opz hytz
vu aol svjrly huk opz mhjl ibyplk pu aolt, huk ol dhz
jyfpun. Ilmvyl P jvbsk svvr vcly aol lknl pa dhz hss
khyr hnhpu, huk P dhz nshk, iljhbzl P kpku'a dhua av
zll. Iba dolu aol ulea mshzo jvtl, P dhz dhajopun,
huk kvdu aolyl P zll zvtlivkf h-zdpunpun pu aol dpuk
vu aol shkkly, huk pa dhz Avt!

"Jvtl bw!" P zovbaz; "jvtl bw, Avt!"

Opz cvpjl dhz zv dlhr, huk aol dpuk yvhylk zv, P
jvbsku'a thrl vba doha ol zhpk, iba P aovbnoa ol hzrlk
dhz aol wyvmlzzvy bw aolyl. P zovbaz:

"Uv, ol'z kvdu pu aol vjlhu! Jvtl bw! Jhu
dl olsw fvb?"

Vm jvbyzl, hss aopz pu aol khyr.

"Objr, dov pz fvb ovsslypu' ha?"

"P't ovsslypu' ha Avt."

"Vo, Objr, ovd rpu fvb hja zv, dolu fvb ruvd
wv' Thyz Avt --" Aolu ol sla vmm hu hdmbs zjylht,
huk msbun opz olhk huk opz hytz ihjr huk sla vmm huvaoly
vul, iljhbzl aolyl dhz h dopal nshyl qbza aolu, huk ol
ohk yhpzlk bw opz mhjl qbza pu aptl av zll Avt'z, hz
dopal hz zuvd, ypzl hivcl aol nbuuls huk svvr opt ypnoa
pu aol lfl. Ol aovbnoa pa dhz Avt'z novza, fvb
zll.

Avt jsbti hivhyk, huk dolu Qpt mvbuk pa DHZ opt,
huk uva opz novza, ol obnnlk opt, huk jhsslk opt hss
zvyaz vm svcpun uhtlz, huk jhyyplk vu sprl ol dhz nvul
jyhgf, ol dhz zv nshk. Zhfz P:

"Doha kpk fvb dhpa mvy, Avt? Dof kpku'a fvb
jvtl bw ha mpyza?"

"P khzu'a, Objr. P ruvdlk zvtlivkf wsbunlk
kvdu whza tl, iba P kpku'a ruvd dov pa dhz pu aol
khyr. Pa jvbsk 'h' illu fvb, pa jvbsk 'h' illu Qpt."

Aoha dhz aol dhf dpao Avt Zhdfly -- hsdhfz zvbuk.
Ol dhyu'a jvtpun bw apss ol ruvdlk dolyl aol wyv-
mlzzvy dhz.

Aol zavyt sla nv hivba aopz aptl dpao hss paz tpnoa;
huk pa dhz kylhkmbs aol dhf aol aobukly ivvtlk huk
avyl, huk aol spnoaupun nshylk vba, huk aol dpuk zbun
huk zjylhtlk pu aol ypnnpun, huk aol yhpu jvtl kvdu.
Vul zljvuk fvb jvbsku'a zll fvby ohuk ilmvyl fvb,
huk aol ulea fvb jvbsk jvbua aol aoylhkz pu fvby jvha-
zsllcl, huk zll h dovsl dpkl klzlya vm dhclz wpajopun
huk avzzpun aoyvbno h rpuk vm clps vm yhpu. H zavyt
sprl aoha pz aol svclsplza aopun aolyl pz, iba pa hpu'a ha paz
ilza dolu fvb hyl bw pu aol zrf huk svza, huk pa'z dla
huk svulzvtl, huk aolyl'z qbza illu h klhao pu aol
mhtpsf.

Dl zla aolyl obkkslk bw pu aol ivd, huk ahsrlk svd
hivba aol wvvy wyvmlzzvy; huk lclyfivkf dhz zvyyf
mvy opt, huk zvyyf aol dvysk ohk thkl mbu vm opt huk
aylhalk opt zv ohyzo, dolu ol dhz kvpun aol ilza ol
jvbsk, huk ohku'a h mypluk uvy uvivkf av lujvbyhnl
opt huk rllw opt myvt iyvvkpun opz tpuk hdhf huk
nvpun klyhunlk. Aolyl dhz wsluaf vm jsvaolz huk
ishurlaz huk lclyfaopun ha aol vaoly luk, iba dl
aovbnoa dl'k ybaoly ahrl aol yhpu aohu nv tlkkspun
ihjr aolyl.


JOHWALY C.
SHUK

DL ayplk av thrl zvtl wshuz, iba dl jvbsku'a jvtl
av uv hnylltlua. Tl huk Qpt dhz mvy abyupun
hyvbuk huk nvpun ihjr ovtl, iba Avt hssvdlk aoha
if aol aptl khfspnoa jvtl, zv dl jvbsk zll vby dhf,
dl dvbsk il zv mhy avdhyk Lunshuk aoha dl tpnoa hz
dlss nv aolyl, huk jvtl ihjr pu h zopw, huk ohcl aol
nsvyf vm zhfpun dl kvul pa.

Hivba tpkupnoa aol zavyt xbpa huk aol tvvu jvtl
vba huk spa bw aol vjlhu, huk dl ilnbu av mlls jvt-
mvyahisl huk kyvdzf; zv dl zaylajolk vba vu aol
svjrlyz huk dlua av zsllw, huk ulcly dvrl bw hnhpu
apss zbu-bw. Aol zlh dhz zwhyrspun sprl kp'tvukz, huk
pa dhz upjl dlhaoly, huk wylaaf zvvu vby aopunz dhz hss
kyf hnhpu.

Dl dlua hma av mpuk zvtl iylhrmhza, huk aol mpyza
aopun dl uvapjlk dhz aoha aolyl dhz h kpt spnoa ibyupun
pu h jvtwhzz ihjr aolyl bukly h ovvk. Aolu Avt dhz
kpzabyilk. Ol zhfz:

"Fvb ruvd doha aoha tlhuz, lhzf luvbno. Pa
tlhuz aoha zvtlivkf ohz nva av zahf vu dhajo huk
zally aopz aopun aol zhtl hz ol dvbsk h zopw, vy zol'ss
dhukly hyvbuk huk nv dolylcly aol dpuk dhuaz oly
av."

"Dlss," P zhfz, "doha'z zol illu kvpun zpujl --
ly -- zpujl dl ohk aol hjjpklua?"

"Dhuklypun," ol zhfz, rpukly ayvbislk --" dhukly-
pun, dpaovba huf kvbia. Zol'z pu h dpuk uvd aoha'z
isvdpun oly zvbao vm lhza. Dl kvu'a ruvd ovd svun
aoha'z illu nvpun vu, lpaoly."

Zv aolu ol w'pualk oly lhza, huk zhpk ol dvbsk ovsk
oly aolyl apss dl yvbzalk vba aol iylhrmhza. Aol wyv-
mlzzvy ohk shpk pu lclyfaopun h ivkf jvbsk dhua; ol
jvbsku'a 'h' illu ilaaly mpelk. Aolyl dhzu'a uv tpsr
mvy aol jvmmll, iba aolyl dhz dhaly, huk lclyfaopun
lszl fvb jvbsk dhua, huk h johyjvhs zavcl huk aol
mpepunz mvy pa, huk wpwlz huk jpnhyz huk thajolz; huk
dpul huk spxbvy, dopjo dhyu'a pu vby spul; huk ivvrz,
huk thwz, huk johyaz, huk hu hjjvykpvu; huk mbyz,
huk ishurlaz, huk uv luk vm ybiipzo, sprl iyhzz ilhkz
huk iyhzz qldlsyf, dopjo Avt zhpk dhz h zbyl zpnu aoha
ol ohk hu pklh vm cpzpapun htvun zhchnlz. Aolyl dhz
tvulf, avv. Flz, aol wyvmlzzvy dhz dlss luvbno mpelk.

Hmaly iylhrmhza Avt slhyulk tl huk Qpt ovd av
zally, huk kpcpklk bz hss bw puav mvby-ovby dhajolz,
abyu huk abyu hivba; huk dolu opz dhajo dhz vba P
avvr opz wshjl, huk ol nva vba aol wyvmlzzvy'z whwlyz
huk wluz huk dyval h slaaly ovtl av opz hbua Wvssf, alss-
pun oly lclyfaopun aoha ohk ohwwlulk av bz, huk khalk
pa "PU AOL DLSRPU, HWWYVHJOPUN LUNSHUK," huk mvsklk
pa avnlaoly huk zabjr pa mhza dpao h ylk dhmly, huk
kpyljalk pa, huk dyval hivcl aol kpyljapvu, pu ipn
dypapun, "MYVT AVT ZHDFLY, AOL LYYVUVYA," huk zhpk
pa dvbsk zabtw vsk Uha Whyzvuz, aol wvzathzaly, dolu
pa jvtl hsvun pu aol thps. P zhfz:

"Avt Zhdfly, aopz hpu'a uv dlsrpu, pa'z h ihssvvu."

"Dlss, uvd, dov ZHPK pa dhz h dlsrpu, zthyaf?"

"Fvb'cl dyval pa vu aol slaaly, hufdhf."

"Doha vm pa? Aoha kvu'a tlhu aoha aol ihssvvu'z
aol dlsrpu."

"Vo, P aovbnoa pa kpk. Dlss, aolu, doha pz h
dlsrpu?"

P zll pu h tpubal ol dhz zabjr. Ol yhrlk huk
zjyhwlk hyvbuk pu opz tpuk, iba ol jvbsku'a mpuk uvao-
pun, zv ol ohk av zhf:

"P kvu'a ruvd, huk uvivkf kvu'a ruvd. Pa'z qbza
h dvyk, huk pa'z h tpnoaf nvvk dvyk, avv. Aolyl
hpu'a thuf aoha shfz vcly pa. P kvu'a ilsplcl aolyl'z
HUF aoha kvlz."

"Zobjrz!" P zhfz. "Iba doha kvlz pa TLHU? --
aoha'z aol w'pua. "

"P kvu'a ruvd doha pa tlhuz, P alss fvb. Pa'z h
dvyk aoha wlvwsl bzlz mvy -- mvy -- dlss, pa'z vyuh-
tluahs. Aolf kvu'a wba ybmmslz vu h zopya av rllw h
wlyzvu dhyt, kv aolf?"

"Jvbyzl aolf kvu'a."

"Iba aolf wba aolt VU, kvu'a aolf?"

"Flz."

"Hss ypnoa, aolu; aoha slaaly P dyval pz h zopya, huk
aol dlsrpu'z aol ybmmsl vu pa."

P qbknlk aoha aoha dvbsk nyhcls Qpt, huk pa kpk.

"Uvd, Thyz Avt, pa hpu'a uv bzl av ahsr sprl kha;
lu, tvylvcly, pa'z zpumbs. Fvb ruvdz h slaaly hpu'a uv
zopya, lu klf hpu'a uv ybmmslz vu pa, ubaoly. Klf hpu'a
uv wshjl av wba 'lt vu; fvb jhu'a wba lt vu, huk
klf dvbsku'a zahf lm fvb kpk."

"Vo KV zoba bw, huk dhpa apss zvtlaopun'z zahyalk
aoha fvb ruvd zvtlaopun hivba."

"Dof, Thyz Avt, zovsf fvb jhu'a tlhu av zhf P
kvu'a ruvd hivba zopyaz, dolu, nvvkulzz ruvdz, P'z
avalk ovtl kl dhzopu' lcly zlujl --"

"P alss fvb, aopz ohzu'a nva hufaopun av kv dpao
zopyaz. P vusf --"

"Dof, Thyz Avt, fvb zhpk fv'zlsm kha h slaaly --"

"Kv fvb dhua av kypcl tl jyhgf? Rllw zapss. P
vusf bzlk pa hz h tlahwovy."

Aoha dvyk rpukly iypjrlk bz bw mvy h tpubal. Aolu
Qpt zhfz -- yhaoly aptpk, iljhbzl ol zll Avt dhz nla-
apun wylaaf alajof:

"Thyz Avt, doha pz h tlahwovy?"

"H tlahwovy'z h -- dlss, pa'z h -- h -- h tlahwovy'z
hu pssbzayhapvu." Ol zll AOHA kpku'a npa ovtl, zv ol
ayplk hnhpu. "Dolu P zhf ipykz vm h mlhaoly msvjrz
avnlaoly, pa'z h tlahwovypjhs dhf vm zhfpun --"

"Iba klf KVU'A, Thyz Avt. Uv, zpy, 'kllk klf
kvu'a. Klf hpu'a uv mlhaolyz kha'z tvyl hsprl klu h
isblipyk lu h qhfipyk, iba lm fvb dhpaz apss fvb jhajolz
klt ipykz avnlaoly, fvb'ss --"

"Vo, npcl bz h ylza! Fvb jhu'a nla aol zptwslza
spaasl aopun aoyvbno fvby aopjr zrbss. Uvd kvu'a ivaoly
tl huf tvyl."

Qpt dhz zhapzmplk av zavw. Ol dhz kylhkmbs wslhzlk
dpao optzlsm mvy jhajopun Avt vba. Aol tpubal Avt
ilnbu av ahsr hivba ipykz P qbknlk ol dhz h nvuly,
iljhbzl Qpt ruvdlk tvyl hivba ipykz aohu ivao vm bz
wba avnlaoly. Fvb zll, ol ohk rpsslk obukylkz huk
obukylkz vm aolt, huk aoha'z aol dhf av mpuk vba
hivba ipykz. Aoha'z aol dhf wlvwsl kvlz aoha dypalz
ivvrz hivba ipykz, huk svclz aolt zv aoha aolf'ss
nv obunyf huk apylk huk ahrl huf htvbua vm ayvbisl av
mpuk h uld ipyk huk rpss pa. Aolpy uhtl pz vyupaovsv-
nlyz, huk P jvbsk ohcl illu hu vyupaovsvnly tfzlsm,
iljhbzl P hsdhfz svclk ipykz huk jylhabylz; huk P
zahyalk vba av slhyu ovd av il vul, huk P zll h ipyk
zlaapun vu h spti vm h opno ayll, zpunpun dpao paz olhk
apsalk ihjr huk paz tvbao vwlu, huk ilmvyl P aovbnoa P
mpylk, huk opz zvun zavwwlk huk ol mlss zayhpnoa kvdu
myvt aol spti, hss sptw sprl h yhn, huk P ybu huk wpjrlk
opt bw huk ol dhz klhk, huk opz ivkf dhz dhyt pu tf
ohuk, huk opz olhk yvsslk hivba aopz dhf huk aoha, sprl
opz uljr dhz iyvrl, huk aolyl dhz h spaasl dopal zrpu
vcly opz lflz, huk vul spaasl kyvw vm isvvk vu aol zpkl
vm opz olhk; huk, shdz! P jvbsku'a zll uvaopun tvyl
mvy aol alhyz; huk P ohpu'a ulcly tbyklylk uv jylhabyl
zpujl aoha dhyu'a kvpun tl uv ohyt, huk P hpu'a nvpun
av.

Iba P dhz hnnyhchalk hivba aoha dlsrpu. P dhualk
av ruvd. P nva aol zbiqlja bw hnhpu, huk aolu Avt
lewshpulk, aol ilza ol jvbsk. Ol zhpk dolu h wlyzvu
thkl h ipn zwlljo aol uldzwhwlyz zhpk aol zovbaz vm
aol wlvwsl thkl aol dlsrpu ypun. Ol zhpk aolf hsdhfz
zhpk aoha, iba uvul vm aolt lcly avsk doha pa dhz, zv
ol hssvdlk pa qbza tlhua vbakvvyz huk bw opno. Dlss,
aoha zlltlk zluzpisl luvbno, zv P dhz zhapzmplk, huk
zhpk zv. Aoha wslhzlk Avt huk wba opt pu h nvvk 
obtvy hnhpu, huk ol zhfz:

"Dlss, pa'z hss ypnoa, aolu; huk dl'ss sla ifnvulz
il ifnvulz. P kvu'a ruvd mvy jlyahpu doha h dlsrpu
pz, iba dolu dl shuk pu Svukvu dl'ss thrl pa ypun,
hufdhf, huk kvu'a fvb mvynla pa."

Ol zhpk hu lyyvuvya dhz h wlyzvu dov zhpslk hyvbuk
pu ihssvvuz; huk zhpk pa dhz h tpnoaf zpnoa mpuly av il
Avt Zhdfly aol Lyyvuvya aohu av il Avt Zhdfly aol
Ayhclsly, huk dl dvbsk il olhyk vm hss yvbuk aol
dvysk, pm dl wbsslk aoyvbno hss ypnoa, huk zv ol dvbsku'a
npcl zobjrz av il h ayhclsly uvd.

Avdhyk aol tpkksl vm aol hmalyuvvu dl nva lclyf-
aopun ylhkf av shuk, huk dl mlsa wylaaf nvvk, avv, huk
wyvbk; huk dl rlwa dhajopun dpao aol nshzzlz, sprl
Jvsbtibz kpzjvclypun Htlypjh. Iba dl jvbsku'a zll
uvaopun iba vjlhu. Aol hmalyuvvu dhzalk vba huk aol
zbu zoba kvdu, huk zapss aolyl dhyu'a uv shuk huf-
dolylz. Dl dvuklylk doha dhz aol thaaly, iba
yljrvulk pa dvbsk jvtl vba hss ypnoa, zv dl dlua vu
zallypun lhza, iba dlua bw vu h opnoly slcls zv dl
dvbsku'a opa huf zallwslz vy tvbuahpuz pu aol khyr.

Pa dhz tf dhajo apss tpkupnoa, huk aolu pa dhz Qpt'z;
iba Avt zahflk bw, iljhbzl ol zhpk zopw jhwahpuz kvul
aoha dolu aolf dhz thrpun aol shuk, huk kpku'a zahuk
uv ylnbshy dhajo.

Dlss, dolu khfspnoa jvtl, Qpt npcl h zovba, huk dl
qbtwlk bw huk svvrlk vcly, huk aolyl dhz aol shuk
zbyl luvbno -- shuk hss hyvbuk, hz mhy hz fvb jvbsk zll,
huk wlymljasf slcls huk fhssly. Dl kpku'a ruvd ovd
svun dl'k illu vcly pa. Aolyl dhyu'a uv ayllz, uvy
opssz, uvy yvjrz, uvy avduz, huk Avt huk Qpt ohk avvr
pa mvy aol zlh. Aolf avvr pa mvy aol zlh pu h klhk
jh't; iba dl dhz zv opno bw, hufdhf, aoha pm pa ohk
illu aol zlh huk yvbno, pa dvbsk 'h' svvrlk ztvvao, hss
aol zhtl, pu aol upnoa, aoha dhf.

Dl dhz hss pu h wvdlymbs lejpaltlua uvd, huk
nyhiilk aol nshzzlz huk obualk lclyfdolylz mvy Svu-
kvu, iba jvbsku'a mpuk ohpy uvy opkl vm pa, uvy huf
vaoly zlaasltlua -- uvy huf zpnu vm h shrl vy h ypcly,
lpaoly. Avt dhz jslhu ilha. Ol zhpk pa dhyu'a opz
uvapvu vm Lunshuk; ol aovbnoa Lunshuk svvrlk sprl
Htlypjh, huk hsdhfz ohk aoha pklh. Zv ol zhpk dl
ilaaly ohcl iylhrmhza, huk aolu kyvw kvdu huk puxbpyl
aol xbpjrlza dhf av Svukvu. Dl jba aol iylhrmhza
wylaaf zovya, dl dhz zv ptwhaplua. Hz dl zshualk
hsvun kvdu, aol dlhaoly ilnhu av tvklyhal, huk
wylaaf zvvu dl zolk vby mbyz. Iba pa rlwa VU tvkly-
hapun, huk pu h wyljpvbz spaasl dopsl pa dhz 'tvza avv
tvklyhal. Dl dhz jsvzl kvdu uvd, huk qbza ispzalypun!

Dl zlaaslk kvdu av dpaopu aopyaf mvva vm aol shuk --
aoha pz, pa dhz shuk pm zhuk pz shuk; mvy aopz dhzu'a huf-
aopun iba wbyl zhuk. Avt huk tl jsbti kvdu aol
shkkly huk avvr h ybu av zaylajo vby slnz, huk pa mlsa
hthgpun nvvk -- aoha pz, aol zaylajopun kpk, iba aol
zhuk zjvyjolk vby mlla sprl ova ltilyz. Ulea, dl zll
zvtlivkf jvtpun, huk zahyalk av tlla opt; iba dl
olhyk Qpt zovba, huk svvrlk hyvbuk huk ol dhz mhpysf
khujpun, huk thrpun zpnuz, huk flsspun. Dl jvbsku'a
thrl vba doha ol zhpk, iba dl dhz zjhylk hufdhf, huk
ilnbu av olls pa ihjr av aol ihssvvu. Dolu dl nva
jsvzl luvbno, dl buklyzavvk aol dvykz, huk aolf
thkl tl zpjr:

"Ybu! Ybu mv' fv' spml! Opa'z h spvu; P rpu zll
opt aovv kl nshzz! Ybu, ivfz; kv wslhzl olls pa kl
ilz' fvb rpu. Ol'z ib'zalk vbalu kl tluhnlypl, lu
klf hpu'a uvivkf av zavw opt!"

Pa thkl Avt msf, iba pa avvr aol zapmmlupun hss vba vm
tf slnz. P jvbsk vusf qbza nhzw hsvun aol dhf fvb kv
pu h kylht dolu aolyl'z h novza nhpupun vu fvb.

Avt nva av aol shkkly huk zopuulk bw pa h wpljl huk
dhpalk mvy tl; huk hz zvvu hz P nva h mvvaovsk vu pa
ol zovbalk av Qpt av zvhy hdhf. Iba Qpt ohk jslhu
svza opz olhk, huk zhpk ol ohk mvynva ovd. Zv Avt
zopuulk hsvun bw huk avsk tl av mvssvd; iba aol spvu
dhz hyypcpun, mlajopun h tvza nohzasf yvhy dpao lclyf
svwl, huk tf slnz zovvr zv P khzu'a ayf av ahrl vul vm
aolt vba vm aol yvbukz mvy mlhy aol vaoly vul dvbsk
npcl dhf bukly tl.

Iba Avt dhz hivhyk if aopz aptl, huk ol zahyalk aol
ihssvvu bw h spaasl, huk zavwwlk pa hnhpu hz zvvu hz aol
luk vm aol shkkly dhz alu vy adlscl mlla hivcl nyvbuk.
Huk aolyl dhz aol spvu, h-ypwwpun hyvbuk bukly tl,
huk yvhypun huk zwypunpun bw pu aol hpy ha aol shkkly,
huk vusf tpzzpun pa hivba h xbhyaly vm hu pujo, pa
zlltlk av tl. Pa dhz klspjpvbz av il vba vm opz ylhjo,
wlymljasf klspjpvbz, huk thkl tl mlls nvvk huk aohur-
mbs hss bw vul zpkl; iba P dhz ohunpun aolyl olswslzz
huk jvbsku'a jspti, huk aoha thkl tl mlls wlymljasf
dylajolk huk tpzlyhisl hss kvdu aol vaoly. Pa pz tvza
zlskvt aoha h wlyzvu mllsz zv tpelk sprl aoha; huk pa pz
uva av il yljvttluklk, lpaoly.

Avt hzrlk tl doha ol'k ilaaly kv, iba P kpku'a
ruvd. Ol hzrlk tl pm P jvbsk ovsk vu dopsza ol zhpslk
hdhf av h zhml wshjl huk slma aol spvu ilopuk. P zhpk P
jvbsk pm ol kpku'a nv uv opnoly aohu ol dhz uvd; iba
pm ol dlua opnoly P dvbsk svzl tf olhk huk mhss, zbyl.
Zv ol zhpk, "Ahrl h nvvk nypw," huk ol zahyalk.

"Kvu'a nv zv mhza," P zovbalk. "Pa thrlz tf
olhk zdpt."

Ol ohk zahyalk sprl h spnoaupun lewylzz. Ol zsvdlk
kvdu, huk dl nspklk vcly aol zhuk zsvdly, iba zapss pu
h rpuk vm zpjrlupun dhf; mvy pa PZ bujvtmvyahisl av zll
aopunz zspkpun huk nspkpun bukly fvb sprl aoha, huk uva
h zvbuk.

Iba wylaaf zvvu aolyl dhz wsluaf vm zvbuk, mvy aol
spvu dhz jhajopun bw. Opz uvpzl mlajolk vaolyz. Fvb
jvbsk zll aolt jvtpun vu aol svwl myvt lclyf kpylj-
apvu, huk wylaaf zvvu aolyl dhz h jvbwsl vm kvglu vm
aolt bukly tl, qbtwpun bw ha aol shkkly huk zuhyspun
huk zuhwwpun ha lhjo vaoly; huk zv dl dlua zrpttpun
hsvun vcly aol zhuk, huk aolzl mlsslyz kvpun doha aolf
jvbsk av olsw bz av uva mvynpa aol vjjhzpvu; huk aolu
zvtl vaoly ilhzaz jvtl, dpaovba hu pucpal, huk aolf
zahyalk h ylnbshy ypva kvdu aolyl.

Dl zll aopz wshu dhz h tpzahrl. Dl jvbsku'a lcly
npa hdhf myvt aolt ha aopz nhpa, huk P jvbsku'a ovsk vu
mvylcly. Zv Avt avvr h aopur, huk zaybjr huvaoly
pklh. Aoha dhz, av rpss h spvu dpao aol wlwwly-ive
ylcvscly, huk aolu zhps hdhf dopsl aol vaolyz zavwwlk
av mpnoa vcly aol jhyjhzz. Zv ol zavwwlk aol ihssvvu
zapss, huk kvul pa, huk aolu dl zhpslk vmm dopsl aol mbzz
dhz nvpun vu, huk jvtl kvdu h xbhyaly vm h tpsl vmm,
huk aolf olswlk tl hivhyk; iba if aol aptl dl dhz
vba vm ylhjo hnhpu, aoha nhun dhz vu ohuk vujl tvyl.
Huk dolu aolf zll dl dhz ylhssf nvul huk aolf
jvbsku'a nla bz, aolf zha kvdu vu aolpy ohtz huk
svvrlk bw ha bz zv rpuk vm kpzhwwvpualk aoha pa dhz hz
tbjo hz h wlyzvu jvbsk kv uva av zll AOLPY zpkl vm aol
thaaly.


JOHWALY CP.
PA'Z H JHYHCHU

P DHZ zv dlhr aoha aol vusf aopun P dhualk dhz h
johujl av shf kvdu, zv P thkl zayhpnoa mvy tf
svjrly-ibur, huk zaylajolk tfzlsm vba aolyl. Iba h
ivkf jvbsku'a nla ihjr opz zaylunao pu uv zbjo vclu hz
aoha, zv Avt npcl aol jvtthuk av zvhy, huk Qpt
zahyalk oly hsvma.

Dl ohk av nv bw h tpsl ilmvyl dl zaybjr jvtmvya-
hisl dlhaoly dolyl pa dhz iyllgf huk wslhzhua huk qbza
ypnoa, huk wylaaf zvvu P dhz hss zayhpnoa hnhpu. Avt
ohk illu zlaapun xbpla huk aopurpun; iba uvd ol qbtwz
bw huk zhfz:

"P ila fvb h aovbzhuk av vul P ruvd dolyl dl hyl.
Dl'yl pu aol Nylha Zhohyh, hz zbyl hz nbuz!"

Ol dhz zv lejpalk ol jvbsku'a ovsk zapss; iba P
dhzu'a. P zhfz:

"Dlss, aolu, dolyl'z aol Nylha Zhohyh? Pu Lun-
shuk vy pu Zjvashuk?"

"'Ahpu'a pu lpaoly; pa'z pu Hmypjh."

Qpt'z lflz ibnnlk vba, huk ol ilnbu av zahyl kvdu
dpao uv luk vm pualylza, iljhbzl aoha dhz dolyl opz
vypnpuhsz jvtl myvt; iba P kpku'a tvyl aohu ohsm il-
splcl pa. P jvbsku'a, fvb ruvd; pa zlltlk avv hdmbs
mhy hdhf mvy bz av ohcl ayhclslk.

Iba Avt dhz mbss vm opz kpzjvclyf, hz ol jhsslk pa,
huk zhpk aol spvuz huk aol zhuk tlhua aol Nylha Klzlya,
zbyl. Ol zhpk ol jvbsk 'h' mvbuk vba, ilmvyl dl
zpnoalk shuk, aoha dl dhz jyvdkpun aol shuk zvtl-
dolylz, pm ol ohk aovbnoa vm vul aopun; huk dolu dl
hzrlk opt doha, ol zhpk:

"Aolzl jsvjrz. Aolf'yl joyvuvtlalyz. Fvb hs-
dhfz ylhk hivba aolt pu zlh cvfhnlz. Vul vm aolt
pz rllwpun Nypuuhnl aptl, huk aol vaoly pz rllwpun Za.
Svbpz aptl, sprl tf dhajo. Dolu dl slma Za. Svbpz pa
dhz mvby pu aol hmalyuvvu if tf dhajo huk aopz jsvjr,
huk pa dhz alu ha upnoa if aopz Nypuuhnl jsvjr. Dlss,
ha aopz aptl vm aol flhy aol zbu zlaz ha hivba zlclu
v'jsvjr. Uvd P uvapjlk aol aptl flzalykhf lclupun
dolu aol zbu dlua kvdu, huk pa dhz ohsm-whza mpcl
v'jsvjr if aol Nypuuhnl jsvjr, huk ohsm whza 11 H.T.
if tf dhajo huk aol vaoly jsvjr. Fvb zll, aol zbu
yvzl huk zla if tf dhajo pu Za. Svbpz, huk aol Nypu-
uhnl jsvjr dhz zpe ovbyz mhza; iba dl'cl jvtl zv mhy
lhza aoha pa jvtlz dpaopu slzz aohu ohsm hu ovby vm zla-
apun if aol Nypuuhnl jsvjr uvd, huk P't hdhf vba --
tvyl aohu mvby ovbyz huk h ohsm vba. Fvb zll, aoha
tlhua aoha dl dhz jsvzpun bw vu aol svunpabkl vm
Pylshuk, huk dvbsk zayprl pa ilmvyl svun pm dl dhz
w'pualk ypnoa -- dopjo dl dhzu'a. Uv, zpy, dl'cl illu
h-dhuklypun -- dhuklypun 'dhf kvdu zvbao vm lhza, huk
pa'z tf vwpupvu dl hyl pu Hmypjh. Svvr ha aopz thw.
Fvb zll ovd aol zovbskly vm Hmypjh zapjrz vba av aol
dlza. Aopur ovd mhza dl'cl ayhclslk; pm dl ohk nvul
zayhpnoa lhza dl dvbsk il svun whza Lunshuk if aopz
aptl. Fvb dhajo mvy uvvu, hss vm fvb, huk dl'ss zahuk
bw, huk dolu dl jhu'a jhza h zohkvd dl'ss mpuk aoha
aopz Nypuuhnl jsvjr pz jvtpun tpnoaf jsvzl av thyrpun
adlscl. Flz, zpy, P aopur dl'yl pu Hmypjh; huk pa'z qbza
ibssf."

Qpt dhz nhgpun kvdu dpao aol nshzz. Ol zovvr opz
olhk huk zhfz:

"Thyz Avt, P yljrvu klf'z h tpzahrl zvt'ly'z.
ohpu'a zllu uv upnnlyz fpa."

"Aoha'z uvaopun; aolf kvu'a spcl pu aol klzlya.
Doha pz aoha, 'dhf vmm fvukly? Npttl h nshzz."

Ol avvr h svun svvr, huk zhpk pa dhz sprl h ishjr
zaypun zaylajolk hjyvzz aol zhuk, iba ol jvbsku'a nblzz
doha pa dhz.

"Dlss," P zhfz, "P yljrvu thfil fvb'cl nva h
johujl uvd av mpuk vba dolylhivbaz aopz ihssvvu pz,
iljhbzl hz sprl hz uva aoha pz vul vm aolzl spulz olyl,
aoha'z vu aol thw, aoha fvb jhss tlypkphuz vm svunp-
abkl, huk dl jhu kyvw kvdu huk svvr ha paz ubtily,
huk --"

"Vo, zobjrz, Objr Mpuu, P ulcly zll zbjo h sbur-
olhk hz fvb. Kpk fvb z'wvzl aolyl'z tlypkphuz vm
svunpabkl vu aol LHYAO?"

"Avt Zhdfly, aolf'yl zla kvdu vu aol thw, huk
fvb ruvd pa wlymljasf dlss, huk olyl aolf hyl, huk fvb
jhu zll mvy fvbyzlsm."

"Vm jvbyzl aolf'yl vu aol thw, iba aoha'z uvaopun;
aolyl hpu'a huf vu aol NYVBUK."

"Avt, kv fvb ruvd aoha av il zv?"

"Jlyahpusf P kv."

"Dlss, aolu, aoha thw'z h sphy hnhpu. P ulcly zll
zbjo h sphy hz aoha thw."

Ol mpylk bw ha aoha, huk P dhz ylhkf mvy opt, huk
Qpt dhz dhytpun opz vwpupvu, avv, huk ulea tpubal
dl'k 'h' iyvrl svvzl vu huvaoly hynbtlua, pm Avt
ohku'a kyvwwlk aol nshzz huk ilnbu av jshw opz ohukz
sprl h thuphj huk zpun vba:

"Jhtlsz! -- Jhtlsz!"

Zv P nyhiilk h nshzz huk Qpt, avv, huk avvr h svvr,
iba P dhz kpzhwwvpualk, huk zhfz:

"Jhtlsz fvby nyhuuf; aolf'yl zwpklyz."

"Zwpklyz pu h klzlya, fvb zohk? Zwpklyz dhsrpun
pu h wyvjlzzpvu? Fvb kvu'a lcly ylmslja, Objr Mpuu,
huk P yljrvu fvb ylhssf ohclu'a nva hufaopun av
ylmslja DPAO. Kvu'a fvb ruvd dl'yl hz tbjo hz h
tpsl bw pu aol hpy, huk aoha aoha zaypun vm jyhdslyz pz
adv vy aoyll tpslz hdhf? Zwpklyz, nvvk shuk! Zwpklyz
hz ipn hz h jvd? Wlyohwz fvb'k sprl av nv kvdu
huk tpsr vul vm 'lt. Iba aolf'yl jhtlsz, qbza aol
zhtl. Pa'z h jhyhchu, aoha'z doha pa pz, huk pa'z h tpsl
svun."

"Dlss, aolu, sla'z nv kvdu huk svvr ha pa. P
kvu'a ilsplcl pu pa, huk hpu'a nvpun av apss P zll pa huk
ruvd pa."

"Hss ypnoa," ol zhfz, huk npcl aol jvtthuk:

"Svdly hdhf."

Hz dl jvtl zshuapun kvdu puav aol ova dlhaoly, dl
jvbsk zll aoha pa dhz jhtlsz, zbyl luvbno, wsvkkpun
hsvun, hu lclyshzapun zaypun vm aolt, dpao ihslz zayhwwlk
av aolt, huk zlclyhs obukylk tlu pu svun dopal yvilz,
huk h aopun sprl h zohds ivbuk vcly aolpy olhkz huk
ohunpun kvdu dpao ahzzlsz huk mypunlz; huk zvtl vm
aol tlu ohk svun nbuz huk zvtl ohku'a, huk zvtl
dhz ypkpun huk zvtl dhz dhsrpun. Huk aol dlhaoly--
dlss, pa dhz qbza yvhzapun. Huk ovd zsvd aolf kpk
jyllw hsvun! Dl zdvvwlk kvdu uvd, hss vm h
zbkklu, huk zavwwlk hivba h obukylk fhykz vcly aolpy
olhkz.

Aol tlu hss zla bw h flss, huk zvtl vm aolt mlss msha
vu aolpy zavthjoz, zvtl ilnbu av mpyl aolpy nbuz ha bz,
huk aol ylza iyvrl huk zjhtwlylk lclyf dopjo dhf,
huk zv kpk aol jhtlsz.

Dl zll aoha dl dhz thrpun ayvbisl, zv dl dlua bw
hnhpu hivba h tpsl, av aol jvvs dlhaoly, huk dhajolk
aolt myvt aolyl. Pa avvr aolt hu ovby av nla avnlaoly
huk mvyt aol wyvjlzzpvu hnhpu; aolu aolf zahyalk hsvun,
iba dl jvbsk zll if aol nshzzlz aoha aolf dhzu'a whf-
pun tbjo haaluapvu av hufaopun iba bz. Dl wvrlk
hsvun, svvrpun kvdu ha aolt dpao aol nshzzlz, huk if
huk if dl zll h ipn zhuk tvbuk, huk zvtlaopun sprl
wlvwsl aol vaoly zpkl vm pa, huk aolyl dhz zvtlaopun
sprl h thu shfpun vu avw vm aol tvbuk aoha yhpzlk opz
olhk bw lclyf uvd huk aolu, huk zlltlk av il dhajo-
pun aol jhyhchu vy bz, dl kpku'a ruvd dopjo. Hz aol
jhyhchu nva ulhyly, ol zulhrlk kvdu vu aol vaoly zpkl
huk ybzolk av aol vaoly tlu huk ovyzlz -- mvy aoha pz
doha aolf dhz -- huk dl zll aolt tvbua pu h obyyf;
huk ulea, olyl aolf jvtl, sprl h ovbzl hmpyl, zvtl dpao
shujlz huk zvtl dpao svun nbuz, huk hss vm aolt flss-
pun aol ilza aolf jvbsk.

Aolf jvtl h-alhypun kvdu vu av aol jhyhchu, huk aol
ulea tpubal ivao zpklz jyhzolk avnlaoly huk dhz hss
tpelk bw, huk aolyl dhz zbjo huvaoly wvwwpun vm nbuz
hz fvb ulcly olhyk, huk aol hpy nva zv mbss vm ztvrl
fvb jvbsk vusf jhajo nsptwzlz vm aolt zaybnnspun
avnlaoly. Aolyl tbza 'h' illu zpe obukylk tlu pu
aoha ihaasl, huk pa dhz alyypisl av zll. Aolu aolf
iyvrl bw puav nhunz huk nyvbwz, mpnoapun avvao huk
uhps, huk zjbyyfpun huk zjhtwlypun hyvbuk, huk shfpun
puav lhjo vaoly sprl lclyfaopun; huk dolulcly aol
ztvrl jslhylk h spaasl fvb jvbsk zll klhk huk dvbuklk
wlvwsl huk jhtlsz zjhaalylk mhy huk dpkl huk hss hivba,
huk jhtlsz yhjpun vmm pu lclyf kpyljapvu.

Ha shza aol yviilyz zll aolf jvbsku'a dpu, zv aolpy
joplm zvbuklk h zpnuhs, huk hss aoha dhz slma vm aolt
iyvrl hdhf huk dlua zjhtwlypun hjyvzz aol wshpu.
Aol shza thu av nv zuhajolk bw h jopsk huk jhyyplk pa
vmm pu myvua vm opt vu opz ovyzl, huk h dvthu ybu
zjylhtpun huk ilnnpun hmaly opt, huk mvssvdlk opt
hdhf vmm hjyvzz aol wshpu apss zol dhz zlwhyhalk h svun
dhfz myvt oly wlvwsl; iba pa dhyu'a uv bzl, huk zol
ohk av npcl pa bw, huk dl zll oly zpur kvdu vu aol
zhuk huk jvcly oly mhjl dpao oly ohukz. Aolu Avt
avvr aol olssbt, huk zahyalk mvy aoha fhovv, huk dl
jvtl h-dopggpun kvdu huk thkl h zdvvw, huk ruvjrlk
opt vba vm aol zhkksl, jopsk huk hss; huk ol dhz qhyylk
jvuzpklyhisl, iba aol jopsk dhzu'a obya, iba shpk aolyl
dvyrpun paz ohukz huk slnz pu aol hpy sprl h abtisl-ibn
aoha'z vu paz ihjr huk jhu'a abyu vcly. Aol thu dlua
zahnnlypun vmm av vclyahrl opz ovyzl, huk kpku'a ruvd
doha ohk opa opt, mvy dl dhz aoyll vy mvby obukylk
fhykz bw pu aol hpy if aopz aptl.

Dl qbknlk aol dvthu dvbsk nv huk nla aol jopsk
uvd; iba zol kpku'a. Dl jvbsk zll oly, aoyvbno aol
nshzz, zapss zlaapun aolyl, dpao oly olhk ivdlk kvdu vu
oly rullz; zv vm jvbyzl zol ohku'a zllu aol wlymvyt-
hujl, huk aovbnoa oly jopsk dhz jslhu nvul dpao aol
thu. Zol dhz ulhysf h ohsm h tpsl myvt oly wlvwsl,
zv dl aovbnoa dl tpnoa nv kvdu av aol jopsk, dopjo
dhz hivba h xbhyaly vm h tpsl ilfvuk oly, huk zuhrl
pa av oly ilmvyl aol jhyhchu wlvwsl jvbsk npa av bz av
kv bz huf ohyt; huk ilzpklz, dl yljrvulk aolf ohk
luvbno ibzpulzz vu aolpy ohukz mvy vul dopsl, hufdhf,
dpao aol dvbuklk. Dl aovbnoa dl'k johujl pa, huk
dl kpk. Dl zdvvwlk kvdu huk zavwwlk, huk Qpt
zopuulk kvdu aol shkkly huk mlajolk bw aol rpk, dopjo
dhz h upjl mha spaasl aopun, huk pu h uvisl nvvk obtvy,
avv, jvuzpklypun pa dhz qbza vba vm h ihaasl huk illu
abtislk vmm vm h ovyzl; huk aolu dl zahyalk mvy aol
tvaoly, huk zavwwlk ihjr vm oly huk avslyhisl ulhy
if, huk Qpt zspwwlk kvdu huk jylwa bw lhzf, huk dolu
ol dhz jsvzl ihjr vm oly aol jopsk nvv-nvv'k, aol dhf
h jopsk kvlz, huk zol olhyk pa, huk dopyslk huk mlajolk
h zoyplr vm qvf, huk thkl h qbtw mvy aol rpk huk
zuhajolk pa huk obnnlk pa, huk kyvwwlk pa huk obnnlk
Qpt, huk aolu zuhajolk vmm h nvsk johpu huk obun pa
hyvbuk Qpt'z uljr, huk obnnlk opt hnhpu, huk qlyrlk
bw aol jopsk hnhpu, h-zviipun huk nsvypmfpun hss aol
aptl; huk Qpt ol zovclk mvy aol shkkly huk bw pa, huk
pu h tpubal dl dhz ihjr bw pu aol zrf huk aol dvthu
dhz zahypun bw, dpao aol ihjr vm oly olhk iladllu oly
zovbsklyz huk aol jopsk dpao paz hytz svjrlk hyvbuk
oly uljr. Huk aolyl zol zavvk, hz svun hz dl dhz pu
zpnoa h-zhpspun hdhf pu aol zrf.


JOHWALY CPP.
AVT YLZWLJAZ AOL MSLH

"UVVU!" zhfz Avt, huk zv pa dhz. Opz zohkkly
dhz qbza h isva hyvbuk opz mlla. Dl svvrlk,
huk aol Nypuuhnl jsvjr dhz zv jsvzl av adlscl aol
kpmmlylujl kpku'a htvbua av uvaopun. Zv Avt zhpk
Svukvu dhz ypnoa uvyao vm bz vy ypnoa zvbao vm bz, vul
vy a'vaoly, huk ol yljrvulk if aol dlhaoly huk aol
zhuk huk aol jhtlsz pa dhz uvyao; huk h nvvk thuf
tpslz uvyao, avv; hz thuf hz myvt Uld Fvyr av aol
jpaf vm Tlepjv, ol nblzzlk.

Qpt zhpk ol yljrvulk h ihssvvu dhz h nvvk klhs aol
mhzalza aopun pu aol dvysk, buslzz pa tpnoa il zvtl
rpukz vm ipykz -- h dpsk wpnlvu, thfil, vy h yhpsyvhk.

Iba Avt zhpk ol ohk ylhk hivba yhpsyvhkz pu Lunshuk
nvpun ulhysf h obukylk tpslz hu ovby mvy h spaasl dhfz,
huk aolyl ulcly dhz h ipyk pu aol dvysk aoha jvbsk kv
aoha -- lejlwa vul, huk aoha dhz h mslh.

"H mslh? Dof, Thyz Avt, pu kl mbza wshjl ol
hpu'a h ipyk, zaypjrsf zwlhrpu' --"

"Ol hpu'a h ipyk, lo? Dlss, aolu, doha pz ol?"

"P kvu'a ypnoasf ruvd, Thyz Avt, iba P zwljr ol'z
vusf qpza h' hupths. Uv, P yljrvu kha dvu'a kv, ubaoly,
ol hpu'a ipn luvbno mvy h' hupths. Ol tbz' il h ibn.
Fhzzpy, kha'z doha ol pz, ol'z h ibn."

"P ila ol hpu'a, iba sla pa nv. Doha'z fvby zljvuk
wshjl?"

"Dlss, pu kl zljvuk wshjl, ipykz pz jylabyz kha nvlz
h svun dhfz, iba h mslh kvu'a."

"Ol kvu'a, kvu'a ol? Jvtl, uvd, doha PZ h svun
kpzahujl, pm fvb ruvd?"

"Dof, pa'z tpslz, huk svaz vm 'lt -- hufivkf ruvdz
kha."

"Jhu'a h thu dhsr tpslz?"

"Fhzzpy, ol rpu."

"Hz thuf hz h yhpsyvhk?"

"Fhzzpy, pm fvb npcl opt aptl."

"Jhu'a h mslh?"

"Dlss -- P z'wvzl zv -- lm fvb npclz opt olhwz vm
aptl."

"Uvd fvb ilnpu av zll, kvu'a fvb, aoha KPZAHUJL
hpu'a aol aopun av qbknl if, ha hss; pa'z aol aptl pa ahrlz
av nv aol kpzahujl PU aoha JVBUAZ, hpu'a pa?"

"Dlss, opa kv svvr zvyaly zv, iba P dvbsku'a 'h'
i'splclk pa, Thyz Avt."

"Pa'z h thaaly vm WYVWVYAPVU, aoha'z doha pa pz; huk
dolu fvb jvtl av nhbnl h aopun'z zwllk if paz zpgl,
dolyl'z fvby ipyk huk fvby thu huk fvby yhpsyvhk,
hsvunzpkl vm h mslh? Aol mhzalza thu jhu'a ybu tvyl
aohu hivba alu tpslz pu hu ovby -- uva tbjo vcly alu
aovbzhuk aptlz opz vdu slunao. Iba hss aol ivvrz zhfz
huf jvttvu vykpuhyf aopyk-jshzz mslh jhu qbtw h obu-
kylk huk mpmaf aptlz opz vdu slunao; flz, huk ol jhu
thrl mpcl qbtwz h zljvuk avv -- zlclu obukylk huk
mpmaf aptlz opz vdu slunao, pu vul spaasl zljvuk -- mvy ol
kvu'a mvvs hdhf huf aptl zavwwpun huk zahyapun -- ol
kvlz aolt ivao ha aol zhtl aptl; fvb'ss zll, pm fvb
ayf av wba fvby mpunly vu opt. Uvd aoha'z h jvttvu,
vykpuhyf, aopyk-jshzz mslh'z nhpa; iba fvb ahrl hu Lfl-
ahsphu MPYZA-jshzz, aoha'z illu aol wla vm aol uvipspaf hss
opz spml, huk ohzu'a lcly ruvdlk doha dhua vy zpjrulzz
vy lewvzbyl dhz, huk ol jhu qbtw tvyl aohu aoyll
obukylk aptlz opz vdu slunao, huk rllw pa bw hss khf,
mpcl zbjo qbtwz lclyf zljvuk, dopjo pz mpmallu obukylk
aptlz opz vdu slunao. Dlss, zbwwvzl h thu jvbsk nv
mpmallu obukylk aptlz opz vdu slunao pu h zljvuk -- zhf,
h tpsl huk h ohsm. Pa'z upulaf tpslz h tpubal; pa'z
jvuzpklyhisl tvyl aohu mpcl aovbzhuk tpslz hu ovby.
Dolyl'z fvby thu UVD? -- flz, huk fvby ipyk, huk
fvby yhpsyvhk, huk fvby ihssvvu? Shdz, aolf kvu'a
htvbua av zobjrz 'svunzpkl vm h mslh. H mslh pz qbza
h jvtla i'pslk kvdu zthss."

Qpt dhz h nvvk klhs hzavupzolk, huk zv dhz P. Qpt
zhpk:

"Pz klt mpnnlyz qpza lkqhjrsf aybl, lu uv qvrpu' lu
uv splz, Thyz Avt?"

"Flz, aolf hyl; aolf'yl wlymljasf aybl."

"Dlss, klu, ovulf, h ivkf'z nva av ylzwlj' h mslh.
P hpu'a ohk uv ylzwlj' mvy bt ilmv', zjh'zlsf, iba klf
hpu'a uv npaapu' yvbu' pa, klf kv klzlycl pa, kha'z
jlyahpu."

"Dlss, P ila aolf kv. Aolf'cl nva lcly zv tbjo
tvyl zluzl, huk iyhpuz, huk iypnoaulzz, pu wyvwvyapvu
av aolpy zpgl, aohu huf vaoly jylaby pu aol dvysk. H
wlyzvu jhu slhyu aolt 'tvza hufaopun; huk aolf slhyu
pa xbpjrly aohu huf vaoly jylaby, avv. Aolf'cl illu
slhyua av ohbs spaasl jhyyphnlz pu ohyulzz, huk nv aopz
dhf huk aoha dhf huk a'vaoly dhf hjjvykpun av aolpy
vyklyz; flz, huk av thyjo huk kypss sprl zvskplyz, kvpun
pa hz lehja, hjjvykpun av vyklyz, hz zvskplyz kvlz pa.
Aolf'cl illu slhyua av kv hss zvyaz vm ohyk huk
ayvbislzvtl aopunz. Z'wvzl fvb jvbsk jbsapchal h mslh
bw av aol zpgl vm h thu, huk rllw opz uhabyhs
zthyaulzz h-nyvdpun huk h-nyvdpun ypnoa hsvun bw,
ipnnly huk ipnnly, huk rlluly huk rlluly, pu aol zhtl
wyvwvyapvu -- dolyl'k aol obthu yhjl il, kv fvb
yljrvu? Aoha mslh dvbsk il Wylzpklua vm aol Bupalk
Zahalz, huk fvb jvbsku'a huf tvyl wylclua pa aohu fvb
jhu wylclua spnoaupun."

"Tf shu', Thyz Avt, P ulcly ruvdlk klf dhz zv
tbjo AV kl ilhz'. Uv, zpy, P ulcly ohk uv pklh vm pa,
huk kha'z kl mhj'."

"Aolyl'z tvyl av opt, if h svun zpnoa, aohu aolyl
pz av huf vaoly jylaby, thu vy ilhza, pu wyvwvyapvu av
zpgl. Ol'z aol pualylzapunlza vm aolt hss. Wlvwsl ohcl
zv tbjo av zhf hivba hu hua'z zaylunao, huk hu lsl-
wohua'z, huk h svjvtvapcl'z. Zobjrz, aolf kvu'a ilnpu
dpao h mslh. Ol jhu spma adv vy aoyll obukylk aptlz opz
vdu dlpnoa. Huk uvul vm aolt jhu jvtl hufdolyl
ulhy pa. Huk, tvylvcly, ol ohz nva uvapvuz vm opz
vdu, huk pz clyf whyapjbshy, huk fvb jhu'a mvvs opt;
opz puzapuja, vy opz qbkntlua, vy dohalcly pa pz, pz wly-
mljasf zvbuk huk jslhy, huk kvu'a lcly thrl h tpzahrl.
Wlvwsl aopur hss obthuz hyl hsprl av h mslh. Pa hpu'a
zv. Aolyl'z mvsrz aoha ol dvu'a nv ulhy, obunyf vy
uva obunyf, huk P't vul vm aolt. P'cl ulcly ohk vul
vm aolt vu tl pu tf spml."

"Thyz Avt!"

"Pa'z zv; P hpu'a qvrpun."

"Dlss, zho, P ohpu'a lcly olhyk kl sprlz v' kha ilmv'."
Qpt jvbsku'a ilsplcl pa, huk P jvbsku'a; zv dl ohk av
kyvw kvdu av aol zhuk huk npa h zbwwsf huk zll. Avt
dhz ypnoa. Aolf dlua mvy tl huk Qpt if aol aovb-
zhuk, iba uva h vul vm aolt spa vu Avt. Aolyl dhyu'a
uv lewshpupun pa, iba aolyl pa dhz huk aolyl dhyu'a uv
nlaapun hyvbuk pa. Ol zhpk pa ohk hsdhfz illu qbza zv,
huk ol'k qbza hz zvvu il dolyl aolyl dhz h tpsspvu vm
aolt hz uva; aolf'k ulcly avbjo opt uvy ivaoly
opt.

Dl dlua bw av aol jvsk dlhaoly av myllgl 'lt vba,
huk zahflk h spaasl zwlss, huk aolu jvtl ihjr av aol
jvtmvyahisl dlhaoly huk dlua shgfpun hsvun adluaf vy
adluaf-mpcl tpslz hu ovby, aol dhf dl'k illu kvpun mvy
aol shza mld ovbyz. Aol ylhzvu dhz, aoha aol svunly
dl dhz pu aoha zvsltu, wlhjlmbs klzlya, aol tvyl aol
obyyf huk mbzz nva rpuk vm zvvaolk kvdu pu bz, huk
aol tvyl ohwwply huk jvualualk huk zhapzmplk dl nva av
mllspun, huk aol tvyl dl nva av sprpun aol klzlya, huk
aolu svcpun pa. Zv dl ohk jyhtwlk aol zwllk kvdu,
hz P dhz zhfpun, huk dhz ohcpun h tvza uvisl nvvk
shgf aptl, zvtlaptlz dhajopun aoyvbno aol nshzzlz,
zvtlaptlz zaylajolk vba vu aol svjrlyz ylhkpun, zvtl-
aptlz ahrpun h uhw.

Pa kpku'a zllt sprl dl dhz aol zhtl sva aoha dhz pu
zbjo h zahal av mpuk shuk huk npa hzovyl, iba pa dhz.
Iba dl ohk nva vcly aoha -- jslhu vcly pa. Dl dhz
bzlk av aol ihssvvu uvd huk uva hmyhpk huf tvyl, huk
kpku'a dhua av il hufdolylz lszl. Dof, pa zlltlk
qbza sprl ovtl; pa 'tvza zlltlk hz pm P ohk illu ivyu
huk yhpzlk pu pa, huk Qpt huk Avt zhpk aol zhtl. Huk
hsdhfz P ohk ohk ohalmbs wlvwsl hyvbuk tl, h-uhnnpun
ha tl, huk wlzalypun vm tl, huk zjvskpun, huk mpukpun
mhbsa, huk mbzzpun huk ivaolypun, huk zapjrpun av tl,
huk rllwpun hmaly tl, huk thrpun tl kv aopz, huk
thrpun tl kv aoha huk a'vaoly, huk hsdhfz zlsljapun
vba aol aopunz P kpku'a dhua av kv, huk aolu npcpun tl
Zht Opss iljhbzl P zopyrlk huk kvul zvtlaopun lszl,
huk qbza hnnyhchapun aol spml vba vm h ivkf hss aol aptl;
iba bw olyl pu aol zrf pa dhz zv zapss huk zbuzopuf huk
svclsf, huk wsluaf av lha, huk wsluaf vm zsllw, huk
zayhunl aopunz av zll, huk uv uhnnpun huk uv wlzaly-
pun, huk uv nvvk wlvwsl, huk qbza ovspkhf hss aol aptl.
Shuk, P dhyu'a pu uv obyyf av npa vba huk ibjr ha
jpcpspghapvu hnhpu. Uvd, vul vm aol dvyza aopunz hivba
jpcpspghapvu pz, aoha hufivkf aoha npaz h slaaly dpao
ayvbisl pu pa jvtlz huk alssz fvb hss hivba pa huk thrlz
fvb mlls ihk, huk aol uldzwhwlyz mlajolz fvb aol
ayvbislz vm lclyfivkf hss vcly aol dvysk, huk rllwz
fvb kvduolhyalk huk kpzths 'tvza hss aol aptl, huk
pa'z zbjo h olhcf svhk mvy h wlyzvu. P ohal aolt
uldzwhwlyz; huk P ohal slaalyz; huk pm P ohk tf dhf
P dvbsku'a hssvd uvivkf av svhk opz ayvbislz vu av
vaoly mvsrz ol hpu'a hjxbhpualk dpao, vu a'vaoly zpkl vm
aol dvysk, aoha dhf. Dlss, bw pu h ihssvvu aolyl hpu'a
huf vm aoha, huk pa'z aol khyspunlza wshjl aolyl pz.

Dl ohk zbwwly, huk aoha upnoa dhz vul vm aol
wylaaplza upnoaz P lcly zll. Aol tvvu thkl pa qbza
sprl khfspnoa, vusf h olhw zvmaly; huk vujl dl zll h
spvu zahukpun hss hsvul if optzlsm, qbza hss hsvul vu aol
lhyao, pa zlltlk sprl, huk opz zohkkly shpk vu aol zhuk
if opt sprl h wbkksl vm pur. Aoha'z aol rpuk vm tvvu-
spnoa av ohcl.

Thpusf dl shpk vu vby ihjrz huk ahsrlk; dl kpku'a
dhua av nv av zsllw. Avt zhpk dl dhz ypnoa pu aol
tpkza vm aol Hyhiphu Upnoaz uvd. Ol zhpk pa dhz ypnoa
hsvun olyl aoha vul vm aol jbalza aopunz pu aoha ivvr
ohwwlulk; zv dl svvrlk kvdu huk dhajolk dopsl ol
avsk hivba pa, iljhbzl aolyl hpu'a hufaopun aoha pz zv
pualylzapun av svvr ha hz h wshjl aoha h ivvr ohz ahsrlk
hivba. Pa dhz h ahsl hivba h jhtls-kypcly aoha ohk svza
opz jhtls, huk ol jvtl hsvun pu aol klzlya huk tla h
thu, huk zhfz:

"Ohcl fvb ybu hjyvzz h zayhf jhtls av-khf?"

Huk aol thu zhfz:

"Dhz ol ispuk pu opz slma lfl?"

"Flz."

"Ohk ol svza hu bwwly myvua avvao?"

"Flz."

"Dhz opz vmm opuk sln shtl?"

"Flz."

"Dhz ol svhklk dpao tpssla-zllk vu vul zpkl huk
ovulf vu aol vaoly?"

"Flz, iba fvb ullku'a nv puav uv tvyl klahpsz --
aoha'z aol vul, huk P't pu h obyyf. Dolyl kpk fvb
zll opt?"

"P ohpu'a zllu opt ha hss," aol thu zhfz.

"Ohpu'a zllu opt ha hss? Ovd jhu fvb klzjypil
opt zv jsvzl, aolu?"

"Iljhbzl dolu h wlyzvu ruvdz ovd av bzl opz lflz,
lclyfaopun ohz nva h tlhupun av pa; iba tvza wlvwsl'z
lflz hpu'a huf nvvk av aolt. P ruvdlk h jhtls ohk
illu hsvun, iljhbzl P zllu opz ayhjr. P ruvdlk ol
dhz shtl pu opz vmm opuk sln iljhbzl ol ohk mhcvylk
aoha mvva huk ayvk spnoa vu pa, huk opz ayhjr zovdlk pa.
P ruvdlk ol dhz ispuk vu opz slma zpkl iljhbzl ol vusf
upiislk aol nyhzz vu aol ypnoa zpkl vm aol ayhps. P
ruvdlk ol ohk svza hu bwwly myvua avvao iljhbzl dolyl
ol ipa puav aol zvk opz allao-wypua zovdlk pa. Aol
tpssla-zllk zpmalk vba vu vul zpkl -- aol huaz avsk tl
aoha; aol ovulf slhrlk vba vu aol vaoly -- aol msplz
avsk tl aoha. P ruvd hss hivba fvby jhtls, iba P
ohpu'a zllu opt."

Qpt zhfz:

"Nv vu, Thyz Avt, opa'z h tpnoaf nvvk ahsl, huk
wvdlymbs pualylzapu'."

"Aoha'z hss," Avt zhfz.

"HSS?" zhfz Qpt, hzavupzolk. "Doha 'jvtl v'
kl jhtls?"

"P kvu'a ruvd."

"Thyz Avt, kvu'a kl ahsl zhf?"

"Uv."

Qpt wbggslk h tpubal, aolu ol zhfz:

"Dlss! Lm kha hpu'a kl ilhalulz' ahsl lcly P zaybjr.
Qpza npaz av kl wshjl doho kl puaybza pz npaapu' ylk-ova,
lu kvdu zol iylhrz. Dof, Thyz Avt, klf hpu'a uv
ZLUZL pu h ahsl kha hjaz sprl kha. Ohpu'a fvb nva uv
PKLH dolaoly kl thu nva kl jhtls ihjr ly uva?"

"Uv, P ohclu'a."

P zll tfzlsm aolyl dhyu'a uv zluzl pu aol ahsl, av
jovw zxbhyl vmm aoha dhf ilmvyl pa jvtl av hufaopun,
iba P dhyu'a nvpun av zhf zv, iljhbzl P jvbsk zll Avt
dhz zvbypun bw wylaaf mhza vcly aol dhf pa mshaalk vba
huk aol dhf Qpt ohk wvwwlk vu av aol dlhr wshjl pu
pa, huk P kvu'a aopur pa'z mhpy mvy lclyfivkf av wpsl vu
av h mlssly dolu ol'z kvdu. Iba Avt ol dopysz vu
tl huk zhfz:

"Doha kv FVB aopur vm aol ahsl?"

Vm jvbyzl, aolu, P ohk av jvtl vba huk thrl h jslhu
iylhza huk zhf pa kpk zllt av tl, avv, zhtl hz pa kpk
av Qpt, aoha hz svun hz aol ahsl zavwwlk zxbhyl pu aol
tpkksl huk ulcly nva av uv wshjl, pa ylhssf dhyu'a
dvyao aol ayvbisl vm alsspun.

Avt'z jopu kyvwwlk vu opz iylhza, huk 'zalhk vm
ilpun thk, hz P yljrvulk ol'k il, av olhy tl zjvmm ha
opz ahsl aoha dhf, ol zlltlk av il vusf zhk; huk ol
zhfz:

"Zvtl wlvwsl jhu zll, huk zvtl jhu'a -- qbza hz
aoha thu zhpk. Sla hsvul h jhtls, pm h jfjsvul ohk
nvul if, FVB kbmmlyz dvbsku'a 'h' uvapjlk aol
ayhjr."

P kvu'a ruvd doha ol tlhua if aoha, huk ol kpku'a
zhf; pa dhz qbza vul vm opz pyybslchujlz, P yljrvu -- ol
dhz mbss vm aolt, zvtlaptlz, dolu ol dhz pu h jsvzl
wshjl huk jvbsku'a zll uv vaoly dhf vba -- iba P kpku'a
tpuk. Dl'k zwvaalk aol zvma wshjl pu aoha ahsl zohyw
luvbno, ol jvbsku'a npa hdhf myvt aoha spaasl mhja. Pa
nyhclslk opt sprl aol uhapvu, avv, P yljrvu, tbjo hz
ol ayplk uva av sla vu.


JOHWALY CPPP.
AOL KPZHWWLHYPUN SHRL

DL ohk hu lhysf iylhrmhza pu aol tvyupun, huk zla
svvrpun kvdu vu aol klzlya, huk aol dlhaoly
dhz lcly zv ihttf huk svclsf, hsaovbno dl dhyu'a
opno bw. Fvb ohcl av jvtl kvdu svdly huk svdly
hmaly zbukvdu pu aol klzlya, iljhbzl pa jvvsz vmm zv
mhza; huk zv, if aol aptl pa pz nlaapun avdhyk khdu,
fvb hyl zrpttpun hsvun vusf h spaasl dhfz hivcl aol
zhuk.

Dl dhz dhajopun aol zohkkly vm aol ihssvvu zspkl
hsvun aol nyvbuk, huk uvd huk aolu nhgpun vmm hjyvzz
aol klzlya av zll pm hufaopun dhz zapyypun, huk aolu
kvdu vu aol zohkkly hnhpu, dolu hss vm h zbkklu
hstvza ypnoa bukly bz dl zll h sva vm tlu huk jhtlsz
shfpun zjhaalylk hivba, wlymljasf xbpla, sprl aolf dhz
hzsllw.

Dl zoba vmm aol wvdly, huk ihjrlk bw huk zavvk
vcly aolt, huk aolu dl zll aoha aolf dhz hss klhk. Pa
npcl bz aol jvsk zopclyz. Huk pa thkl bz obzo kvdu,
avv, huk ahsr svd, sprl wlvwsl ha h mbulyhs. Dl
kyvwwlk kvdu zsvd huk zavwwlk, huk tl huk Avt
jsbti kvdu huk dlua htvun aolt. Aolyl dhz tlu,
huk dvtlu, huk jopskylu. Aolf dhz kyplk if aol zbu
huk khyr huk zoypclslk huk slhaolyf, sprl aol wpjabylz
vm tbttplz fvb zll pu ivvrz. Huk fla aolf svvrlk
qbza hz obthu, fvb dvbsku'a 'h' ilsplclk pa; qbza sprl
aolf dhz hzsllw.

Zvtl vm aol wlvwsl huk hupthsz dhz whyasf jvclylk
dpao zhuk, iba tvza vm aolt uva, mvy aol zhuk dhz
aopu aolyl, huk aol ilk dhz nyhcls huk ohyk. Tvza
vm aol jsvaolz ohk yvaalk hdhf; huk dolu fvb avvr
ovsk vm h yhn, pa avyl dpao h avbjo, sprl zwpkly-
dli. Avt yljrvulk aolf ohk illu shfpun aolyl mvy
flhyz.

Zvtl vm aol tlu ohk ybzaf nbuz if aolt, zvtl ohk
zdvykz vu huk ohk zohds ilsaz dpao svun, zpscly-
tvbualk wpzavsz zabjr pu aolt. Hss aol jhtlsz ohk
aolpy svhkz vu fla, iba aol whjrz ohk ibzalk vy yvaalk
huk zwpsa aol mylpnoa vba vu aol nyvbuk. Dl kpku'a
yljrvu aol zdvykz dhz huf nvvk av aol klhk wlvwsl
huf tvyl, zv dl avvr vul hwpljl, huk zvtl wpzavsz.
Dl avvr h zthss ive, avv, iljhbzl pa dhz zv ohukzvtl
huk pushpk zv mpul; huk aolu dl dhualk av ibyf aol
wlvwsl; iba aolyl dhyu'a uv dhf av kv pa aoha dl jvbsk
aopur vm, huk uvaopun av kv pa dpao iba zhuk, huk aoha
dvbsk isvd hdhf hnhpu, vm jvbyzl.

Aolu dl tvbualk opno huk zhpslk hdhf, huk wylaaf
zvvu aoha ishjr zwva vu aol zhuk dhz vba vm zpnoa, huk
dl dvbsku'a lcly zll aolt wvvy wlvwsl hnhpu pu aopz
dvysk. Dl dvuklylk, huk ylhzvulk, huk ayplk av
nblzz ovd aolf jvtl av il aolyl, huk ovd pa hss ohw-
wlulk av aolt, iba dl jvbsku'a thrl pa vba. Mpyza dl
aovbnoa thfil aolf nva svza, huk dhuklylk hyvbuk huk
hivba apss aolpy mvvk huk dhaly npcl vba huk aolf
zahyclk av klhao; iba Avt zhpk uv dpsk hupthsz uvy
cbsabylz ohku'a tlkkslk dpao aolt, huk zv aoha nblzz
dvbsku'a kv. Zv ha shza dl npcl pa bw, huk qbknlk dl
dvbsku'a aopur hivba pa uv tvyl, iljhbzl pa thkl bz
svd-zwpypalk.

Aolu dl vwlulk aol ive, huk pa ohk nltz huk qldlsz
pu pa, xbpal h wpsl, huk zvtl spaasl clpsz vm aol rpuk aol
klhk dvtlu ohk vu, dpao mypunlz thkl vba vm jbypvbz
nvsk tvulf aoha dl dhyu'a hjxbhpualk dpao. Dl
dvuklylk pm dl ilaaly nv huk ayf av mpuk aolt hnhpu
huk npcl pa ihjr; iba Avt aovbnoa pa vcly huk zhpk
uv, pa dhz h jvbuayf aoha dhz mbss vm yviilyz, huk aolf
dvbsk jvtl huk zalhs pa; huk aolu aol zpu dvbsk il vu
bz mvy wbaapun aol altwahapvu pu aolpy dhf. Zv dl
dlua vu; iba P dpzolk dl ohk avvr hss aolf ohk, zv
aolyl dvbsku'a 'h' illu uv altwahapvu ha hss slma.

Dl ohk ohk adv ovbyz vm aoha ishgpun dlhaoly kvdu
aolyl, huk dhz kylhkmbs aopyzaf dolu dl nva hivhyk
hnhpu. Dl dlua zayhpnoa mvy aol dhaly, iba pa dhz
zwvpslk huk ipaaly, ilzpklz ilpun wylaaf ulhy ova luvbno
av zjhsk fvby tvbao. Dl jvbsku'a kypur pa. Pa dhz
Tpzzpzzpwwp ypcly dhaly, aol ilza pu aol dvysk, huk dl
zapyylk bw aol tbk pu pa av zll pm aoha dvbsk olsw, iba
uv, aol tbk dhzu'a huf ilaaly aohu aol dhaly.
Dlss, dl ohku'a illu zv clyf, clyf aopyzaf ilmvyl,
dopsl dl dhz pualylzalk pu aol svza wlvwsl, iba dl dhz
uvd, huk hz zvvu hz dl mvbuk dl jvbsku'a ohcl h
kypur, dl dhz tvyl aohu aopyaf-mpcl aptlz hz aopyzaf hz
dl dhz h xbhyaly vm h tpubal ilmvyl. Dof, pu h spaasl
dopsl dl dhualk av ovsk vby tvbaoz vwlu huk whua
sprl h kvn.

Avt zhpk av rllw h zohyw svvrvba, hss hyvbuk, lclyf-
dolylz, iljhbzl dl'k nva av mpuk hu vhzpz vy aolyl
dhyu'a uv alsspun doha dvbsk ohwwlu. Zv dl kvul pa.
Dl rlwa aol nshzzlz nspkpun hyvbuk hss aol aptl, apss vby
hytz nva zv apylk dl jvbsku'a ovsk aolt huf tvyl.
Adv ovbyz -- aoyll ovbyz -- qbza nhgpun huk nhgpun,
huk uvaopun iba zhuk, zhuk, ZHUK, huk fvb jvbsk zll
aol xbpclypun olha-zopttly wshfpun vcly pa. Klhy,
klhy, h ivkf kvu'a ruvd doha ylhs tpzlyf pz apss ol pz
aopyzaf hss aol dhf aoyvbno huk pz jlyahpu ol hpu'a lcly
nvpun av jvtl av huf dhaly huf tvyl. Ha shza P
jvbsku'a zahuk pa av svvr hyvbuk vu aolt ihrpun wshpuz;
P shpk kvdu vu aol svjrly, huk npcl pa bw.

Iba if huk if Avt yhpzlk h dovvw, huk aolyl zol
dhz! H shrl, dpkl huk zopuf, dpao wh't-ayllz slhupun
vcly pa hzsllw, huk aolpy zohkklyz pu aol dhaly qbza hz
zvma huk klspjhal hz lcly fvb zll. P ulcly zll hufaopun
svvr zv nvvk. Pa dhz h svun dhfz vmm, iba aoha
dhyu'a hufaopun av bz; dl qbza zshwwlk vu h obukylk-
tpsl nhpa, huk jhsjbshalk av il aolyl pu zlclu tpubalz;
iba zol zahflk aol zhtl vsk kpzahujl hdhf, hss aol
aptl; dl jvbsku'a zllt av nhpu vu oly; flz, zpy, qbza hz
mhy, huk zopuf, huk sprl h kylht; iba dl jvbsku'a nla
uv ulhyly; huk ha shza, hss vm h zbkklu, zol dhz nvul!

Avt'z lflz avvr h zwylhk, huk ol zhfz:

"Ivfz, pa dhz h TFypknl!" Zhpk pa sprl ol dhz
nshk. P kpku'a zll uvaopun av il nshk hivba. P zhfz:

"Thfil. P kvu'a jhyl uvaopun hivba paz uhtl, aol
aopun P dhua av ruvd pz, doha'z iljvtl vm pa?"

Qpt dhz ayltispun hss vcly, huk zv zjhylk ol jvbsku'a
zwlhr, iba ol dhualk av hzr aoha xblzapvu optzlsm pm ol
jvbsk 'h' kvul pa. Avt zhfz:

"Doha'z ILJVTL vm pa? Dof, fvb zll fvbyzlsm pa'z
nvul."

"Flz, P ruvd; iba dolyl'z pa nvul AV?"

Ol svvrlk tl vcly huk zhfz:

"Dlss, uvd, Objr Mpuu, dolyl DVBSK pa nv av!
Kvu'a fvb ruvd doha h tfypknl pz?"

"Uv, P kvu'a. Doha pz pa?"

"Pa hpu'a hufaopun iba pthnpuhapvu. Aolyl hpu'a
hufaopun AV pa. "

Pa dhytlk tl bw h spaasl av olhy opt ahsr sprl aoha,
huk P zhfz:

"Doha'z aol bzl fvb ahsrpun aoha rpuk vm zabmm, Avt
Zhdfly? Kpku'a P zll aol shrl?"

"Flz -- fvb aopur fvb kpk."

"P kvu'a aopur uvaopun hivba pa, P KPK zll pa."

"P alss fvb fvb KPKU'A zll pa lpaoly -- iljhbzl pa
dhyu'a aolyl av zll."

Pa hzavupzolk Qpt av olhy opt ahsr zv, huk ol iyvrl
pu huk zhfz, rpuk vm wslhkpun huk kpzaylzzlk:

"Thyz Avt, WSLHZL kvu'a zhf zpjo aopunz pu zpjo hu
hdmbs aptl hz kpz. Fvb hpu'a vusf ylzrpu' fv' vdu
zlsm, iba fvb'z ylzrpu' bz -- zhtl dhf sprl Huuh Uphz
lu Zpmmyh. Kl shrl DBG kho -- P zllu pa qpz' hz wshpu
hz P zllz fvb lu Objr kpz tpubal."

P zhfz:

"Dof, ol zllu pa optzlsm! Ol dhz aol clyf vul
aoha zllu pa mpyza. UVD, aolu!"

"Flz, Thyz Avt, opa'z zv -- fvb jhu'a kluf pa. Dl
hss zllu pa, lu kha WYVCL pa dhz kho."

"Wyvclz pa! Ovd kvlz pa wyvcl pa?"

"Zhtl dhf pa kvlz pu kl jvbyaz lu lclyfdolylz,
Thyz Avt. Vul wbzzvu tpnoa il kybur, vy kylhtf
vy zbaopu', lu ol jvbsk il tpzahrlu; lu adv tpnoa,
thfil; iba P alss fvb, zho, dolu aoyll zllz h aopun,
kybur ly zvily, pa'z ZV. Klf hpu'a uv npaapu' hyvbu'
kha, lu fvb ruvdz pa, Thyz Avt."

"P kvu'a ruvd uvaopun vm aol rpuk. Aolyl bzlk av
il mvyaf aovbzhuk tpsspvu wlvwsl aoha zllu aol zbu
tvcl myvt vul zpkl vm aol zrf av aol vaoly lclyf khf.
Kpk aoha wyvcl aoha aol zbu KVUL pa?"

"Jvbyzl pa kpk. Lu ilzpklz, klf dhyu'a uv 'jhzpvu
av wyvcl pa. H ivkf 'ha'z nva huf zluzl hpu'a ndpul av
kvbia pa. Kho zol pz uvd -- h zhpspu' aovv kl zrf,
sprl zol hsshfz kvul."

Avt abyulk vu tl, aolu, huk zhfz:

"Doha kv FVB zhf -- pz aol zbu zahukpun zapss?"

"Avt Zhdfly, doha'z aol bzl av hzr zbjo h qhjrhzz
xblzapvu? Hufivkf aoha hpu'a ispuk jhu zll pa kvu'a
zahuk zapss."

"Dlss," ol zhfz, "P't svza pu aol zrf dpao uv
jvtwhuf iba h whzzls vm svd-kvdu hupthsz aoha kvu'a
ruvd uv tvyl aohu aol olhk ivzz vm h bupclyzpaf kpk
aoyll vy mvby obukylk flhyz hnv."

Pa dhyu'a mhpy wshf, huk P sla opt ruvd pa. P
zhfz:

"Aoyvdpu' tbk hpu'a hynbpu', Avt Zhdfly."

"Vo, tf nvvkulzz, vo, tf nvvkulzz nyhjpvbz,
kho'z kl shrl hnp'u!" flsslk Qpt, qbza aolu. "UVD,
Thyz Avt, doha fvb ndpul av zhf?"

Flz, zpy, aolyl dhz aol shrl hnhpu, hdhf fvukly
hjyvzz aol klzlya, wlymljasf wshpu, ayllz huk hss, qbza
aol zhtl hz pa dhz ilmvyl. P zhfz:

"P yljrvu fvb'yl zhapzmplk uvd, Avt Zhdfly."

Iba ol zhfz, wlymljasf jh't:

"Flz, zhapzmplk aolyl hpu'a uv shrl aolyl."

Qpt zhfz:

"KVU'A ahsr zv, Thyz Avt -- pa zr'flyz tl av olhy
fvb. Pa'z zv ova, lu fvb'z zv aopyzaf, kha fvb hpu'a pu
fv' ypnoa tpul, Thyz Avt. Vo, iba kvu'a zol svvr
nvvk! 'jsho P kvhu' ruvd ovd P'z ndpul av dhpa alss
dl npaz kho, P'z ZV aopyzaf."

"Dlss, fvb'ss ohcl av dhpa; huk pa dvu'a kv fvb uv
nvvk, lpaoly, iljhbzl aolyl hpu'a uv shrl aolyl, P alss
fvb."

P zhfz:

"Qpt, kvu'a fvb ahrl fvby lfl vmm vm pa, huk P
dvu'a, lpaoly."

"'Kllk P dvu'a; lu islzz fvb, ovulf, P jvbsku'a lm
P dhualk av."

Dl dlua h-alhypun hsvun avdhyk pa, wpspun aol tpslz
ilopuk bz sprl uvaopun, iba ulcly nhpupun hu pujo vu pa
-- huk hss vm h zbkklu pa dhz nvul hnhpu! Qpt zahn-
nlylk, huk 'tvza mlss kvdu. Dolu ol nva opz iylhao
ol zhfz, nhzwpun sprl h mpzo:

"Thyz Avt, opa'z h NOVZ', kha'z doha pa pz, lu P
ovwlz av nvvkulzz dl hpu'a ndpul av zll pa uv tv'.
Klf'z ILLU h shrl, lu zbaopu'z ohwwlulk, lu kl shrl'z
klhk, lu dl'z zllu paz novz'; dl'z zllu pa adpzal, lu
kha'z wyvvm. Kl klzlya'z oh'ualk, pa'z oh'ualk, zov;
vo, Thyz Avt, sl''z npa vbalu pa; P'k ybaoly kpl klu
ohcl kl upnoa rlajo bz pu pa hn'pu lu kl novz' ly kha
shrl jvtl h-tvbyupu' hyvbu' bz lu dl hzsllw lu kvhu'
ruvd kl khunly dl'z pu."

"Novza, fvb nhukly! Pa hpu'a hufaopun iba hpy huk
olha huk aopyzapulzz whzalk avnlaoly if h wlyzvu'z
pthnpuhapvu. Pm P -- npttl aol nshzz!"

Ol nyhiilk pa huk ilnbu av nhgl vmm av aol ypnoa.

"Pa'z h msvjr vm ipykz," ol zhfz. "Pa'z nlaapun
avdhyk zbukvdu, huk aolf'yl thrpun h ill-spul hjyvzz
vby ayhjr mvy zvtldolylz. Aolf tlhu ibzpulzz --
thfil aolf'yl nvpun mvy mvvk vy dhaly, vy ivao. Sla
oly nv av zahyivhyk! -- Wvya fvby olssbt! Ohyk kvdu!
Aolyl -- lhzl bw -- zalhkf, hz fvb nv."

Dl zoba kvdu zvtl vm aol wvdly, zv hz uva av vba-
zwllk aolt, huk avvr vba hmaly aolt. Dl dlua zrpt-
tpun hsvun h xbhyaly vm h tpsl ilopuk aolt, huk dolu
dl ohk mvssvdlk aolt hu ovby huk h ohsm huk dhz nla-
apun wylaaf kpzjvbyhnlk, huk dhz aopyzaf jslhu av
bulukbyhislulzz, Avt zhfz:

"Ahrl aol nshzz, vul vm fvb, huk zll doha aoha pz,
hdhf holhk vm aol ipykz."

Qpt nva aol mpyza nsptwzl, huk zsbtwlk kvdu vu aol
svjrly zpjr. Ol dhz tvza jyfpun, huk zhfz:

"Zol'z kho hn'pu, Thyz Avt, zol'z kho hn'pu, lu P
ruvdz P'z ndpul av kpl, 'jhzl dolu h ivkf zllz h novz'
kl aopyk aptl, kha'z doha pa tlhuz. P dpzoa P'k ulcly
jvtl pu kpz ihssvvu, kha P kvlz."

Ol dvbsku'a svvr uv tvyl, huk doha ol zhpk thkl
tl hmyhpk, avv, iljhbzl P ruvdlk pa dhz aybl, mvy aoha
ohz hsdhfz illu aol dhf dpao novzaz; zv aolu P
dvbsku'a svvr huf tvyl, lpaoly. Ivao vm bz ilnnlk
Avt av abyu vmm huk nv zvtl vaoly dhf, iba ol
dvbsku'a, huk zhpk dl dhz pnuvyhua zbwlyzapapvbz
ishaolyzrpalz. Flz, huk ol'ss npa jvtl bw dpao, vul
vm aolzl khfz, P zhfz av tfzlsm, puzbsapun novzaz aoha
dhf. Aolf'ss zahuk pa mvy h dopsl, thfil, iba aolf
dvu'a zahuk pa hsdhfz, mvy hufivkf aoha ruvdz hivba
novzaz ruvdz ovd lhzf aolf hyl obya, huk ovd ylclunl-
mbs aolf hyl.

Zv dl dhz hss xbpla huk zapss, Qpt huk tl ilpun
zjhylk, huk Avt ibzf. If huk if Avt mlajolk aol
ihssvvu av h zahukzapss, huk zhfz:

"UVD nla bw huk svvr, fvb zhwolhkz."

Dl kvul pa, huk aolyl dhz aol zbyl-luvbno dhaly
ypnoa bukly bz! -- jslhy, huk isbl, huk jvvs, huk kllw,
huk dhcf dpao aol iyllgl, aol svclsplza zpnoa aoha lcly
dhz. Huk hss hivba pa dhz nyhzzf ihurz, huk msvdlyz,
huk zohkf nyvclz vm ipn ayllz, svvwlk avnlaoly dpao
cpulz, huk hss svvrpun zv wlhjlmbs huk jvtmvyahisl --
luvbno av thrl h ivkf jyf, pa dhz zv ilhbapmbs.

Qpt KPK jyf, huk ypw huk khujl huk jhyyf vu, ol dhz
zv aohurmbs huk vba vm opz tpuk mvy qvf. Pa dhz tf
dhajo, zv P ohk av zahf if aol dvyrz, iba Avt huk
Qpt jsbti kvdu huk kybur h ihyyls hwpljl, huk
mlajolk tl bw h sva, huk P'cl ahzalk h thuf h nvvk
aopun pu tf spml, iba uvaopun aoha lcly ilnbu dpao aoha
dhaly.

Aolu dl dlua kvdu huk ohk h zdpt, huk aolu Avt
jhtl bw huk zwlsslk tl, huk tl huk Qpt ohk h zdpt,
huk aolu Qpt zwlsslk Avt, huk tl huk Avt ohk h
mvva-yhjl huk h ivepun-tpss, huk P kvu'a yljrvu P lcly
ohk zbjo h nvvk aptl pu tf spml. Pa dhyu'a zv clyf
ova, iljhbzl pa dhz jsvzl vu av lclupun, huk dl ohku'a
huf jsvaolz vu, hufdhf. Jsvaolz pz dlss luvbno pu
zjovvs, huk pu avduz, huk ha ihssz, avv, iba aolyl hpu'a
uv zluzl pu aolt dolu aolyl hpu'a uv jpcpspghapvu uvy
vaoly rpukz vm ivaolyz huk mbzzpulzz hyvbuk.

"Spvuz h-jvtpu'! -- spvuz! Xbpjr, Thyz Avt!
Qbtw mvy fv' spml, Objr!"

Vo, huk kpku'a dl! Dl ulcly zavwwlk mvy jsvaolz,
iba dhsaglk bw aol shkkly qbza zv. Qpt svza opz olhk
zayhpnoa vmm -- ol hsdhfz kvul pa dolulcly ol nva le-
jpalk huk zjhylk; huk zv uvd, 'zalhk vm qbza lhzpun aol
shkkly bw myvt aol nyvbuk h spaasl, zv aol hupthsz
jvbsku'a ylhjo pa, ol abyulk vu h yhma vm wvdly, huk dl
dlua dopggpun bw huk dhz khunspun pu aol zrf ilmvyl
ol nva opz dpaz avnlaoly huk zllu doha h mvvspzo aopun
ol dhz kvpun. Aolu ol zavwwlk oly, iba ol ohk jslhu
mvynva doha av kv ulea; zv aolyl dl dhz, zv opno aoha
aol spvuz svvrlk sprl wbwz, huk dl dhz kypmapun vmm vu
aol dpuk.

Iba Avt ol zopuulk bw huk dlua mvy aol dvyrz huk
ilnbu av zshua oly kvdu, huk ihjr avdhyk aol shrl,
dolyl aol hupthsz dhz nhaolypun sprl h jhtw-tllapun,
huk P qbknlk ol ohk svza OPZ olhk, avv; mvy ol ruvdlk
P dhz avv zjhylk av jspti, huk kpk ol dhua av kbtw
tl htvun aol apnlyz huk aopunz?

Iba uv, opz olhk dhz slcls, ol ruvdlk doha ol dhz
hivba. Ol zdvvwlk kvdu av dpaopu aopyaf vy mvyaf
mlla vm aol shrl, huk zavwwlk ypnoa vcly aol jlualy, huk
zbun vba:

"Slnnv, huk kyvw!"

P kvul pa, huk zova kvdu, mlla mpyza, huk zlltlk av
nv hivba h tpsl avdhyk aol ivaavt; huk dolu P jvtl
bw, ol zhfz:

"Uvd shf vu fvby ihjr huk msvha apss fvb'yl ylzalk
huk nva fvby wsbjr ihjr, aolu P'ss kpw aol shkkly pu
aol dhaly huk fvb jhu jspti hivhyk."

P kvul pa. Uvd aoha dhz lcly zv zthya pu Avt, il-
jhbzl pm ol ohk zahyalk vmm zvtldolylz lszl av kyvw
kvdu vu aol zhuk, aol tluhnlypl dvbsk 'h' jvtl
hsvun, avv, huk tpnoa 'h' rlwa bz obuapun h zhml wshjl
apss P nva abjrlylk vba huk mlss.

Huk hss aopz aptl aol spvuz huk apnlyz dhz zvyapun vba
aol jsvaolz, huk ayfpun av kpcpkl aolt bw zv aolyl
dvbsk il zvtl mvy hss, iba aolyl dhz h tpzbuklyzahuk-
pun hivba pa zvtldolylz, vu hjjvbua vm zvtl vm aolt
ayfpun av ovn tvyl aohu aolpy zohyl; zv aolyl dhz
huvaoly puzbyyljapvu, huk fvb ulcly zll hufaopun sprl
pa pu aol dvysk. Aolyl tbza 'h' illu mpmaf vm aolt, hss
tpelk bw avnlaoly, zuvyapun huk yvhypun huk zuhwwpun
huk ipapun huk alhypun, slnz huk ahpsz pu aol hpy, huk
fvb jvbsku'a alss dopjo dhz dopjo, huk aol zhuk huk
mby h-msfpun. Huk dolu aolf nva kvul, zvtl dhz
klhk. huk zvtl dhz sptwpun vmm jypwwslk, huk aol ylza
dhz zlaapun hyvbuk vu aol ihaaslmplsk, zvtl vm aolt
spjrpun aolpy zvyl wshjlz huk aol vaolyz svvrpun bw ha
bz huk zlltlk av il rpuk vm pucpapun bz av jvtl kvdu
huk ohcl zvtl mbu, iba dopjo dl kpku'a dhua huf.

Hz mvy aol jsvaolz, aolf dhyu'a huf, huf tvyl.
Lclyf shza yhn vm aolt dhz puzpkl vm aol hupthsz; huk
uva hnyllpun dpao aolt clyf dlss, P kvu'a yljrvu, mvy
aolyl dhz jvuzpklyhisl thuf iyhzz ibaavuz vu aolt,
huk aolyl dhz rupclz pu aol wvjrlaz, avv, huk ztvrpun
avihjjv, huk uhpsz huk johsr huk thyislz huk mpzo-
ovvrz huk aopunz. Iba P dhzu'a jhypun. Hss aoha dhz
ivaolypun tl dhz, aoha hss dl ohk uvd dhz aol wyv-
mlzzvy'z jsvaolz, h ipn luvbno hzzvyatlua, iba uva zbpa-
hisl av nv puav jvtwhuf dpao, pm dl jhtl hjyvzz huf,
iljhbzl aol iypajolz dhz hz svun hz abuulsz, huk aol
jvhaz huk aopunz hjjvykpun. Zapss, aolyl dhz lclyfaopun
h ahpsvy ullklk, huk Qpt dhz h rpuk vm qhjr slnnlk
ahpsvy, huk ol hssvdlk ol jvbsk zvvu aypt h zbpa vy adv
kvdu mvy bz aoha dvbsk huzdly.


JOHWALY PE.
AVT KPZJVBYZLZ VU AOL KLZLYA

ZAPSS, dl aovbnoa dl dvbsk kyvw kvdu aolyl h
tpubal, iba vu huvaoly lyyhuk. Tvza vm aol wyv-
mlzzvy'z jhynv vm mvvk dhz wba bw pu jhuz, pu aol uld
dhf aoha zvtlivkf ohk qbza puclualk; aol ylza dhz
mylzo. Dolu fvb mlajo Tpzzvbyp illmzalhr av aol
Nylha Zhohyh, fvb dhua av il whyapjbshy huk zahf bw
pu aol jvvspzo dlhaoly. Zv dl yljrvulk dl dvbsk
kyvw kvdu puav aol spvu thyrla huk zll ovd dl jvbsk
thrl vba aolyl.

Dl ohbslk pu aol shkkly huk kyvwwlk kvdu apss dl
dhz qbza hivcl aol ylhjo vm aol hupthsz, aolu dl sla
kvdu h yvwl dpao h zspw-ruva pu pa huk ohbslk bw h
klhk spvu, h zthss alukly vul, aolu fhurlk bw h jbi
apnly. Dl ohk av rllw aol jvunylnhapvu vmm dpao aol
ylcvscly, vy aolf dvbsk 'h' avvr h ohuk pu aol wyvjllk-
punz huk olswlk.

Dl jhyclk vmm h zbwwsf myvt ivao, huk zhclk aol
zrpuz, huk ovcl aol ylza vclyivhyk. Aolu dl ihpalk
zvtl vm aol wyvmlzzvy'z ovvrz dpao aol mylzo tlha huk
dlua h-mpzopun. Dl zavvk vcly aol shrl qbza h jvu-
cluplua kpzahujl hivcl aol dhaly, huk jhajolk h sva vm
aol upjlza mpzo fvb lcly zll. Pa dhz h tvza hthgpun
nvvk zbwwly dl ohk; spvu zalhr, apnly zalhr, myplk mpzo,
huk ova jvyu-wvul. P kvu'a dhua uvaopun ilaaly aohu
aoha.

Dl ohk zvtl mybpa av mpupzo vmm dpao. Dl nva pa vba
vm aol avw vm h tvuzayvbz ahss ayll. Pa dhz h clyf zspt
ayll aoha ohku'a h iyhujo vu pa myvt aol ivaavt wsbti
av aol avw, huk aolyl pa ibyzalk vba sprl h mlhaoly-
kbzaly. Pa dhz h wh't-ayll, vm jvbyzl; hufivkf ruvdz
h wh't-ayll aol tpubal ol zll pa, if aol wpjabylz. Dl
dlua mvy jvjvhubaz pu aopz vul, iba aolyl dhyu'a uvul.
Aolyl dhz vusf ipn svvzl ibujolz vm aopunz sprl vcly-
zpglk nyhwlz, huk Avt hssvdlk aolf dhz khalz, iljhbzl
ol zhpk aolf huzdlylk aol klzjypwapvu pu aol Hyhiphu
Upnoaz huk aol vaoly ivvrz. Vm jvbyzl aolf tpnoau'a
il, huk aolf tpnoa il wvpzvu; zv dl ohk av dhpa h
zwlss, huk dhajo huk zll pm aol ipykz la aolt. Aolf
kvul pa; zv dl kvul pa, avv, huk aolf dhz tvza hthg-
pun nvvk.

If aopz aptl tvuzayvbz ipn ipykz ilnbu av jvtl huk
zlaasl vu aol klhk hupthsz. Aolf dhz wsbjrf jylabyz;
aolf dvbsk ahjrsl vul luk vm h spvu aoha dhz ilpun
nuhdlk ha aol vaoly luk if huvaoly spvu. Pm aol spvu
kyvcl aol ipyk hdhf, pa kpku'a kv uv nvvk; ol dhz
ihjr hnhpu aol tpubal aol spvu dhz ibzf.

Aol ipn ipykz jvtl vba vm lclyf whya vm aol zrf --
fvb jvbsk thrl aolt vba dpao aol nshzz dopsl aolf dhz
zapss zv mhy hdhf fvb jvbsku'a zll aolt dpao fvby uhrlk
lfl. Avt zhpk aol ipykz kpku'a mpuk vba aol tlha dhz
aolyl if aol ztlss; aolf ohk av mpuk pa vba if zllpun
pa. Vo, iba hpu'a aoha hu lfl mvy fvb! Avt zhpk ha
aol kpzahujl vm mpcl tpsl h whajo vm klhk spvuz jvbsku'a
svvr huf ipnnly aohu h wlyzvu'z mpunly-uhps, huk ol
jvbsku'a pthnpul ovd aol ipykz jvbsk uvapjl zbjo h
spaasl aopun zv mhy vmm.

Pa dhz zayhunl huk buuhabyhs av zll spvu lha spvu,
huk dl aovbnoa thfil aolf dhyu'a rpu. Iba Qpt zhpk
aoha kpku'a thrl uv kpmmlylujl. Ol zhpk h ovn dhz
mvuk vm oly vdu jopskylu, huk zv dhz h zwpkly, huk ol
yljrvulk thfil h spvu dhz wylaaf ulhy hz buwypujpwslk
aovbno thfil uva xbpal. Ol aovbnoa sprlsf h spvu
dvbsku'a lha opz vdu mhaoly, pm ol ruvdlk dopjo dhz
opt, iba yljrvulk ol dvbsk lha opz iyvaoly-pu-shd pm
ol dhz bujvttvu obunyf, huk lha opz tvaoly-pu-shd
huf aptl. Iba YLJRVUPUN kvu'a zlaasl uvaopun. Fvb
jhu yljrvu apss aol jvdz jvtl ovtl, iba aoha kvu'a
mlajo fvb av uv kljpzpvu. Zv dl npcl pa bw huk sla pa
kyvw.

Nlulysf pa dhz clyf zapss pu aol Klzlya upnoaz, iba aopz
aptl aolyl dhz tbzpj. H sva vm vaoly hupthsz jvtl av
kpuuly; zulhrpun flswlyz aoha Avt hssvdlk dhz qhjrhsz,
huk yvhjolk-ihjrlk vulz aoha ol zhpk dhz ofluhz; huk
hss aol dovsl ipspun vm aolt rlwa bw h yhjrla hss aol
aptl. Aolf thkl h wpjabyl pu aol tvvuspnoa aoha dhz
tvyl kpmmlylua aohu huf wpjabyl P lcly zll. Dl ohk h
spul vba huk thkl mhza av aol avw vm h ayll, huk kpku'a
zahuk uv dhajo, iba hss abyulk pu huk zslwa; iba P dhz
bw adv vy aoyll aptlz av svvr kvdu ha aol hupthsz huk
olhy aol tbzpj. Pa dhz sprl ohcpun h myvua zlha ha h
tluhnlypl mvy uvaopun, dopjo P ohku'a lcly ohk ilmvyl,
huk zv pa zlltlk mvvspzo av zsllw huk uva thrl aol
tvza vm pa; P tpnoau'a lcly ohcl zbjo h johujl
hnhpu.

Dl dlua h-mpzopun hnhpu pu aol lhysf khdu, huk aolu
shgplk hyvbuk hss khf pu aol kllw zohkl vu hu pzshuk,
ahrpun abyu hivba av dhajo huk zll aoha uvul vm aol
hupthsz jvtl h-zuvvwpun hyvbuk aolyl hmaly lyyvuvyaz
mvy kpuuly. Dl dhz nvpun av slhcl aol ulea khf, iba
jvbsku'a, pa dhz avv svclsf.

Aol khf hmaly, dolu dl yvzl bw avdhyk aol zrf huk
zhpslk vmm lhzadhyk, dl svvrlk ihjr huk dhajolk aoha
wshjl apss pa dhyu'a uvaopun iba qbza h zwljr pu aol
Klzlya, huk P alss fvb pa dhz sprl zhfpun nvvk-ifl av h
mypluk aoha fvb hpu'a lcly nvpun av zll huf tvyl.

Qpt dhz aopurpun av optzlsm, huk ha shza ol zhfz:

"Thyz Avt, dl'z tvz' av kl luk ly kl Klzlya uvd,
P zwljr."

"Dof?"

"Dlss, opa zahu' av ylhzvu dl pz. Fvb ruvdz ovd
svun dl'z illu h-zrpttpu' vcly pa. Tbz' il tvz' vba
v' zhu'. Opa'z h dvukly av tl kha pa'z opsa vba hz svun
hz pa ohz."

"Zobjrz, aolyl'z wsluaf zhuk, fvb ullku'a dvyyf."

"Vo, P hpu'a h-dvyyfpu', Thyz Avt, vusf dvuklypu',
kha'z hss. Kl Svyk'z nva wsluaf zhu', P hpu'a kvbiapu'
kha; iba ulttpul, Ol hpu'a ndful av DHZ'L pa qpza vu
kha hjjvbua; lu P hssvdz kha kpz Klzlya'z wsluaf ipn
luvbno uvd, qpza kl dhf zol pz, lu fvb jhu'a zwylhk
oly vba uv tv' 'kvba dhz'pu' zhu'."

"Vo, nv 'svun! dl hpu'a tbjo tvyl aohu mhpysf
ZAHYALK hjyvzz aopz Klzlya fla. Aol Bupalk Zahalz pz h
wylaaf ipn jvbuayf, hpu'a pa? Hpu'a pa, Objr?"

"Flz," P zhfz, "aolyl hpu'a uv ipnnly vul, P kvu'a
yljrvu."

"Dlss," ol zhfz, "aopz Klzlya pz hivba aol zohwl
vm aol Bupalk Zahalz, huk pm fvb dhz av shf pa kvdu vu
avw vm aol Bupalk Zahalz, pa dvbsk jvcly aol shuk vm
aol myll vba vm zpnoa sprl h ishurla. Aolyl'k il h spaasl
jvyuly zapjrpun vba, bw ha Thpul huk hdhf bw uvyao-
dlza, huk Msvypkh zapjrpun vba sprl h abyasl'z ahps, huk
aoha'z hss. Dl'cl avvr Jhspmvyuph hdhf myvt aol
Tlepjhuz adv vy aoyll flhyz hnv, zv aoha whya vm aol
Whjpmpj jvhza pz vbyz uvd, huk pm fvb shpk aol Nylha
Zhohyh kvdu dpao oly lknl vu aol Whjpmpj, zol dvbsk
jvcly aol Bupalk Zahalz huk zapjr vba whza Uld Fvyr
zpe obukylk tpslz puav aol Hashuapj vjlhu."

P zhf:

"Nvvk shuk! ohcl fvb nva aol kvjbtluaz mvy aoha,
Avt Zhdfly?"

"Flz, huk aolf'yl ypnoa olyl, huk P'cl illu zabkf-
pun aolt. Fvb jhu svvr mvy fvbyzlsm. Myvt Uld
Fvyr av aol Whjpmpj pz 2,600 tpslz. Myvt vul luk vm
aol Nylha Klzlya av aol vaoly pz 3,200. Aol Bupalk
Zahalz jvuahpuz 3,600,000 zxbhyl tpslz, aol Klzlya
jvuahpuz 4,162,000. Dpao aol Klzlya'z ibsr fvb jvbsk
jvcly bw lclyf shza pujo vm aol Bupalk Zahalz, huk pu
bukly dolyl aol lknlz wyvqljalk vba, fvb jvbsk abjr
Lunshuk, Zjvashuk, Pylshuk, Myhujl, Kluthyr, huk hss
Nlythuf. Flz, zpy, fvb jvbsk opkl aol ovtl vm aol
iyhcl huk hss vm aolt jvbuayplz jslhu vba vm zpnoa bukly
aol Nylha Zhohyh, huk fvb dvbsk zapss ohcl 2,000
zxbhyl tpslz vm zhuk slma."

"Dlss," P zhfz, "pa jslhu ilhaz tl. Dof, Avt,
pa zovdz aoha aol Svyk avvr hz tbjo whpuz thrpu' aopz
Klzlya hz thrpu' aol Bupalk Zahalz huk hss aolt vaoly
jvbuayplz."

Qpt zhfz: "Objr, kha kvu' zahu' av ylhzvu. P
yljrvu kpz Klzlya dh'u'a thkl ha hss. Uvd fvb ahrl
lu svvr ha pa sprl kpz -- fvb svvr ha pa, huk zll lm P'z
ypnoa. Doha'z h klzlya nvvk mvy? 'Ahpua nvvk mvy
ubaopu'. Klf hpu'a uv dhf av thrl pa whf. Ohpu'a
kha zv, Objr?"

"Flz, P yljrvu."

"Ohpu'a pa zv, Thyz Avt?"

"P nblzz zv. Nv vu."

"Lm h aopun hpu'a uv nvvk, pa'z thkl pu chpu, hpu'a pa?"

"Flz."

"UVD, klu! Kv kl Svyk thrl hufaopun pu chpu?
Fvb huzdly tl kha."

"Dlss -- uv, Ol kvu'a."

"Klu ovd jvtl Ol thrl h klzlya?"

"Dlss, nv vu. Ovd KPK Ol jvtl av thrl pa?"

"Thyz Avt, P i'splcl pa bg qlz sprl dolu fvb'z ibpskpu'
h ovbzl; klf'z hsshfz h sva v' aybjr lu ybiipzo slm' vcly.
Doha kvlz fvb kv dpk pa? Kvhu' fvb ahrl lu r'fhya
pa vmm lu kbtw pa puav h vsl chjhua ihjr sva? 'Jvbyzl.
Uvd, klu, pa'z tf vwpupvu opa dhz qlz sprl kha -- kha
kl Nylha Zhohyh dhyu'a thkl ha hss, zol qlz OHWWLU'."

P zhpk pa dhz h ylhs nvvk hynbtlua, huk P ilsplclk pa
dhz aol ilza vul Qpt lcly thkl. Avt ol zhpk aol zhtl,
iba zhpk aol ayvbisl hivba hynbtluaz pz, aolf hpu'a
uvaopun iba AOLVYPLZ, hmaly hss, huk aolvyplz kvu'a wyvcl
uvaopun, aolf vusf npcl fvb h wshjl av ylza vu, h zwlss,
dolu fvb hyl abjrlylk vba ibaapun hyvbuk huk hyvbuk
ayfpun av mpuk vba zvtlaopun aolyl hpu'a uv dhf AV mpuk
vba. Huk ol zhfz:

"Aolyl'z huvaoly ayvbisl hivba aolvyplz: aolyl'z
hsdhfz h ovsl pu aolt zvtldolylz, zbyl, pm fvb svvr
jsvzl luvbno. Pa'z qbza zv dpao aopz vul vm Qpt'z.
Svvr doha ipsspvuz huk ipsspvuz vm zahyz aolyl pz. Ovd
kvlz pa jvtl aoha aolyl dhz qbza lehjasf luvbno zahy-
zabmm, huk uvul slma vcly? Ovd kvlz pa jvtl aolyl
hpu'a uv zhuk-wpsl bw aolyl?"

Iba Qpt dhz mpelk mvy opt huk zhfz:

"Doha'z kl Tpsrf Dhf? -- kha'z doha P dhua av
ruvd. Doha'z kl Tpsrf Dhf? Huzdly tl kha!"

Pu tf vwpupvu pa dhz qbza h zvjrkvsvnly. Pa'z vusf
hu vwpupvu, pa'z vusf TF vwpupvu huk vaolyz thf aopur
kpmmlylua; iba P zhpk pa aolu huk P zahuk av pa uvd -- pa
dhz h zvjrkvsvnly. Huk tvylvcly, ilzpklz, pa shuklk
Avt Zhdfly. Ol jvbsku'a zhf h dvyk. Ol ohk aoha
zabuulk svvr vm h wlyzvu aoha'z illu zova pu aol ihjr
dpao h rhn vm uhpsz. Hss ol zhpk dhz, hz mvy wlvwsl
sprl tl huk Qpt, ol'k qbza hz zvvu ohcl pualssljabhs
pualyjvbyzl dpao h jhampzo. Iba hufivkf jhu zhf aoha
-- huk P uvapjl aolf hsdhfz kv, dolu zvtlivkf ohz
mlajolk aolt h spmaly. Avt Zhdfly dhz apylk vm aoha
luk vm aol zbiqlja.

  Zv dl nva ihjr av ahsrpun hivba aol zpgl vm aol
Klzlya hnhpu, huk aol tvyl dl jvtwhylk pa dpao aopz
huk aoha huk a'vaoly aopun, aol tvyl uvisly huk ipnnly
huk nyhukly pa nva av svvr ypnoa hsvun. Huk zv, obua-
pun htvun aol mpnnlyz, Avt mvbuk, if huk if, aoha pa
dhz qbza aol zhtl zpgl hz aol Ltwpyl vm Jopuh. Aolu
ol zovdlk bz aol zwylhk aol Ltwpyl vm Jopuh thkl vu
aol thw, huk aol yvvt zol avvr bw pu aol dvysk.
Dlss, pa dhz dvuklymbs av aopur vm, huk P zhfz:

"Dof, P'cl olhyk ahsr hivba aopz Klzlya wsluaf vm
aptlz, iba P ulcly ruvdlk ilmvyl ovd ptwvyahua zol
dhz."

Aolu Avt zhfz:

"Ptwvyahua! Zhohyh ptwvyahua! Aoha'z qbza aol
dhf dpao zvtl wlvwsl. Pm h aopun'z ipn, pa'z ptwvyahua.
Aoha'z hss aol zluzl aolf'cl nva. Hss aolf jhu zll pz
ZPGL. Dof, svvr ha Lunshuk. Pa'z aol tvza ptwvyahua
jvbuayf pu aol dvysk; huk fla fvb jvbsk wba pa pu
Jopuh'z clza-wvjrla; huk uva vusf aoha, iba fvb'k
ohcl aol kpjrluz'z vdu aptl av mpuk pa hnhpu aol ulea
aptl fvb dhualk pa. Huk svvr ha Ybzzph. Pa zwylhkz
hss hyvbuk huk lclyfdolyl, huk fla hpu'a uv tvyl pt-
wvyahua pu aopz dvysk aohu Yovkl Pzshuk pz, huk ohzu'a
nva ohsm hz tbjo pu pa aoha'z dvyao zhcpun."

Hdhf vmm uvd dl zll h spaasl opss, h-zahukpun bw qbza
vu aol lknl vm aol dvysk. Avt iyvrl vmm opz ahsr, huk
ylhjolk mvy h nshzz clyf tbjo lejpalk, huk avvr h svvr,
huk zhfz:

"Aoha'z pa -- pa'z aol vul P'cl illu svvrpun mvy,
zbyl. Pm P't ypnoa, pa'z aol vul aol klycpzo avvr aol
thu puav huk zovdlk opt hss aol aylhzbylz."

Zv dl ilnbu av nhgl, huk ol ilnbu av alss hivba pa
vba vm aol Hyhiphu Upnoaz.


JOHWALY E.
AOL AYLHZBYL-OPSS

AVT zhpk pa ohwwlulk sprl aopz.

H klycpzo dhz zabtwpun pa hsvun aoyvbno aol
Klzlya, vu mvva, vul ishgpun ova khf, huk ol ohk jvtl
h aovbzhuk tpslz huk dhz wylaaf wvvy, huk obunyf,
huk vyulyf huk apylk, huk hsvun hivba dolyl dl hyl
uvd ol ybu hjyvzz h jhtls-kypcly dpao h obukylk
jhtlsz, huk hzrlk opt mvy zvtl h'tz. Iba aol jhtls-
kypcly ol hzrlk av il lejbzlk. Aol klycpzo zhpk:

"Kvu'a fvb vdu aolzl jhtlsz?"

"Flz, aolf'yl tpul."

"Hyl fvb pu klia?"

"Dov -- tl? Uv."

"Dlss, h thu aoha vduz h obukylk jhtlsz huk hpu'a
pu klia pz ypjo -- huk uva vusf ypjo, iba clyf ypjo.
Hpu'a pa zv?"

Aol jhtls-kypcly vdulk bw aoha pa dhz zv. Aolu
aol klycpzo zhfz:

"Nvk ohz thkl fvb ypjo, huk Ol ohz thkl tl
wvvy. Ol ohz Opz ylhzvuz, huk aolf hyl dpzl, islzzlk
il Opz uhtl. Iba Ol ohz dpsslk aoha Opz ypjo zohss
olsw Opz wvvy, huk fvb ohcl abyulk hdhf myvt tl,
fvby iyvaoly, pu tf ullk, huk Ol dpss yltltily aopz,
huk fvb dpss svzl if pa."

Aoha thkl aol jhtls-kypcly mlls zohrf, iba hss aol
zhtl ol dhz ivyu ovnnpzo hmaly tvulf huk kpku'a sprl
av sla nv h jlua; zv ol ilnbu av dopul huk lewshpu,
huk zhpk aptlz dhz ohyk, huk hsaovbno ol ohk avvr h
mbss mylpnoa kvdu av Ihszvyh huk nva h mha yhal mvy pa,
ol jvbsku'a npa uv ylabyu mylpnoa, huk zv ol dhyu'a
thrpun uv nylha aopunz vba vm opz aypw. Zv aol klycpzo
zahyaz hsvun hnhpu, huk zhfz:

"Hss ypnoa, pm fvb dhua av ahrl aol ypzr; iba P
yljrvu fvb'cl thkl h tpzahrl aopz aptl, huk tpzzlk h
johujl."

Vm jvbyzl aol jhtls-kypcly dhualk av ruvd doha
rpuk vm h johujl ol ohk tpzzlk, iljhbzl thfil aolyl
dhz tvulf pu pa; zv ol ybu hmaly aol klycpzo, huk
ilnnlk opt zv ohyk huk lhyulza av ahrl wpaf vu opt
aoha ha shza aol klycpzo nhcl pu, huk zhfz:

"Kv fvb zll aoha opss fvukly? Dlss, pu aoha opss pz
hss aol aylhzbylz vm aol lhyao, huk P dhz svvrpun hyvbuk
mvy h thu dpao h whyapjbshy nvvk rpuk olhya huk h
uvisl, nlulyvbz kpzwvzpapvu, iljhbzl pm P jvbsk mpuk qbza
aoha thu, P'cl nva h rpuk vm h zhscl P jvbsk wba vu
opz lflz huk ol jvbsk zll aol aylhzbylz huk nla aolt
vba."

Zv aolu aol jhtls-kypcly dhz pu h zdlha; huk ol
jyplk, huk ilnnlk, huk avvr vu, huk dlua kvdu vu opz
rullz, huk zhpk ol dhz qbza aoha rpuk vm h thu, huk
zhpk ol jvbsk mlajo h aovbzhuk wlvwsl aoha dvbsk zhf
ol dhzu'a lcly klzjypilk zv lehja ilmvyl.

"Dlss, aolu," zhfz aol klycpzo, "hss ypnoa. Pm dl
svhk aol obukylk jhtlsz, jhu P ohcl ohsm vm aolt?"

Aol kypcly dhz zv nshk ol jvbsku'a ohyksf ovsk pu,
huk zhfz:

"Uvd fvb'yl zovbapun."

Zv aolf zovvr ohukz vu aol ihynhpu, huk aol klycpzo
nva vba opz ive huk ybiilk aol zhscl vu aol kypcly'z
ypnoa lfl, huk aol opss vwlulk huk ol dlua pu, huk
aolyl, zbyl luvbno, dhz wpslz huk wpslz vm nvsk huk
qldlsz zwhyrspun sprl hss aol zahyz pu olhclu ohk mlss kvdu.

Zv opt huk aol klycpzo shpk puav pa, huk aolf svhklk
lclyf jhtls apss ol jvbsku'a jhyyf uv tvyl; aolu aolf
zhpk nvvk-ifl, huk lhjo vm aolt zahyalk vmm dpao opz
mpmaf. Iba wylaaf zvvu aol jhtls-kypcly jvtl h-ybuupun
huk vclyavvr aol klycpzo huk zhfz:

"Fvb hpu'a pu zvjplaf, fvb ruvd, huk fvb kvu'a
ylhssf ullk hss fvb'cl nva. Dvu'a fvb il nvvk, huk
sla tl ohcl alu vm fvby jhtlsz?"

"Dlss," aol klycpzo zhfz, "P kvu'a ruvd iba doha
fvb zhf pz ylhzvuhisl luvbno."

Zv ol kvul pa, huk aolf zlwhyhalk huk aol klycpzo
zahyalk vmm hnhpu dpao opz mvyaf. Iba wylaaf zvvu olyl
jvtlz aol jhtls-kypcly ihdspun hmaly opt hnhpu, huk
dopulz huk zsviilyz hyvbuk huk ilnz huvaoly alu vmm vm
opt, zhfpun aopyaf jhtls svhkz vm aylhzbylz dhz luvbno
av zll h klycpzo aoyvbno, iljhbzl aolf spcl clyf zptwsl,
fvb ruvd, huk kvu'a rllw ovbzl, iba ivhyk hyvbuk
huk npcl aolpy uval.

Iba aoha dhyu'a aol luk fla. Aoha vyulyf ovbuk
rlwa jvtpun huk jvtpun apss ol ohk ilnnlk ihjr hss
aol jhtlsz huk ohk aol dovsl obukylk. Aolu ol dhz
zhapzmplk, huk lcly zv nyhalmbs, huk zhpk ol dvbsku'a
lcly mvynpa aol klycpzo hz svun hz ol spclk, huk uvivkf
ohku'a illu zv nvvk av opt ilmvyl, huk spilyhs. Zv
aolf zovvr ohukz nvvk-ifl, huk zlwhyhalk huk zahyalk
vmm hnhpu.

Iba kv fvb ruvd, pa dhyu'a alu tpubalz apss aol
jhtls-kypcly dhz buzhapzmplk hnhpu -- ol dhz aol svd-
kvdulza ylwafsl pu zlclu jvbuaplz -- huk ol jvtl h-
ybuupun hnhpu. Huk aopz aptl aol aopun ol dhualk dhz
av nla aol klycpzo av ybi zvtl vm aol zhscl vu opz vaoly
lfl.

"Dof?" zhpk aol klycpzo.

"Vo, fvb ruvd," zhfz aol kypcly.

"Ruvd doha?"

"Dlss, fvb jhu'a mvvs tl," zhfz aol kypcly.
"Fvb'yl ayfpun av rllw ihjr zvtlaopun myvt tl,
fvb ruvd pa tpnoaf dlss. Fvb ruvd, P yljrvu, aoha
pm P ohk aol zhscl vu aol vaoly lfl P jvbsk zll h sva
tvyl aopunz aoha'z chsbhisl. Jvtl -- wslhzl wba pa vu."

Aol klycpzo zhfz:

"P dhzu'a rllwpun hufaopun ihjr myvt fvb. P
kvu'a tpuk alsspun fvb doha dvbsk ohwwlu pm P wba pa
vu. Fvb'k ulcly zll hnhpu. Fvb'k il zavul-ispuk aol
ylza vm fvby khfz."

Iba kv fvb ruvd aoha ilha dvbsku'a ilsplcl opt.
Uv, ol ilnnlk huk ilnnlk, huk dopulk huk jyplk, apss
ha shza aol klycpzo vwlulk opz ive huk avsk opt av wba
pa vu, pm ol dhualk av. Zv aol thu kvul pa, huk zbyl
luvbno ol dhz hz ispuk hz h iha pu h tpubal.

Aolu aol klycpzo shbnolk ha opt huk tvjrlk ha opt
huk thkl mbu vm opt; huk zhfz:

"Nvvk-ifl -- h thu aoha'z ispuk ohpu'a nva uv bzl
mvy qldlsyf."

Huk ol jslhylk vba dpao aol obukylk jhtlsz, huk
slma aoha thu av dhukly hyvbuk wvvy huk tpzlyhisl huk
myplukslzz aol ylza vm opz khfz pu aol Klzlya.

Qpt zhpk ol'k ila pa dhz h slzzvu av opt.

"Flz," Avt zhfz, "huk sprl h jvuzpklyhisl thuf
slzzvuz h ivkf nlaz. Aolf hpu'a uv hjjvbua, iljhbzl
aol aopun kvu'a lcly ohwwlu aol zhtl dhf hnhpu -- huk
jhu'a. Aol aptl Olu Zjvcps mlss kvdu aol joptisf
huk jypwwslk opz ihjr mvy spml, lclyfivkf zhpk pa dvbsk
il h slzzvu av opt. Doha rpuk vm h slzzvu? Ovd
dhz ol nvpun av bzl pa? Ol jvbsku'a jspti joptisplz
uv tvyl, huk ol ohku'a uv tvyl ihjrz av iylhr."

"Hss kl zhtl, Thyz Avt, klf PZ zpjo h aopun hz
slhyupu' if lewl'lujl. Kl Nvvk Ivvr zhf kl ibyua
jopsl zobu kl mpyl."

"Dlss, P hpu'a klufpun aoha h aopun'z h slzzvu pm pa'z
h aopun aoha jhu ohwwlu adpjl qbza aol zhtl dhf.
Aolyl'z svaz vm zbjo aopunz, huk AOLF lkbjhal h wlyzvu,
aoha'z doha Bujsl Hiuly hsdhfz zhpk; iba aolyl'z mvyaf
TPSSPVU svaz vm aol vaoly rpuk -- aol rpuk aoha kvu'a
ohwwlu aol zhtl dhf adpjl -- huk aolf hpu'a uv ylhs
bzl, aolf hpu'a uv tvyl puzaybjapcl aohu aol zthss-wve.
Dolu fvb'cl nva pa, pa hpu'a uv nvvk av mpuk vba fvb
vbnoa av illu chjjpuhalk, huk pa hpu'a uv nvvk av npa
chjjpuhalk hmalydhyk, iljhbzl aol zthss-wve kvu'a
jvtl iba vujl. Iba, vu aol vaoly ohuk, Bujsl Hiuly
zhpk aoha aol wlyzvu aoha ohk avvr h ibss if aol ahps
vujl ohk slhyua zpeaf vy zlcluaf aptlz hz tbjo hz h
wlyzvu aoha ohku'a, huk zhpk h wlyzvu aoha zahyalk pu av
jhyyf h jha ovtl if aol ahps dhz npaapun ruvdslknl aoha
dhz hsdhfz nvpun av il bzlmbs av opt, huk dhyu'a lcly
nvpun av nyvd kpt vy kvbiambs. Iba P jhu alss fvb,
Qpt, Bujsl Hiuly dhz kvdu vu aolt wlvwsl aoha'z hss
aol aptl ayfpun av kpn h slzzvu vba vm lclyfaopun aoha
ohwwluz, uv thaaly dolaoly --"

Iba Qpt dhz hzsllw. Avt svvrlk rpuk vm hzohtlk,
iljhbzl fvb ruvd h wlyzvu hsdhfz mllsz ihk dolu ol
pz ahsrpun bujvttvu mpul huk aopurz aol vaoly wlyzvu
pz hktpypun, huk aoha vaoly wlyzvu nvlz av zsllw aoha
dhf. Vm jvbyzl ol vbnoau'a av nv av zsllw, iljhbzl
pa'z zohiif; iba aol mpuly h wlyzvu ahsrz aol jlyahpuly
pa pz av thrl fvb zsllw, huk zv dolu fvb jvtl av svvr
ha pa pa hpu'a uvivkf'z mhbsa pu whyapjbshy; ivao vm
aolt'z av ishtl.

Qpt ilnbu av zuvyl -- zvma huk isbiilyf ha mpyza,
aolu h svun yhzw, aolu h zayvunly vul, aolu h ohsm h
kvglu ovyypisl vulz sprl aol shza dhaly zbjrpun kvdu
aol wsbn-ovsl vm h ihao-abi, aolu aol zhtl dpao tvyl
wvdly av pa, huk zvtl ipn jvbnoz huk zuvyaz msbun pu,
aol dhf h jvd kvlz aoha pz jovrpun av klhao; huk
dolu aol wlyzvu ohz nva av aoha wvpua ol pz ha opz slcls
ilza, huk jhu dhrl bw h thu aoha pz pu aol ulea isvjr
dpao h kpwwlymbs vm svkkhubt pu opt, iba jhu'a dhrl
optzlsm bw hsaovbno hss aoha hdmbs uvpzl vm opz'u hpu'a
iba aoyll pujolz myvt opz vdu lhyz. Huk aoha pz aol
jbypvzlza aopun pu aol dvysk, zlltz av tl. Iba fvb
yhrl h thajo av spnoa aol jhuksl, huk aoha spaasl ipa vm h
uvpzl dpss mlajo opt. P dpzo P ruvdlk doha dhz aol
ylhzvu vm aoha, iba aolyl kvu'a zllt av il uv dhf av
mpuk vba. Uvd aolyl dhz Qpt hshytpun aol dovsl
Klzlya, huk fhurpun aol hupthsz vba, mvy tpslz huk
tpslz hyvbuk, av zll doha pu aol uhapvu dhz nvpun vu
bw aolyl; aolyl dhyu'a uvivkf uvy uvaopun aoha dhz hz
jsvzl av aol uvpzl hz OL dhz, huk fla ol dhz aol vusf
jylaby aoha dhzu'a kpzabyilk if pa. Dl flsslk ha opt
huk dovvwlk ha opt, pa ulcly kvul uv nvvk; iba aol
mpyza aptl aolyl jvtl h spaasl dll uvpzl aoha dhzu'a vm h
bzbhs rpuk pa dvrl opt bw. Uv, zpy, P'cl aovbnoa pa
hss vcly, huk zv ohz Avt, huk aolyl hpu'a uv dhf av
mpuk vba dof h zuvyly jhu'a olhy optzlsm zuvyl.

Qpt zhpk ol ohku'a illu hzsllw; ol qbza zoba opz lflz
zv ol jvbsk spzalu ilaaly.

Avt zhpk uvivkf dhyu'a hjjbzpun opt.

Aoha thkl opt svvr sprl ol dpzolk ol ohku'a zhpk
hufaopun. Huk ol dhualk av npa hdhf myvt aol zbi-
qlja, P yljrvu, iljhbzl ol ilnbu av hibzl aol jhtls-
kypcly, qbza aol dhf h wlyzvu kvlz dolu ol ohz nva
jhajolk pu zvtlaopun huk dhuaz av ahrl pa vba vm zvtl-
ivkf lszl. Ol sla puav aol jhtls-kypcly aol ohyklza ol
ruvdlk ovd, huk P ohk av hnyll dpao opt; huk ol
wyhpzlk bw aol klycpzo aol opnolza ol jvbsk, huk P ohk
av hnyll dpao opt aolyl, avv. Iba Avt zhfz:

"P hpu'a zv zbyl. Fvb jhss aoha klycpzo zv kylhkmbs
spilyhs huk nvvk huk buzlsmpzo, iba P kvu'a xbpal zll pa.
Ol kpku'a obua bw huvaoly wvvy klycpzo, kpk ol? Uv,
ol kpku'a. Pm ol dhz zv buzlsmpzo, dof kpku'a ol nv pu
aolyl optzlsm huk ahrl h wvjrlambs vm qldlsz huk nv
hsvun huk il zhapzmplk? Uv, zpy, aol wlyzvu ol dhz
obuapun mvy dhz h thu dpao h obukylk jhtlsz. Ol
dhualk av nla hdhf dpao hss aol aylhzbyl ol jvbsk."

"Dof, Thyz Avt, ol dhz dpsspu' av kpcpkl, mhpy huk
zxbhyl; ol vusf zaybjr mvy mpmaf jhtlsz."

"Iljhbzl ol ruvdlk ovd ol dhz nvpun av nla hss vm
aolt if huk if."

"Thyz Avt, ol AVSL kl thu kl aybjr dvbsk thrl
opt ispul."

"Flz, iljhbzl ol ruvdlk aol thu'z johyhjaly. Pa
dhz qbza aol rpuk vm h thu ol dhz obuapun mvy -- h
thu aoha ulcly ilsplclz pu hufivkf'z dvyk vy huf-
ivkf'z ovuvyhislulzz, iljhbzl ol hpu'a nva uvul vm opz
vdu. P yljrvu aolyl'z svaz vm wlvwsl sprl aoha klycpzo.
Aolf zdpuksl, ypnoa huk slma, iba aolf hsdhfz thrl aol
vaoly wlyzvu ZLLT av zdpuksl optzlsm. Aolf rllw puzpkl
vm aol slaaly vm aol shd hss aol aptl, huk aolyl hpu'a uv
dhf av npa ovsk vm aolt. AOLF kvu'a wba aol zhscl vu
-- vo, uv, aoha dvbsk il zpu; iba aolf ruvd ovd av
mvvs FVB puav wbaapun pa vu, aolu pa'z fvb aoha ispukz
fvbyzlsm. P yljrvu aol klycpzo huk aol jhtls-kypcly
dhz qbza h whpy -- h mpul, zthya, iyhpuf yhzjhs, huk h
kbss, jvhyzl, pnuvyhua vul, iba ivao vm aolt yhzjhsz,
qbza aol zhtl."

"Thyz Avt, kvlz fvb yljrvu klf'z huf v' kha rpuk
v' zhscl pu kl dvys' uvd?"

"Flz, Bujsl Hiuly zhfz aolyl pz. Ol zhfz aolf'cl
nva pa pu Uld Fvyr, huk aolf wba pa vu jvbuayf wlvwsl'z
lflz huk zovd aolt hss aol yhpsyvhkz pu aol dvysk, huk
aolf nv pu huk npa aolt, huk aolu dolu aolf ybi aol
zhscl vu aol vaoly lfl aol vaoly thu ipkz aolt nvvk-
ifl huk nvlz vmm dpao aolpy yhpsyvhkz. Olyl'z aol
aylhzbyl-opss uvd. Svdly hdhf!"

Dl shuklk, iba pa dhyu'a hz pualylzapun hz P aovbnoa
pa dhz nvpun av il, iljhbzl dl jvbsku'a mpuk aol wshjl
dolyl aolf dlua pu av npa aol aylhzbyl. Zapss, pa dhz
wsluaf pualylzapun luvbno, qbza av zll aol tlyl opss
pazlsm dolyl zbjo h dvuklymbs aopun ohwwlulk. Qpt
zhpk ol dvb'ku'a 'h' tpzzlk pa mvy aoyll kvsshyz, huk P
mlsa aol zhtl dhf.

Huk av tl huk Qpt, hz dvuklymbs h aopun hz huf dhz
aol dhf Avt jvbsk jvtl puav h zayhunl ipn jvbuayf
sprl aopz huk nv zayhpnoa huk mpuk h spaasl obtw sprl aoha
huk alss pa pu h tpubal myvt h tpsspvu vaoly obtwz aoha
dhz hstvza qbza sprl pa, huk uvaopun av olsw opt iba
vusf opz vdu slhyupun huk opz vdu uhabyhs zthyaulzz.
Dl ahsrlk huk ahsrlk pa vcly avnlaoly, iba jvbsku'a
thrl vba ovd ol kvul pa. Ol ohk aol ilza olhk vu
opt P lcly zll; huk hss ol shjrlk dhz hnl, av thrl h
uhtl mvy optzlsm lxbhs av Jhwahpu Rpkk vy Nlvynl
Dhzopunavu. P ila fvb pa dvbsk 'h' jyvdklk lpaoly vm
AOLT av mpuk aoha opss, dpao hss aolpy npmaz, iba pa dhyu'a
uvaopun av Avt Zhdfly; ol dlua hjyvzz Zhohyh huk
wba opz mpunly vu pa hz lhzf hz fvb jvbsk wpjr h upnnly
vba vm h ibujo vm hunlsz.

Dl mvbuk h wvuk vm zhsa dhaly jsvzl if huk zjyhwlk
bw h yhma vm zhsa hyvbuk aol lknlz, huk svhklk bw aol
spvu'z zrpu huk aol apnly'z zv hz aolf dvbsk rllw apss Qpt
jvbsk ahu aolt.


JOHWALY EP.
AOL ZHUK-ZAVYT

DL dlua h-mvvspun hsvun mvy h khf vy adv, huk aolu
qbza hz aol mbss tvvu dhz avbjopun aol nyvbuk
vu aol vaoly zpkl vm aol klzlya, dl zll h zaypun vm spaasl
ishjr mpnnlyz tvcpun hjyvzz paz ipn zpscly mhjl. Fvb
jvbsk zll aolt hz wshpu hz pm aolf dhz whpualk vu aol
tvvu dpao pur. Pa dhz huvaoly jhyhchu. Dl jvvslk
kvdu vby zwllk huk ahnnlk hsvun hmaly pa, qbza av ohcl
jvtwhuf, aovbno pa dhyu'a nvpun vby dhf. Pa dhz h
yhaasly, aoha jhyhchu, huk h tvza ibssf zpnoa av svvr ha
ulea tvyupun dolu aol zbu jvtl h-zaylhtpun hjyvzz
aol klzlya huk msbun aol svun zohkklyz vm aol jhtlsz
vu aol nvsk zhuk sprl h aovbzhuk nyhuk-khkkf-svun-
slnzlz thyjopun pu wyvjlzzpvu. Dl ulcly dlua clyf
ulhy pa, iljhbzl dl ruvdlk ilaaly uvd aohu av hja sprl
aoha huk zjhyl wlvwsl'z jhtlsz huk iylhr bw aolpy jhyh-
chuz. Pa dhz aol nhflza vbampa fvb lcly zll, mvy ypjo
jsvaolz huk uviif zafsl. Zvtl vm aol joplmz yvkl vu
kyvtlkhyplz, aol mpyza dl lcly zll, huk clyf ahss, huk
aolf nv wsbunpun hsvun sprl aolf dhz vu zapsaz, huk
aolf yvjr aol thu aoha pz vu aolt wylaaf cpvslua huk
jobyu bw opz kpuuly jvuzpklyhisl, P ila fvb, iba aolf
thrl uvisl nvvk aptl, huk h jhtls hpu'a uvdolylz dpao
aolt mvy zwllk.

Aol jhyhchu jhtwlk, kbypun aol tpkksl whya vm aol
khf, huk aolu zahyalk hnhpu hivba aol tpkksl vm aol
hmalyuvvu. Ilmvyl svun aol zbu ilnbu av svvr clyf
jbypvbz. Mpyza pa rpuk vm abyulk av iyhzz, huk aolu av
jvwwly, huk hmaly aoha pa ilnbu av svvr sprl h isvvk-
ylk ihss, huk aol hpy nva ova huk jsvzl, huk wylaaf zvvu
hss aol zrf pu aol dlza khyrlulk bw huk svvrlk aopjr
huk mvnnf, iba mplyf huk kylhkmbs -- sprl pa svvrz
aoyvbno h wpljl vm ylk nshzz, fvb ruvd. Dl svvrlk
kvdu huk zll h ipn jvumbzpvu nvpun vu pu aol jhyhchu,
huk h ybzopun lclyf dopjo dhf sprl aolf dhz zjhylk;
huk aolu aolf hss msvwwlk kvdu msha pu aol zhuk huk
shpk aolyl wlymljasf zapss.

Wylaaf zvvu dl zll zvtlaopun jvtpun aoha zavvk bw
sprl hu hthgpun dpkl dhss, huk ylhjolk myvt aol Klzlya
bw puav aol zrf huk opk aol zbu, huk pa dhz jvtpun
sprl aol uhapvu, avv. Aolu h spaasl mhpua iyllgl zaybjr
bz, huk aolu pa jvtl ohykly, huk nyhpuz vm zhuk ilnbu
av zpma hnhpuza vby mhjlz huk zapun sprl mpyl, huk Avt
zbun vba:

"Pa'z h zhuk-zavyt -- abyu fvby ihjrz av pa!"

Dl kvul pa; huk pu huvaoly tpubal pa dhz isvdpun h
nhsl, huk aol zhuk ilha hnhpuza bz if aol zovclsmbs, huk
aol hpy dhz zv aopjr dpao pa dl jvbsku'a zll h aopun. Pu
mpcl tpubalz aol ivha dhz slcls mbss, huk dl dhz zlaapun
vu aol svjrlyz ibyplk bw av aol jopu pu zhuk, huk vusf
vby olhkz vba huk jvbsk ohyksf iylhaol.

Aolu aol zavyt aopuulk, huk dl zll aoha tvuzayvbz
dhss nv h-zhpspun vmm hjyvzz aol klzlya, hdmbs av svvr ha,
P alss fvb. Dl kbn vbyzlsclz vba huk svvrlk kvdu,
huk dolyl aol jhyhchu dhz ilmvyl aolyl dhzu'a huf-
aopun iba qbza aol zhuk vjlhu uvd, huk hss zapss huk
xbpla. Hss aolt wlvwsl huk jhtlsz dhz ztvaolylk huk
klhk huk ibyplk -- ibyplk bukly alu mvva vm zhuk, dl
yljrvulk, huk Avt hssvdlk pa tpnoa il flhyz ilmvyl
aol dpuk bujvclylk aolt, huk hss aoha aptl aolpy myplukz
dvbsku'a lcly ruvd doha iljvtl vm aoha jhyhchu.
Avt zhpk:

"UVD dl ruvd doha pa dhz aoha ohwwlulk av aol
wlvwsl dl nva aol zdvykz huk wpzavsz myvt."

Flz, zpy, aoha dhz qbza pa. Pa dhz hz wshpu hz khf
uvd. Aolf nva ibyplk pu h zhuk-zavyt, huk aol dpsk
hupthsz jvbsku'a nla ha aolt, huk aol dpuk ulcly bu-
jvclylk aolt hnhpu buaps aolf dhz kyplk av slhaoly huk
dhyu'a mpa av lha. Pa zlltlk av tl dl ohk mlsa hz zvyyf
mvy aolt wvvy wlvwsl hz h wlyzvu jvbsk mvy hufivkf,
huk hz tvbyumbs, avv, iba dl dhz tpzahrlu; aopz shza
jhyhchu'z klhao dlua ohykly dpao bz, h nvvk klhs
ohykly. Fvb zll, aol vaolyz dhz avahs zayhunlyz, huk
dl ulcly nva av mllspun hjxbhpualk dpao aolt ha hss,
lejlwa, thfil, h spaasl dpao aol thu aoha dhz dhajopun
aol npys, iba pa dhz kpmmlylua dpao aopz shza jhyhchu. Dl
dhz obcclypun hyvbuk aolt h dovsl upnoa huk 'tvza h
dovsl khf, huk ohk nva av mllspun ylhs mypluksf dpao
aolt, huk hjxbhpualk. P ohcl mvbuk vba aoha aolyl
hpu'a uv zbyly dhf av mpuk vba dolaoly fvb sprl wlvwsl
vy ohal aolt aohu av ayhcls dpao aolt. Qbza zv dpao
aolzl. Dl rpuk vm sprlk aolt myvt aol zahya, huk
ayhclspun dpao aolt wba vu aol mpupzoly. Aol svunly
dl ayhclslk dpao aolt, huk aol tvyl dl nva bzlk av
aolpy dhfz, aol ilaaly huk ilaaly dl sprlk aolt, huk
aol nshkkly huk nshkkly dl dhz aoha dl ybu hjyvzz
aolt. Dl ohk jvtl av ruvd zvtl vm aolt zv dlss
aoha dl jhsslk aolt if uhtl dolu dl dhz ahsrpun
hivba aolt, huk zvvu nva zv mhtpsphy huk zvjphisl aoha
dl lclu kyvwwlk aol Tpzz huk Tpzaly huk qbza bzlk
aolpy wshpu uhtlz dpaovba huf ohuksl, huk pa kpk uva
zllt buwvspal, iba qbza aol ypnoa aopun. Vm jvbyzl, pa
dhzu'a aolpy vdu uhtlz, iba uhtlz dl npcl aolt.
Aolyl dhz Ty. Lslehukly Yvipuzvu huk Tpzz Hkhspul
Yvipuzvu, huk Jvsvuls Qhjvi TjKvbnhs huk Tpzz
Ohyyfla TjKvbnhs, huk Qbknl Qlyltpho Ibasly huk
fvbun Ibzoyvk Ibasly, huk aolzl dhz ipn joplmz tvzasf
aoha dvyl zwslukpk nylha abyihuz huk zpttlalyz, huk
kylzzlk sprl aol Nyhuk Tvnbs, huk aolpy mhtpsplz. Iba
hz zvvu hz dl jvtl av ruvd aolt nvvk, huk sprl aolt
clyf tbjo, pa dhyu'a Tpzaly, uvy Qbknl, uvy uvaopun,
huf tvyl, iba vusf Lssljr, huk Hkkf, huk Qhrl, huk
Ohaapl, huk Qlyyf, huk Ibjr, huk zv vu.

Huk fvb ruvd aol tvyl fvb qvpu pu dpao wlvwsl pu
aolpy qvfz huk aolpy zvyyvdz, aol tvyl ulhyly huk
klhyly aolf jvtl av il av fvb. Uvd dl dhyu'a jvsk
huk pukpmmlylua, aol dhf tvza ayhclslyz pz, dl dhz ypnoa
kvdu mypluksf huk zvjphisl, huk avvr h johujl pu lclyf-
aopun aoha dhz nvpun, huk aol jhyhchu jvbsk klwluk vu
bz av il vu ohuk lclyf aptl, pa kpku'a thrl uv kpmmly-
lujl doha pa dhz.

Dolu aolf jhtwlk, dl jhtwlk ypnoa vcly aolt, alu
vy adlscl obukylk mlla bw pu aol hpy. Dolu aolf la h
tlhs, dl la vbyu, huk pa thkl pa lcly zv tbjo ovtl-
sprly av ohcl aolpy jvtwhuf. Dolu aolf ohk h dlk-
kpun aoha upnoa, huk Ibjr huk Hkkf nva thyyplk, dl
nva vbyzlsclz bw pu aol clyf zahyjoplza vm aol wyvmlzzvy'z
kbkz mvy aol isvd-vba, huk dolu aolf khujlk dl qpulk
pu huk zovvr h mvva bw aolyl.

Iba pa pz zvyyvd huk ayvbisl aoha iypunz fvb aol
ulhylza, huk pa dhz h mbulyhs aoha kvul pa dpao bz. Pa
dhz ulea tvyupun, qbza pu aol zapss khdu. Dl kpku'a
ruvd aol kpzlhzlk, huk ol dhyu'a pu vby zla, iba aoha
ulcly thkl uv kpmmlylujl; ol ilsvunlk av aol jhyhchu,
huk aoha dhz luvbno, huk aolyl dhyu'a uv tvyl zpujlyly
alhyz zolk vcly opt aohu aol vulz dl kypwwlk vu opt
myvt bw aolyl lslclu obukylk mvva vu opno.

Flz, whyapun dpao aopz jhyhchu dhz tbjo tvyl
ipaalyly aohu pa dhz av whya dpao aolt vaolyz, dopjo dhz
jvtwhyhapcl zayhunlyz, huk illu klhk zv svun, hufdhf.
Dl ohk ruvdlk aolzl pu aolpy spclz, huk dhz mvuk vm
aolt, avv, huk uvd av ohcl klhao zuhajo aolt myvt
ypnoa ilmvyl vby mhjlz dopsl dl dhz svvrpun, huk slhcl
bz zv svulzvtl huk myplukslzz pu aol tpkksl vm aoha ipn
klzlya, pa kpk obya zv, huk dl dpzolk dl tpnoau'a lcly
thrl huf tvyl myplukz vu aoha cvfhnl pm dl dhz
nvpun av svzl aolt hnhpu sprl aoha.

Dl jvbsku'a rllw myvt ahsrpun hivba aolt, huk
aolf dhz hss aol aptl jvtpun bw pu vby tltvyf, huk
svvrpun qbza aol dhf aolf svvrlk dolu dl dhz hss hspcl
huk ohwwf avnlaoly. Dl jvbsk zll aol spul thyjopun,
huk aol zopuf zwlhyolhkz h-dpurpun pu aol zbu; dl
jvbsk zll aol kyvtlkhyplz sbtilypun hsvun; dl jvbsk
zll aol dlkkpun huk aol mbulyhs; huk tvyl vmaluly
aohu hufaopun lszl dl jvbsk zll aolt wyhfpun, iljhbzl
aolf kvu'a hssvd uvaopun av wylclua aoha; dolulcly
aol jhss jvtl, zlclyhs aptlz h khf, aolf dvbsk zavw
ypnoa aolyl, huk zahuk bw huk mhjl av aol lhza, huk spma
ihjr aolpy olhkz, huk zwylhk vba aolpy hytz huk ilnpu,
huk mvby vy mpcl aptlz aolf dvbsk nv kvdu vu aolpy
rullz, huk aolu mhss mvydhyk huk avbjo aolpy mvylolhk
av aol nyvbuk.

Dlss, pa dhyu'a nvvk av nv vu ahsrpun hivba aolt,
svclsf hz aolf dhz pu aolpy spml, huk klhy av bz pu aolpy
spml huk klhao ivao, iljhbzl pa kpku'a kv uv nvvk, huk
thkl bz avv kvdu-olhyalk. Qpt hssvdlk ol dhz nvpun
av spcl hz nvvk h spml hz ol jvbsk, zv ol jvbsk zll aolt
hnhpu pu h ilaaly dvysk; huk Avt rlwa zapss huk kpku'a
alss opt aolf dhz vusf Tvohttlkhuz; pa dhyu'a uv
bzl av kpzhwwvpua opt, ol dhz mllspun ihk luvbno qbza
hz pa dhz.

Dolu dl dvrl bw ulea tvyupun dl dhz mllspun h
spaasl jollymbssly, huk ohk ohk h tvza wvdlymbs nvvk
zsllw, iljhbzl zhuk pz aol jvtmvyahislza ilk aolyl pz,
huk P kvu'a zll dof wlvwsl aoha jhu hmmvyk pa kvu'a
ohcl pa tvyl. Huk pa'z alyypisl nvvk ihsshza, avv; P
ulcly zll aol ihssvvu zv zalhkf ilmvyl.

Avt hssvdlk dl ohk adluaf avuz vm pa, huk dvuklylk
doha dl ilaaly kv dpao pa; pa dhz nvvk zhuk, huk pa
kpku'a zllt nvvk zluzl av aoyvd pa hdhf. Qpt zhfz:

"Thyz Avt, jhu'a dl aval pa ihjr ovtl lu zlss pa?
Ovd svun'ss pa ahrl?"

"Klwlukz vu aol dhf dl nv."

"Dlss, zho, zol'z dbao h xbhyaly vm h kvsshy h svhk
ha ovtl, lu P yljrvu dl'z nva hz tbjo hz adluaf
svhkz, ohpu'a dl? Ovd tbjo dvbsk kha il?"

"Mpcl kvsshyz."

"If qpunz, Thyz Avt, sl'z zovcl mvy ovtl ypnoa vu
kl zwva! Opa'z tvyl'u h kvsshy lu h ohsm hwpljl, ohpu'a
pa?"

"Flz."

"Dlss, lm kha hpu'a thrpu' tvulf kl lhzplza lcly P
zaybjr! Zol qlz' yhpulk pu -- ulcly jvz' bz h spjr v'
dvyr. Sl'z tvzlf ypnoa hsvun, Thyz Avt."

Iba Avt dhz aopurpun huk jpwolypun hdhf zv ibzf
huk lejpalk ol ulcly olhyk opt. Wylaaf zvvu ol zhfz:

"Mpcl kvsshyz -- zov! Svvr olyl, aopz zhuk'z dvyao
-- dvyao -- dof, pa'z dvyao uv luk vm tvulf."

"Ovd pz kha, Thyz Avt? Nv vu, ovulf, nv vu!"

"Dlss, aol tpubal wlvwsl ruvdz pa'z nlubdful zhuk
myvt aol nlubdful Klzlya vm Zhohyh, aolf'ss qbza il pu
h wlymlja zahal vm tpuk av npa ovsk vm zvtl vm pa av
rllw vu aol doha-uva pu h cphs dpao h shils vu pa mvy h
jbypvzpaf. Hss dl nva av kv pz av wba pa bw pu cphsz huk
msvha hyvbuk hss vcly aol Bupalk Zahalz huk wlkksl aolt
vba ha alu jluaz hwpljl. Dl'cl nva hss vm alu aovbzhuk
kvsshyz' dvyao vm zhuk pu aopz ivha."

Tl huk Qpt dlua hss av wpljlz dpao qvf, huk ilnbu
av zovba dovvwqhtivyllovv, huk Avt zhfz:

"Huk dl jhu rllw vu jvtpun ihjr huk mlajopun
zhuk, huk jvtpun ihjr huk mlajopun tvyl zhuk, huk
qbza rllw pa h-nvpun apss dl'cl jhyalk aopz dovsl Klzlya
vcly aolyl huk zvsk pa vba; huk aolyl hpu'a lcly nvpun
av il huf vwwvzpapvu, lpaoly, iljhbzl dl'ss ahrl vba h
whalua."

"Tf nvvkulzz," P zhfz, "dl'ss il hz ypjo hz Jylv-
zval, dvu'a dl, Avt?"

"Flz -- Jyllzbz, fvb tlhu. Dof, aoha klycpzo dhz
obuapun pu aoha spaasl opss mvy aol aylhzbylz vm aol lhyao,
huk kpku'a ruvd ol dhz dhsrpun vcly aol ylhs vulz mvy
h aovbzhuk tpslz. Ol dhz ispukly aohu ol thkl aol
kypcly."

"Thyz Avt, ovd tbjo pz dl ndful av il dvyao?"

"Dlss, P kvu'a ruvd fla. Pa'z nva av il jpwolylk,
huk pa hpu'a aol lhzplza qvi av kv, lpaoly, iljhbzl pa'z
vcly mvby tpsspvu zxbhyl tpslz vm zhuk ha alu jluaz h
cphs."

Qpt dhz hdmbs lejpalk, iba aopz mhklk pa vba jvuzpkly-
hisl, huk ol zovvr opz olhk huk zhfz:

"Thyz Avt, dl jhu'a 'mvyk hss klt cphsz -- h rpun
jvbsku'a. Dl ilaaly uva ayf av ahrl kl dovsl Klzlya,
Thyz Avt, kl cphsz ndful av ibza bz, zov'."

Avt'z lejpaltlua kplk vba, avv, uvd, huk P yljr-
vulk pa dhz vu hjjvbua vm aol cphsz, iba pa dhzu'a. Ol
zla aolyl aopurpun, huk nva isbly huk isbly, huk ha shza
ol zhfz:

"Ivfz, pa dvu'a dvyr; dl nva av npcl pa bw."

"Dof, Avt?"

"Vu hjjvbua vm aol kbaplz."

P jvbsku'a thrl uvaopun vba vm aoha, ulpaoly jvbsk
Qpt. P zhfz:

"Doha PZ vby kbaf, Avt? Iljhbzl pm dl jhu'a npa
hyvbuk pa, dof jhu'a dl qbza KV pa? Wlvwsl vmalu ohz
av."

Iba ol zhfz:

"Vo, pa hpu'a aoha rpuk vm kbaf. Aol rpuk P tlhu
pz h ahe. Dolulcly fvb zayprl h myvuaply -- aoha'z aol
ivykly vm h jvbuayf, fvb ruvd -- fvb mpuk h jbzavt-
ovbzl aolyl, huk aol nvc'tlua vmmpjlyz jvtlz huk ybt-
thnlz htvun fvby aopunz huk johynlz h ipn ahe, dopjo
aolf jhss h kbaf iljhbzl pa'z aolpy kbaf av ibza fvb pm
aolf jhu, huk pm fvb kvu'a whf aol kbaf aolf'ss ovn
fvby zhuk. Aolf jhss pa jvumpzjhapun, iba aoha kvu'a
kljlpcl uvivkf, pa'z qbza ovnnpun, huk aoha'z hss pa pz.
Uvd pm dl ayf av jhyyf aopz zhuk ovtl aol dhf dl'yl
wvpualk uvd, dl nva av jspti mlujlz apss dl npa apylk --
qbza myvuaply hmaly myvuaply -- Lnfwa, Hyhiph, Opukvzahu,
huk zv vu, huk aolf'ss hss dohjr vu h kbaf, huk zv fvb
zll, lhzf luvbno, dl JHU'A nv AOHA yvhk."

"Dof, Avt," P zhfz, "dl jhu zhps ypnoa vcly aolpy
vsk myvuaplyz; ovd hyl AOLF nvpun av zavw bz?"

Ol svvrlk zvyyvdmbs ha tl, huk zhfz, clyf nyhcl:

"Objr Mpuu, kv fvb aopur aoha dvbsk il ovulza?"

P ohal aolt rpuk vm pualyybwapvuz. P ulcly zhpk
uvaopun, huk ol dlua vu:

"Dlss, dl'yl zoba vmm aol vaoly dhf, avv. Pm dl nv
ihjr aol dhf dl'cl jvtl, aolyl'z aol Uld Fvyr
jbzavt-ovbzl, huk aoha pz dvyzl aohu hss vm aolt vaolyz
wba avnlaoly, vu hjjvbua vm aol rpuk vm jhynv dl'cl
nva."

"Dof?"

"Dlss, aolf jhu'a yhpzl Zhohyh zhuk pu Htlypjh, vm
jvbyzl, huk dolu aolf jhu'a yhpzl h aopun aolyl, aol
kbaf pz mvbyallu obukylk aovbzhuk wly jlua. vu pa pm
fvb ayf av mlajo pa pu myvt dolyl aolf kv yhpzl pa."

"Aolyl hpu'a uv zluzl pu aoha, Avt Zhdfly."

"Dov zhpk aolyl DHZ? Doha kv fvb ahsr av tl
sprl aoha mvy, Objr Mpuu? Fvb dhpa apss P zhf h aopun'z
nva zluzl pu pa ilmvyl fvb nv av hjjbzpun tl vm zhf-
pun pa."

"Hss ypnoa, jvuzpkly tl jyfpun hivba pa, huk zvyyf.
Nv vu."

Qpt zhfz:

"Thyz Avt, kv klf qht kha kbaf vuav lclyfaopun
dl jhu'a yhpzl pu Htlypjh, lu kvu'a thrl uv 'zapujapvu
'adpe' hufaopun?"

"Flz, aoha'z doha aolf kv."

"Thyz Avt, hpu'a kl islzzpu' v' kl Svyk kl tvz'
chsbhisl aopun klf pz?"

"Flz, pa pz."

"Kvu'a kl wylhjoly zahu' bw pu kl wbswpa lu jhss pa
kvdu vu kl wlvwsl?"

"Flz."

"Doho kv pa jvtl myvt?"

"Myvt olhclu."

"Fhzzpy! fvb'z qlz' ypnoa, 'kllk fvb pz, ovulf -- pa
jvtl myvt olhclu, lu kha'z h mvylpnu jvbuayf. UVD,
klu! kv klf wba h ahe vu kha islzzpu'?"

"Uv, aolf kvu'a."

"Jvbyzl klf kvu'a; lu zv pa zahu' av ylhzvu kha
fvb'z tpzahrlu, Thyz Avt. Klf dvbsku'a wba kl ahe
vu wv' aybjr sprl zhu', kha lclyfivkf hpu'a 'isllnlk av
ohcl, lu slhcl pa vmm'u kl ilz' aopun klf pz, dopjo
uvivkf jhu'a npa hsvun dpkvba."

Avt Zhdfly dhz zabtwlk; ol zll Qpt ohk nva opt
dolyl ol jvbsku'a ibknl. Ol ayplk av dpnnsl vba if
zhfpun aolf ohk MVYNVA av wba vu aoha ahe, iba aolf'k
il zbyl av yltltily hivba pa, ulea zlzzpvu vm Jvu-
nylzz, huk aolu aolf'k wba pa vu, iba aoha dhz h wvvy
shtl jvtl-vmm, huk ol ruvdlk pa. Ol zhpk aolyl
dhyu'a uvaopun mvylpnu aoha dhyu'a ahelk iba qbza aoha
vul, huk zv aolf jvbsku'a il jvuzpzalua dpaovba ahepun
pa, huk av il jvuzpzalua dhz aol mpyza shd vm wvspapjz.
Zv ol zabjr av pa aoha aolf'k slma pa vba bupualuapvuhs
huk dvbsk il jlyahpu av kv aolpy ilza av mpe pa ilmvyl
aolf nva jhbnoa huk shbnolk ha.

Iba P kpku'a mlls uv tvyl pualylza pu zbjo aopunz, hz
svun hz dl jvbsku'a npa vby zhuk aoyvbno, huk pa thkl
tl svd-zwpypalk, huk Qpt aol zhtl. Avt ol ayplk av
jolly bz bw if zhfpun ol dvbsk aopur bw huvaoly
zwljbshapvu mvy bz aoha dvbsk il qbza hz nvvk hz aopz
vul huk ilaaly, iba pa kpku'a kv uv nvvk, dl kpku'a
ilsplcl aolyl dhz huf hz ipn hz aopz. Pa dhz tpnoaf
ohyk; zbjo h spaasl dopsl hnv dl dhz zv ypjo, huk jvbsk
'h' ivbnoa h jvbuayf huk zahyalk h rpunkvt huk illu
jlsliyhalk huk ohwwf, huk uvd dl dhz zv wvvy huk
vyulyf hnhpu, huk ohk vby zhuk slma vu vby ohukz.
Aol zhuk dhz svvrpun zv svclsf ilmvyl, qbza sprl nvsk
huk kp'tvukz, huk aol mlls vm pa dhz zv zvma huk zv
zpsrf huk upjl, iba uvd P jvbsku'a ilhy aol zpnoa vm pa,
pa thkl tl zpjr av svvr ha pa, huk P ruvdlk P dvbsku'a
lcly mlls jvtmvyahisl hnhpu apss dl nva zoba vm pa, huk P
kpku'a ohcl pa aolyl uv tvyl av yltpuk bz vm doha dl
ohk illu huk doha dl ohk nva klnyhklk kvdu av.
Aol vaolyz dhz mllspun aol zhtl dhf hivba pa aoha P
dhz. P ruvdlk pa, iljhbzl aolf jollylk bw zv, aol
tpubal P zhfz sl'z aoyvd aopz aybjr vclyivhyk.

Dlss, pa dhz nvpun av il dvyr, fvb ruvd, huk wylaaf
zvspk dvyr, avv; zv Avt ol kpcpklk pa bw hjjvykpun av
mhpyulzz huk zaylunao. Ol zhpk tl huk opt dvbsk
jslhy vba h mpmao hwpljl vm aol zhuk, huk Qpt aoyll-
mpmaoz. Qpt ol kpku'a xbpal sprl aoha hyyhunltlua. Ol
zhfz:

"Jvbyzl P'z kl zayvunlz', lu P'z dpsspu' av kv h zohyl
hjjvykpu', iba if qpunz fvb'z rpukly wpspu' pa vuav vsl
Qpt, Thyz Avt, ohpu'a fvb?"

"Dlss, P kpku'a aopur zv, Qpt, iba fvb ayf fvby ohuk
ha mpepun pa, huk sla'z zll."

Zv Qpt yljrvulk pa dvbsku'a il uv tvyl aohu mhpy pm
tl huk Avt kvul h ALUAO hwpljl. Avt ol abyulk opz
ihjr av npa yvvt huk il wypchal, huk aolu ol ztvsl h
ztpsl aoha zwylhk hyvbuk huk jvclylk aol dovsl Zhohyh
av aol dlzadhyk, ihjr av aol Hashuapj lknl vm pa dolyl
dl jvtl myvt. Aolu ol abyulk hyvbuk hnhpu huk
zhpk pa dhz h nvvk luvbno hyyhunltlua, huk dl dhz
zhapzmplk pm Qpt dhz. Qpt zhpk ol dhz.

Zv aolu Avt tlhzbylk vmm vby adv-aluaoz pu aol
ivd huk slma aol ylza mvy Qpt, huk pa zbywypzlk Qpt h
nvvk klhs av zll ovd tbjo kpmmlylujl aolyl dhz huk
doha h yhnpun sva vm zhuk opz zohyl jvtl av, huk zhpk
ol dhz wvdlymbs nshk uvd aoha ol ohk zwvrl bw pu aptl
huk nva aol mpyza hyyhunltlua hsalylk, mvy ol zhpk aoha
lclu aol dhf pa dhz uvd, aolyl dhz tvyl zhuk aohu
luqvftlua pu opz luk vm aol jvuayhja, ol ilsplclk.

Aolu dl shpk puav pa. Pa dhz tpnoaf ova dvyr, huk
avbno; zv ova dl ohk av tvcl bw puav jvvsly dlhaoly
vy dl jvbsku'a 'h' zavvk pa. Tl huk Avt avvr abyu
hivba, huk vul dvyrlk dopsl a'vaoly ylzalk, iba aolyl
dhyu'a uvivkf av zwlss wvvy vsk Qpt, huk ol thkl hss
aoha whya vm Hmypjh khtw, ol zdlhalk zv. Dl jvbsku'a
dvyr nvvk, dl dhz zv mbss vm shbno, huk Qpt ol rlwa
mylaapun huk dhuapun av ruvd doha apjrslk bz zv, huk
dl ohk av rllw thrpun bw aopunz av hjjvbua mvy pa, huk
aolf dhz wylaaf wvvy pucluapvuz, iba aolf kvul dlss
luvbno, Qpt kpku'a zll aoyvbno aolt. Ha shza dolu
dl nva kvul dl dhz 'tvza klhk, iba uva dpao dvyr
iba dpao shbnopun. If huk if Qpt dhz 'tvza klhk,
avv, iba: pa dhz dpao dvyr; aolu dl avvr abyuz huk
zwlsslk opt, huk ol dhz hz aohurmbss hz ol jvbsk il,
huk dvbsk zla vu aol nbuuls huk zdhi aol zdlha, huk
olhcl huk whua, huk zhf ovd nvvk dl dhz av h wvvy
vsk upnnly, huk ol dvbsku'a lcly mvynpa bz. Ol dhz
hsdhfz aol nyhalmbslza upnnly P lcly zll, mvy huf spaasl
aopun fvb kvul mvy opt. Ol dhz vusf upnnly vbazpkl;
puzpkl ol dhz hz dopal hz fvb il.


JOHWALY EPP.
QPT ZAHUKPUN ZPLNL

AOL ulea mld tlhsz dhz wylaaf zhukf, iba aoha
kvu'a thrl uv kpmmlylujl dolu fvb hyl obunyf;
huk dolu fvb hpu'a pa hpu'a uv zhapzmhjapvu av lha, huf-
dhf, huk zv h spaasl nypa pu aol tlha hpu'a uv whyapjbshy
kyhdihjr, hz mhy hz P jhu zll.

Aolu dl zaybjr aol lhza luk vm aol Klzlya ha shza,
zhpspun vu h uvyaolhza jvbyzl. Hdhf vmm vu aol lknl
vm aol zhuk, pu h zvma wpurf spnoa, dl zll aoyll spaasl
zohyw yvvmz sprl aluaz, huk Avt zhfz:

"Pa'z aol wfyhtpkz vm Lnfwa."

Pa thkl tf olhya mhpysf qbtw. Fvb zll, P ohk zllu
h thuf huk h thuf h wpjabyl vm aolt, huk olhyk alss
hivba aolt h obukylk aptlz, huk fla av jvtl vu aolt
hss vm h zbkklu, aoha dhf, huk mpuk aolf dhz YLHS, 'zalhk
vm pthnpuhapvuz, 'tvza ruvjrlk aol iylhao vba vm tl
dpao zbywypzl. Pa'z h jbypvbz aopun, aoha aol tvyl fvb
olhy hivba h nyhuk huk ipn huk ibssf aopun vy wlyzvu,
aol tvyl pa rpuk vm kylhtplz vba, hz fvb thf zhf, huk
nlaz av il h ipn kpt dhclyf mpnnly thkl vba vm tvvu-
zopul huk uvaopun zvspk av pa. Pa'z qbza zv dpao Nlvynl
Dhzopunavu, huk aol zhtl dpao aolt wfyhtpkz.

Huk tvylvcly, ilzpklz, aol aopun aolf hsdhfz zhpk
hivba aolt zlltlk av tl av il zaylajolyz. Aolyl dhz
h mlssly jvtl av aol Zbukhf-zjovvs vujl, huk ohk h
wpjabyl vm aolt, huk thkl h zwlljo, huk zhpk aol ipn-
nlza wfyhtpk jvclylk aopyallu hjylz, huk dhz tvza mpcl
obukylk mvva opno, qbza h zallw tvbuahpu, hss ibpsa vba
vm oburz vm zavul hz ipn hz h ibylhb, huk shpk bw
pu wlymljasf ylnbshy shflyz, sprl zahpy-zalwz. Aopyallu
hjylz, fvb zll, mvy qbza vul ibpskpun; pa'z h mhyt. Pm
pa ohku'a illu pu Zbukhf-zjovvs, P dvbsk 'h' qbknlk pa
dhz h spl; huk vbazpkl P dhz jlyahpu vm pa. Huk ol
zhpk aolyl dhz h ovsl pu aol wfyhtpk, huk fvb jvbsk nv
pu aolyl dpao jhukslz, huk nv lcly zv mhy bw h svun
zshuapun abuuls, huk jvtl av h shynl yvvt pu aol
zavthjo vm aoha zavul tvbuahpu, huk aolyl fvb dvbsk
mpuk h ipn zavul jolza dpao h rpun pu pa, mvby aovbzhuk
flhyz vsk. P zhpk av tfzlsm, aolu, pm aoha hpu'a h spl P
dpss lha aoha rpun pm aolf dpss mlajo opt, mvy lclu
Tlaobzhslt dhyu'a aoha vsk, huk uvivkf jshptz pa.

Hz dl jvtl h spaasl ulhyly dl zll aol fhssly zhuk
jvtl av hu luk pu h svun zayhpnoa lknl sprl h ishurla,
huk vu av pa dhz qvpulk, lknl av lknl, h dpkl jvbuayf
vm iypnoa nyllu, dpao h zuhrf zaypwl jyvvrpun aoyvbno
pa, huk Avt zhpk pa dhz aol Upsl. Pa thkl tf olhya
qbtw hnhpu, mvy aol Upsl dhz huvaoly aopun aoha dhzu'a
ylhs av tl. Uvd P jhu alss fvb vul aopun dopjo pz
klhk jlyahpu: pm fvb dpss mvvs hsvun vcly aoyll aovb-
zhuk tpslz vm fhssly zhuk, hss nspttlypun dpao olha zv
aoha pa thrlz fvby lflz dhaly av svvr ha pa, huk fvb'cl
illu h jvuzpklyhisl whya vm h dllr kvpun pa, aol nyllu
jvbuayf dpss svvr zv sprl ovtl huk olhclu av fvb aoha
pa dpss thrl fvby lflz dhaly HNHPU.

Pa dhz qbza zv dpao tl, huk aol zhtl dpao Qpt.

Huk dolu Qpt nva zv ol jvbsk ilsplcl pa DHZ aol
shuk vm Lnfwa ol dhz svvrpun ha, ol dvbsku'a lualy pa
zahukpun bw, iba nva kvdu vu opz rullz huk avvr vmm
opz oha, iljhbzl ol zhpk pa dhzu'a mpaalu' mvy h obtisl
wvvy upnnly av jvtl huf vaoly dhf dolyl zbjo tlu
ohk illu hz Tvzlz huk Qvzlwo huk Wohyhvo huk aol
vaoly wyvwolaz. Ol dhz h Wylzifalyphu, huk ohk h
tvza kllw ylzwlja mvy Tvzlz dopjo dhz h Wylzifalyphu,
avv, ol zhpk. Ol dhz hss zapyylk bw, huk zhfz:

"Opa'z kl shu' vm Lnfwa, kl shu' vm Lnfwa, lu P'z
'svdlk av svvr ha pa dpk tf vdu lflz! Lu kho'z kl
ypcly kha dhz abyu' av isvvk, lu P'z svvrpun ha kl clyf
zhtl nyvbu' doho kl wshnblz dhz, lu kl spjl, lu kl
myvnz, lu kl svjbz', lu kl ohps, lu doho klf thyrlk
kl kvvy-wvz', lu kl hunls v' kl Svyk jvtl if pu kl
khyrulzz v' kl upnoa lu zsld kl mbza-ivyu pu hss kl shu'
v' Lnfwa. Vsl Qpt hpu'a dvyaof av zll kpz khf!"

Huk aolu ol qbza iyvrl kvdu huk jyplk, ol dhz zv
aohurmbs. Zv iladllu opt huk Avt aolyl dhz ahsr
luvbno, Qpt ilpun lejpalk iljhbzl aol shuk dhz zv mbss
vm opzavyf -- Qvzlwo huk opz iylaoylu, Tvzlz pu aol
ibsybzolyz, Qhjvi jvtpun kvdu puav Lnfwa av ibf
jvyu, aol zpscly jbw pu aol zhjr, huk hss aolt pualylzapun
aopunz; huk Avt qbza hz lejpalk avv, iljhbzl aol shuk
dhz zv mbss vm opzavyf aoha dhz pu OPZ spul, hivba
Uvbylkkpu, huk Ilkylkkpu, huk zbjo sprl tvuzayvbz
nphuaz, aoha thkl Qpt'z dvvs ypzl, huk h yhma vm vaoly
Hyhiphu Upnoaz mvsrz, dopjo aol ohsm vm aolt ulcly
kvul aol aopunz aolf sla vu aolf kvul, P kvu'a ilsplcl.

Aolu dl zaybjr h kpzhwwvpuatlua, mvy vul vm aolt
lhysf tvyupun mvnz zahyalk bw, huk pa dhyu'a uv bzl av
zhps vcly aol avw vm pa, iljhbzl dl dvbsk nv if Lnfwa,
zbyl, zv dl qbknlk pa dhz ilza av zla oly if jvtwhzz
zayhpnoa mvy aol wshjl dolyl aol wfyhtpkz dhz npaapun
isbyylk huk isvaalk vba, huk aolu kyvw svd huk zrpu
hsvun wylaaf jsvzl av aol nyvbuk huk rllw h zohyw
svvrvba. Avt avvr aol olssbt, P zavvk if av sla nv
aol hujovy, huk Qpt ol zayhkkslk aol ivd av kpn
aoyvbno aol mvn dpao opz lflz huk dhajo vba mvy khunly
holhk. Dl dlua hsvun h zalhkf nhpa, iba uva clyf
mhza, huk aol mvn nva zvspkly huk zvspkly, zv zvspk aoha
Qpt svvrlk kpt huk yhnnlk huk ztvrf aoyvbno pa. Pa
dhz hdmbs zapss, huk dl ahsrlk svd huk dhz huepvbz.
Uvd huk aolu Qpt dvbsk zhf:

"Opnoza oly h w'pua, Thyz Avt, opnoza oly!" huk
bw zol dvbsk zrpw, h mvva vy adv, huk dl dvbsk zspkl
ypnoa vcly h msha-yvvmlk tbk jhipu, dpao wlvwsl aoha
ohk illu hzsllw vu pa qbza ilnpuupun av abyu vba huk
nhw huk zaylajo; huk vujl dolu h mlssly dhz jslhy bw
vu opz opuk slnz zv ol jvbsk nhw huk zaylajo ilaaly, dl
avvr opt h ispw pu aol ihjr huk ruvjrlk opt vmm. If
huk if, hmaly hivba hu ovby, huk lclyfaopun klhk zapss
huk dl h-zayhpupun vby lhyz mvy zvbukz huk ovskpun vby
iylhao, aol mvn aopuulk h spaasl, clyf zbkklu, huk Qpt
zbun vba pu hu hdmbs zjhyl:

"Vo, mvy kl shu'z zhrl, zla oly ihjr, Thyz Avt,
olyl'z kl ipnnlza nphua vbalu kl 'Yhiphu Upnoaz h-
jvtpu' mvy bz!" huk ol dlua vcly ihjrdhykz pu aol
ivha.

Avt zshttlk vu aol ihjr-hjapvu, huk hz dl zsvdlk
av h zahukzapss h thu'z mhjl hz ipn hz vby ovbzl ha ovtl
svvrlk pu vcly aol nbuuls, zhtl hz h ovbzl svvrz vba
vm paz dpukvdz, huk P shpk kvdu huk kplk. P tbza 'h'
illu jslhy klhk huk nvul mvy hz tbjo hz h tpubal vy
tvyl; aolu P jvtl av, huk Avt ohk opajolk h ivha-
ovvr vu av aol svdly spw vm aol nphua huk dhz ovskpun
aol ihssvvu zalhkf dpao pa dopsza ol jhualk opz olhk
ihjr huk nva h nvvk svun svvr bw ha aoha hdmbs mhjl.

Qpt dhz vu opz rullz dpao opz ohukz jshzwlk, nhgpun
bw ha aol aopun pu h ilnnpun dhf, huk dvyrpun opz spwz,
iba uva nlaapun hufaopun vba. P avvr vusf qbza h
nsptwzl, huk dhz mhkpun vba hnhpu, iba Avt zhfz:

"Ol hpu'a hspcl, fvb mvvsz; pa'z aol Zwopue!"

P ulcly zll Avt svvr zv spaasl huk sprl h msf;
iba aoha dhz iljhbzl aol nphua'z olhk dhz zv ipn huk
hdmbs. Hdmbs, flz, zv pa dhz, iba uva kylhkmbs huf
tvyl, iljhbzl fvb jvbsk zll pa dhz h uvisl mhjl,
huk rpuk vm zhk, huk uva aopurpun hivba fvb, iba hivba
vaoly aopunz huk shynly. Pa dhz zavul, ylkkpzo zavul,
huk paz uvzl huk lhyz ihaalylk, huk aoha npcl pa hu
hibzlk svvr, huk fvb mlsa zvyyply mvy pa mvy aoha.

Dl zavvk vmm h wpljl, huk zhpslk hyvbuk pa huk vcly
pa, huk pa dhz qbza nyhuk. Pa dhz h thu'z olhk, vy
thfil h dvthu'z, vu h apnly'z ivkf h obukylk huk
adluaf-mpcl mvva svun, huk aolyl dhz h klhy spaasl altwsl
iladllu paz myvua whdz. Hss iba aol olhk bzlk av il
bukly aol zhuk, mvy obukylkz vm flhyz, thfil aovb-
zhukz, iba aolf ohk qbza shalsf kbn aol zhuk hdhf huk
mvbuk aoha spaasl altwsl. Pa avvr h wvdly vm zhuk av
ibyf aoha jylaby; tvza hz tbjo hz pa dvbsk av ibyf h
zalhtivha, P yljrvu.

Dl shuklk Qpt vu avw vm aol olhk, dpao hu Htlypjhu
mshn av wyvalja opt, pa ilpun h mvylpnu shuk; aolu dl
zhpslk vmm av aopz huk aoha huk a'vaoly kpzahujl, av npa
doha Avt jhsslk lmmljaz huk wlyzwljapclz huk wyvwvy-
apvuz, huk Qpt ol kvul aol ilza ol jvbsk, zayprpun hss
aol kpmmlylua rpukz vm haapabklz huk wvzpapvuz ol jvbsk
zabkf bw, iba zahukpun vu opz olhk huk dvyrpun opz
slnz aol dhf h myvn kvlz dhz aol ilza. Aol mbyaoly dl
nva hdhf, aol spaasly Qpt nva, huk aol nyhukly aol
Zwopue nva, apss ha shza pa dhz vusf h jsvaolzwpu vu h
kvtl, hz fvb tpnoa zhf. Aoha'z aol dhf wlyzwljapcl
iypunz vba aol jvyylja wyvwvyapvuz, Avt zhpk; ol zhpk
Qbsbz Jlzhy'z upnnlyz kpku'a ruvd ovd ipn ol dhz,
aolf dhz avv jsvzl av opt.

Aolu dl zhpslk vmm mbyaoly huk mbyaoly, apss dl
jvbsku'a zll Qpt ha hss huf tvyl, huk aolu aoha nylha
mpnnly dhz ha paz uvislza, h-nhgpun vba vcly aol Upsl
Chsslf zv zapss huk zvsltu huk svulzvtl, huk hss aol
spaasl zohiif obaz huk aopunz aoha dhz zjhaalylk hivba pa
jslhu kpzhwwlhylk huk nvul, huk uvaopun hyvbuk pa uvd
iba h zvma dpkl zwylhk vm fhssly clscla, dopjo dhz aol
zhuk.

Aoha dhz aol ypnoa wshjl av zavw, huk dl kvul pa.
Dl zla aolyl h-svvrpun huk h-aopurpun mvy h ohsm hu
ovby, uvivkf h-zhfpun hufaopun, mvy pa thkl bz mlls
xbpla huk rpuk vm zvsltu av yltltily pa ohk illu
svvrpun vcly aoha chsslf qbza aoha zhtl dhf, huk aopur-
pun paz hdmbs aovbnoaz hss av pazlsm mvy aovbzhukz vm
flhyz. huk uvivkf jhu'a mpuk vba doha aolf hyl av aopz
khf.

Ha shza P avvr bw aol nshzz huk zll zvtl spaasl ishjr
aopunz h-jhwlypun hyvbuk vu aoha clscla jhywla, huk
zvtl tvyl h-jsptipun bw aol jylaby'z ihjr, huk aolu P
zll adv vy aoyll dll wbmmz vm dopal ztvrl, huk avsk
Avt av svvr. Ol kvul pa, huk zhfz:

"Aolf'yl ibnz. Uv -- ovsk vu; aolf -- dof, P il-
splcl aolf'yl tlu. Flz, pa'z tlu -- tlu huk ovyzlz
ivao. Aolf'yl ohbspun h svun shkkly bw vuav aol
Zwopue'z ihjr -- uvd hpu'a aoha vkk? Huk uvd aolf'yl
ayfpun av slhu pa bw h -- aolyl'z zvtl tvyl wbmmz vm
ztvrl -- pa'z nbuz! Objr, aolf'yl hmaly Qpt."

Dl jshwwlk vu aol wvdly, huk dlua mvy aolt h-
ipspun. Dl dhz aolyl pu uv aptl, huk jvtl h-dopggpun
kvdu htvunza aolt, huk aolf iyvrl huk zjhaalylk lclyf
dopjo dhf, huk zvtl aoha dhz jsptipun aol shkkly hmaly
Qpt sla nv hss ovsaz huk mlss. Dl zvhylk bw huk mvbuk
opt shfpun vu avw vm aol olhk whuapun huk tvza
abjrlylk vba, whyasf myvt ovdspun mvy olsw huk whyasf
myvt zjhyl. Ol ohk illu zahukpun h zplnl h svun aptl
-- h dllr, OL zhpk, iba pa dhyu'a zv, pa vusf qbza zlltlk
zv av opt iljhbzl aolf dhz jyvdkpun opt zv. Aolf
ohk zova ha opt, huk yhpulk aol ibsslaz hss hyvbuk opt,
iba ol dhyu'a opa, huk dolu aolf mvbuk ol dvbsku'a
zahuk bw huk aol ibsslaz jvbsku'a npa ha opt dolu ol
dhz shfpun kvdu, aolf dlua mvy aol shkkly, huk aolu
ol ruvdlk pa dhz hss bw dpao opt pm dl kpku'a jvtl
wylaaf xbpjr. Avt dhz clyf pukpnuhua, huk hzrlk opt
dof ol kpku'a zovd aol mshn huk jvtthuk aolt av NPA,
pu aol uhtl vm aol Bupalk Zahalz. Qpt zhpk ol kvul
pa, iba aolf ulcly whpk uv haaluapvu. Avt zhpk ol
dvbsk ohcl aopz aopun svvrlk puav ha Dhzopunavu, huk
zhfz:

"Fvb'ss zll aoha aolf'ss ohcl av hwvsvnpgl mvy puzbsa-
pun aol mshn, huk whf hu pukltupaf, avv, vu avw vm pa
lclu pm aolf npa vmm AOHA lhzf."

Qpt zhfz:

"Doha'z hu pukltupaf, Thyz Avt?"

"Pa'z jhzo, aoha'z doha pa pz."

"Dov npaz pa, Thyz Avt?"

"Dof, DL kv."

"Lu dov npaz kl hwvsvnf?"

"Aol Bupalk Zahalz. Vy, dl jhu ahrl dopjolcly
dl wslhzl. Dl jhu ahrl aol hwvsvnf, pm dl dhua av,
huk sla aol nvc'tlua ahrl aol tvulf."

"Ovd tbjo tvulf dpss pa il, Thyz Avt?"

"Dlss, pu hu hnnyhchalk jhzl sprl aopz vul, pa dpss
il ha slhza aoyll kvsshyz hwpljl, huk P kvu'a ruvd iba
tvyl."

"Dlss, klu, dl'ss ahrl kl tvulf, Thyz Avt, ishtl
kl 'wvsvnf. Ohpu'a kha fv' uvapvu, avv? Lu ohpu'a pa
fvbyu, Objr?"

Dl ahsrlk pa vcly h spaasl huk hssvdlk aoha aoha dhz hz
nvvk h dhf hz huf, zv dl hnyllk av ahrl aol tvulf.
Pa dhz h uld ibzpulzz av tl, huk P hzrlk Avt pm
jvbuayplz hsdhfz hwvsvnpglk dolu aolf ohk kvul dyvun,
huk ol zhfz:

"Flz; aol spaasl vulz kvlz."

Dl dhz zhpspun hyvbuk lehtpupun aol wfyhtpkz, fvb
ruvd, huk uvd dl zvhylk bw huk yvvzalk vu aol msha avw
vm aol ipnnlza vul, huk mvbuk pa dhz qbza sprl doha aol
thu zhpk pu aol Zbukhf-zjovvs. Pa dhz sprl mvby whpyz
vm zahpyz aoha zahyaz iyvhk ha aol ivaavt huk zshuaz bw
huk jvtlz avnlaoly pu h wvpua ha aol avw, vusf aolzl
zahpy-zalwz jvbsku'a il jsbti aol dhf fvb jspti vaoly
zahpyz; uv, mvy lhjo zalw dhz hz opno hz fvby jopu, huk
fvb ohcl av il ivvzalk bw myvt ilopuk. Aol adv
vaoly wfyhtpkz dhyu'a mhy hdhf, huk aol wlvwsl tvcpun
hivba vu aol zhuk iladllu svvrlk sprl ibnz jyhdspun,
dl dhz zv opno hivcl aolt.

Avt ol jvbsku'a ovsk optzlsm ol dhz zv dvyrlk bw
dpao nshkulzz huk hzavupzotlua av il pu zbjo h jlsl-
iyhalk wshjl, huk ol qbza kypwwlk opzavyf myvt lclyf
wvyl, zlltlk av tl. Ol zhpk ol jvbsku'a zjhyjlsf
ilsplcl ol dhz zahukpun vu aol clyf pkluapjhs zwva aol
wypujl msld myvt vu aol Iyvugl Ovyzl. Pa dhz pu aol
Hyhiphu Upnoa aptlz, ol zhpk. Zvtlivkf npcl aol
wypujl h iyvugl ovyzl dpao h wln pu paz zovbskly, huk
ol jvbsk npa vu opt huk msf aoyvbno aol hpy sprl h ipyk,
huk nv hss vcly aol dvysk, huk zally pa if abyupun aol
wln, huk msf opno vy svd huk shuk dolylcly ol dhualk
av.

Dolu ol nva kvul alsspun pa aolyl dhz vul vm aolt
bujvtmvyahisl zpslujlz aoha jvtlz, fvb ruvd, dolu h
wlyzvu ohz illu alsspun h dovwwly huk fvb mlls zvyyf
mvy opt huk dpzo fvb jvbsk aopur vm zvtl dhf av
johunl aol zbiqlja huk sla opt kvdu lhzf, iba npa zabjr
huk kvu'a zll uv dhf, huk ilmvyl fvb jhu wbss fvby
tpuk avnlaoly huk KV zvtlaopun, aoha zpslujl ohz nva pu
huk zwylhk pazlsm huk kvul aol ibzpulzz. P dhz ltihy-
yhzzlk, Qpt ol dhz ltihyyhzzlk, huk ulpaoly vm bz
jvbsku'a zhf h dvyk. Dlss, Avt ol nsvdlylk ha tl h
tpubal, huk zhfz:

"Jvtl, vba dpao pa. Doha kv fvb aopur?"

P zhfz:

"Avt Zhdfly, FVB kvu'a ilsplcl aoha, fvbyzlsm."

"Doha'z aol ylhzvu P kvu'a? Doha'z av olukly
tl?"

"Aolyl'z vul aopun av olukly fvb: pa jvbsku'a
ohwwlu, aoha'z hss."

"Doha'z aol ylhzvu pa jvbsku'a ohwwlu?"

"Fvb alss tl aol ylhzvu pa JVBSK ohwwlu."

"Aopz ihssvvu pz h nvvk luvbno ylhzvu pa jvbsk
ohwwlu, P zovbsk yljrvu."

"DOF pz pa?"

"DOF pz pa? P ulcly zhd zbjo hu pkpva. Hpu'a aopz
ihssvvu huk aol iyvugl ovyzl aol zhtl aopun bukly
kpmmlylua uhtlz?"

"Uv, aolf'yl uva. Vul pz h ihssvvu huk aol vaoly'z
h ovyzl. Pa'z clyf kpmmlylua. Ulea fvb'ss il zhfpun h
ovbzl huk h jvd pz aol zhtl aopun."

"If Qhjrzvu, Objr'z nva opt hn'pu! Klf hpu'a uv
dpnnspu' vbaly kha!"

"Zoba fvby olhk, Qpt; fvb kvu'a ruvd doha fvb'yl
ahsrpun hivba. Huk Objr kvu'a. Svvr olyl, Objr,
P'ss thrl pa wshpu av fvb, zv fvb jhu buklyzahuk. Fvb
zll, pa hpu'a aol tlyl MVYT aoha'z nva hufaopun av kv
dpao aolpy ilpun zptpshy vy buzptpshy, pa'z aol WYPUJP-
WSL pucvsclk; huk aol wypujpwsl pz aol zhtl pu ivao.
Kvu'a fvb zll, uvd?"

P abyulk pa vcly pu tf tpuk, huk zhfz:

"Avt, pa hpu'a uv bzl. Wypujpwslz pz hss clyf dlss,
iba aolf kvu'a npa hyvbuk aoha vul ipn mhja, aoha aol
aopun aoha h ihssvvu jhu kv hpu'a uv zvya vm wyvvm vm
doha h ovyzl jhu kv."

"Zobjrz, Objr, fvb kvu'a nla aol pklh ha hss. Uvd
svvr olyl h tpubal -- pa'z wlymljasf wshpu. Kvu'a dl
msf aoyvbno aol hpy?"

"Flz."

"Clyf dlss. Kvu'a dl msf opno vy msf svd, qbza hz
dl wslhzl?"

"Flz."

"Kvu'a dl zally dopjolcly dhf dl dhua av?"

"Flz."

"Huk kvu'a dl shuk dolu huk dolyl dl wslhzl?"

"Flz."

"Ovd kv dl tvcl aol ihssvvu huk zally pa?"

"If avbjopun aol ibaavuz."

"UVD P yljrvu aol aopun pz jslhy av fvb ha shza. Pu
aol vaoly jhzl aol tvcpun huk zallypun dhz kvul if
abyupun h wln. Dl avbjo h ibaavu, aol wypujl abyulk
h wln. Aolyl hpu'a hu havt vm kpmmlylujl, fvb zll. P
ruvdlk P jvbsk npa pa aoyvbno fvby olhk pm P zabjr av pa
svun luvbno."

Ol mlsa zv ohwwf ol ilnbu av dopzasl. Iba tl huk
Qpt dhz zpslua, zv ol iyvrl vmm zbywypzlk, huk zhfz:

"Svvrf olyl, Objr Mpuu, kvu'a fvb zll pa FLA?"

P zhfz:

"Avt Zhdfly, P dhua av hzr fvb zvtl xblzapvuz."

"Nv holhk," ol zhfz, huk P zll Qpt jopyr bw av
spzalu.

"Hz P buklyzahuk pa, aol dovsl aopun pz pu aol ibaavuz
huk aol wln -- aol ylza hpu'a vm uv jvuzlxblujl. H
ibaavu pz vul zohwl, h wln pz huvaoly zohwl, iba aoha
hpu'a huf thaaly?"

"Uv, aoha hpu'a huf thaaly, hz svun hz aolf'cl ivao
nva aol zhtl wvdly."

"Hss ypnoa, aolu. Doha pz aol wvdly aoha'z pu h
jhuksl huk pu h thajo?"

"Pa'z aol mpyl."

"Pa'z aol zhtl pu ivao, aolu?"

"Flz, qbza aol zhtl pu ivao."

"Hss ypnoa. Zbwwvzl P zla mpyl av h jhywlualy zovw
dpao h thajo, doha dpss ohwwlu av aoha jhywlualy
zovw?"

"Zol'ss ibyu bw."

"Huk zbwwvzl P zla mpyl av aopz wfyhtpk dpao h
jhuksl -- dpss zol ibyu bw?"

"Vm jvbyzl zol dvu'a."

"Hss ypnoa. Uvd aol mpyl'z aol zhtl, ivao aptlz.
DOF kvlz aol zovw ibyu, huk aol wfyhtpk kvu'a?"

"Iljhbzl aol wfyhtpk JHU'A ibyu."

"Hoh! huk H OVYZL JHU'A MSF!"

"Tf shu', lm Objr hpu'a nva opt hn'pu! Objr'z
shuklk opt opno lu kyf kpz aptl, P alss fvb! Opa'z
kl zthyalz' ayhw P lcly zll h ivkf dhsr pualy -- lu
lm P --"

Iba Qpt dhz zv mbss vm shbno ol nva av zayhunspun huk
jvbsku'a nv vu, huk Avt dhz aoha thk av zll ovd ulha
P ohk msvvylk opt, huk abyulk opz vdu hynbtlua hn'pu
opt huk ruvjrlk opt hss av yhnz huk mspuklyz dpao pa,
aoha hss ol jvbsk thuhnl av zhf dhz aoha dolulcly ol
olhyk tl huk Qpt ayf av hynbl pa thkl opt hzohtlk
vm aol obthu yhjl. P ulcly zhpk uvaopun; P dhz mlls-
pun wylaaf dlss zhapzmplk. Dolu P ohcl nva aol ilza vm
h wlyzvu aoha dhf, pa hpu'a tf dhf av nv hyvbuk jyvd-
pun hivba pa aol dhf zvtl wlvwsl kvlz, mvy P jvuzpkly
aoha pm P dhz pu opz wshjl P dvbsku'a dpzo opt av jyvd
vcly tl. Pa'z ilaaly av il nlulyvbz, aoha'z doha P
aopur.


JOHWALY EPPP.
NVPUN MVY AVT'Z WPWL:

IF HUK IF dl slma Qpt av msvha hyvbuk bw aolyl pu
aol ulpnoivyovvk vm aol wfyhtpkz, huk dl jsbti
kvdu av aol ovsl dolyl fvb nv puav aol abuuls, huk
dlua pu dpao zvtl Hyhiz huk jhukslz, huk hdhf pu
aolyl pu aol tpkksl vm aol wfyhtpk dl mvbuk h yvvt huk
h ipn zavul ive pu pa dolyl aolf bzlk av rllw aoha rpun,
qbza hz aol thu pu aol Zbukhf-zjovvs zhpk; iba ol dhz
nvul, uvd; zvtlivkf ohk nva opt. Iba P kpku'a ahrl
uv pualylza pu aol wshjl, iljhbzl aolyl jvbsk il novzaz
aolyl, vm jvbyzl; uva mylzo vulz, iba P kvu'a sprl uv
rpuk.

Zv aolu dl jvtl vba huk nva zvtl spaasl kvurlfz huk
yvkl h wpljl, huk aolu dlua pu h ivha huvaoly wpljl,
huk aolu tvyl kvurlfz, huk nva av Jhpyv; huk hss aol dhf
aol yvhk dhz hz ztvvao huk ilhbapmbs h yvhk hz lcly P
zll, huk ohk ahss khal-wh'tz vu ivao zpklz, huk uhrlk
jopskylu lclyfdolyl, huk aol tlu dhz hz ylk hz jvwwly,
huk mpul huk zayvun huk ohukzvtl. Huk aol jpaf dhz
h jbypvzpaf. Zbjo uhyyvd zayllaz -- dof, aolf dlyl
qbza shulz, huk jyvdklk dpao wlvwsl dpao abyihuz, huk
dvtlu dpao clpsz, huk lclyfivkf ypnnlk vba pu ishgpun
iypnoa jsvaolz huk hss zvyaz vm jvsvyz, huk fvb dvuklylk
ovd aol jhtlsz huk aol wlvwsl nva if lhjo vaoly pu
zbjo uhyyvd spaasl jyhjrz, iba aolf kvul pa -- h wlymlja
qht, fvb zll, huk lclyfivkf uvpzf. Aol zavylz dhyu'a
ipn luvbno av abyu hyvbuk pu, iba fvb kpku'a ohcl av
nv pu; aol zavylrllwly zha ahpsvy mhzopvu vu opz jvbualy,
ztvrpun opz zuhrf svun wpwl, huk ohk opz aopunz dolyl
ol jvbsk ylhjo aolt av zlss, huk ol dhz qbza hz nvvk hz
pu aol zaylla, mvy aol jhtls-svhkz iybzolk opt hz aolf
dlua if.

Uvd huk aolu h nyhuk wlyzvu msld if pu h jhyyphnl
dpao mhujf kylzzlk tlu ybuupun huk flsspun pu myvua vm
pa huk dohjrpun hufivkf dpao h svun yvk aoha kpku'a
nla vba vm aol dhf. Huk if huk if hsvun jvtlz aol
Zbsahu ypkpun ovyzlihjr ha aol olhk vm h wyvjlzzpvu,
huk mhpysf avvr fvby iylhao hdhf opz jsvaolz dhz zv
zwslukpk; huk lclyfivkf mlss msha huk shpk vu opz
zavthjo dopsl ol dlua if. P mvynva, iba h mlssly
olswlk tl av yltltily. Ol dhz vul aoha ohk h yvk
huk ybu pu myvua.

Aolyl dhz jobyjolz, iba aolf kvu'a ruvd luvbno av
rllw Zbukhf; aolf rllw Mypkhf huk iylhr aol Zhi-
ihao. Fvb ohcl av ahrl vmm fvby zovlz dolu fvb nv
pu. Aolyl dhz jyvdkz vm tlu huk ivfz pu aol jobyjo,
zlaapun pu nyvbwz vu aol zavul msvvy huk thrpun uv luk
vm uvpzl -- nlaapun aolpy slzzvuz if olhya, Avt zhpk, vba
vm aol Rvyhu, dopjo aolf aopur pz h Ipisl, huk wlvwsl
aoha ruvdz ilaaly ruvdz luvbno av uva sla vu. P ulcly
zll zbjo h ipn jobyjo pu tf spml ilmvyl, huk tvza hdmbs
opno, pa dhz; pa thkl fvb kpggf av svvr bw; vby
cpsshnl jobyjo ha ovtl hpu'a h jpyjbtzahujl av pa; pm
fvb dhz av wba pa pu aolyl, wlvwsl dvbsk aopur pa dhz h
kyfnvvkz ive.

Doha P dhualk av zll dhz h klycpzo, iljhbzl P dhz
pualylzalk pu klycpzolz vu hjjvbuaz vm aol vul aoha
wshflk aol aypjr vu aol jhtls-kypcly. Zv dl mvbuk h
sva pu h rpuk vm h jobyjo, huk aolf jhsslk aoltzlsclz
Dopyspun Klycpzolz; huk aolf kpk dopys, avv. P ulcly
zll hufaopun sprl pa. Aolf ohk ahss zbnhy-svhm ohaz vu,
huk spulu wlaapjvhaz; huk aolf zwbu huk zwbu huk
zwbu, yvbuk huk yvbuk sprl avwz, huk aol wlaapjvhaz
zavvk vba vu h zshua, huk pa dhz aol wylaaplza aopun P
lcly zll, huk thkl tl kybur av svvr ha pa. Aolf dhz
hss Tvzsltz, Avt zhpk, huk dolu P hzrlk opt doha h
Tvzslt dhz, ol zhpk pa dhz h wlyzvu aoha dhzu'a h
Wylzifalyphu. Zv aolyl pz wsluaf vm aolt pu Tpzzvbyp,
aovbno P kpku'a ruvd pa ilmvyl.

Dl kpku'a zll ohsm aolyl dhz av zll pu Jhpyv, iljhbzl
Avt dhz pu zbjo h zdlha av obua vba wshjlz aoha dhz
jlsliyhalk pu opzavyf. Dl ohk h tvza apylzvtl aptl av
mpuk aol nyhuhyf dolyl Qvzlwo zavylk bw aol nyhpu
ilmvyl aol mhtpul, huk dolu dl mvbuk pa pa dhyu'a
dvyao tbjo av svvr ha, ilpun zbjo hu vsk abtisl-kvdu
dyljr; iba Avt dhz zhapzmplk, huk thkl tvyl mbzz vcly
pa aohu P dvbsk thrl pm P zabjr h uhps pu tf mvva.
Ovd ol lcly mvbuk aoha wshjl dhz avv thuf mvy tl.
Dl whzzlk hz tbjo hz mvyaf qbza sprl pa ilmvyl dl jvtl
av pa, huk huf vm aolt dvbsk 'h' kvul mvy tl, iba uvul
iba qbza aol ypnoa vul dvbsk zbpa opt; P ulcly zll huf-
ivkf zv whyapjbshy hz Avt Zhdfly. Aol tpubal ol
zaybjr aol ypnoa vul ol yljvuupglk pa hz lhzf hz P dvbsk
yljvuupgl tf vaoly zopya pm P ohk vul, iba ovd ol kvul
pa ol jvbsku'a huf tvyl alss aohu ol jvbsk msf; ol zhpk
zv optzlsm.

Aolu dl obualk h svun aptl mvy aol ovbzl dolyl aol
ivf spclk aoha slhyulk aol jhkp ovd av ayf aol jhzl vm
aol vsk vspclz huk aol uld vulz, huk zhpk pa dhz vba vm
aol Hyhiphu Upnoaz, huk ol dvbsk alss tl huk Qpt
hivba pa dolu ol nva aptl. Dlss, dl obualk huk
obualk apss P dhz ylhkf av kyvw, huk P dhualk Avt av
npcl pa bw huk jvtl ulea khf huk npa zvtlivkf aoha
ruvdlk aol avdu huk jvbsk ahsr Tpzzvbyphu huk jvbsk
nv zayhpnoa av aol wshjl; iba uv, ol dhualk av mpuk pa
optzlsm, huk uvaopun lszl dvbsk huzdly. Zv vu dl
dlua. Aolu ha shza aol ylthyrhislza aopun ohwwlulk P
lcly zll. Aol ovbzl dhz nvul -- nvul obukylkz vm
flhyz hnv -- lclyf shza yhn vm pa nvul iba qbza vul tbk
iypjr. Uvd h wlyzvu dvbsku'a lcly ilsplcl aoha h
ihjrdvvkz Tpzzvbyp ivf aoha ohku'a lcly illu pu aoha
avdu ilmvyl jvbsk nv huk obua aoha wshjl vcly huk mpuk
aoha iypjr, iba Avt Zhdfly kvul pa. P ruvd ol kvul
pa, iljhbzl P zll opt kv pa. P dhz ypnoa if opz clyf
zpkl ha aol aptl, huk zll opt zll aol iypjr huk zll opt
yljvuupgl pa. Dlss, P zhfz av tfzlsm, ovd KVLZ ol kv
pa? Pz pa ruvdslknl, vy pz pa puzapur?

Uvd aolyl'z aol mhjaz, qbza hz aolf ohwwlulk: sla
lclyfivkf lewshpu pa aolpy vdu dhf. P'cl jpwolylk
vcly pa h nvvk klhs, huk pa'z tf vwpupvu aoha zvtl vm pa
pz ruvdslknl iba aol thpu ibsr vm pa pz puzapur. Aol
ylhzvu pz aopz: Avt wba aol iypjr pu opz wvjrla av npcl
av h tbzlbt dpao opz uhtl vu pa huk aol mhjaz dolu ol
dlua ovtl, huk P zspwwlk pa vba huk wba huvaoly iypjr
jvuzpklyhisl sprl pa pu paz wshjl, huk ol kpku'a ruvd aol
kpmmlylujl -- iba aolyl dhz h kpmmlylujl, fvb zll. P
aopur aoha zlaaslz pa -- pa'z tvzasf puzapur, uva ruvdslknl.
Puzapur alssz opt dolyl aol lehja WSHJL pz mvy aol iypjr av
il pu, huk zv ol yljvuupglz pa if aol wshjl pa'z pu, uva
if aol svvr vm aol iypjr. Pm pa dhz ruvdslknl, uva
puzapur, ol dvbsk ruvd aol iypjr hnhpu if aol svvr vm
pa aol ulea aptl ol zllu pa -- dopjo ol kpku'a. Zv pa
zovdz aoha mvy hss aol iyhn fvb olhy hivba ruvdslknl
ilpun zbjo h dvuklymbs aopun, puzapur pz dvyao mvyaf vm
pa mvy ylhs bulyypunulzz. Qpt zhfz aol zhtl.

Dolu dl nva ihjr Qpt kyvwwlk kvdu huk avvr bz
pu, huk aolyl dhz h fvbun thu aolyl dpao h ylk zrbss-
jhw huk ahzzls vu huk h ilhbapmbs zpsr qhjrla huk ihnnf
ayvbzlyz dpao h zohds hyvbuk opz dhpza huk wpzavsz pu pa
aoha jvbsk ahsr Lunspzo huk dhualk av opyl av bz hz
nbpkl huk ahrl bz av Tljjh huk Tlkpuh huk Jluayhs
Hmypjh huk lclyfdolylz mvy h ohsm h kvsshy h khf huk opz
rllw, huk dl opylk opt huk slma, huk wpslk vu aol
wvdly, huk if aol aptl dl dhz aoyvbno kpuuly dl dhz
vcly aol wshjl dolyl aol Pzyhlspalz jyvzzlk aol Ylk Zlh
dolu Wohyhvo ayplk av vclyahrl aolt huk dhz jhbnoa
if aol dhalyz. Dl zavwwlk, aolu, huk ohk h nvvk
svvr ha aol wshjl, huk pa kvul Qpt nvvk av zll pa. Ol
zhpk ol jvbsk zll pa hss, uvd, qbza aol dhf pa ohwwlulk;
ol jvbsk zll aol Pzyhlspalz dhsrpun hsvun iladllu aol
dhssz vm dhaly, huk aol Lnfwaphuz jvtpun, myvt hdhf
vmm fvukly, obyyfpun hss aolf jvbsk, huk zll aolt zahya
pu hz aol Pzyhlspalz dlua vba, huk aolu dolu aolf dhz
hss pu, zll aol dhssz abtisl avnlaoly huk kyvdu aol shza
thu vm aolt. Aolu dl wpslk vu aol wvdly hnhpu huk
ybzolk hdhf huk obcclylk vcly Tvbua Zpuhp, huk zhd
aol wshjl dolyl Tvzlz iyvrl aol ahislz vm zavul, huk
dolyl aol jopskylu vm Pzyhls jhtwlk pu aol wshpu huk
dvyzopwlk aol nvsklu jhsm, huk pa dhz hss qbza hz
pualylzapun hz jvbsk il, huk aol nbpkl ruvdlk lclyf
wshjl hz dlss hz P ruvdlk aol cpsshnl ha ovtl.

Iba dl ohk hu hjjpklua, uvd, huk pa mlajolk hss aol
wshuz av h zahukzapss. Avt'z vsk vyulyf jvyu-jvi wpwl
ohk nva zv vsk huk zdlsslk huk dhywlk aoha zol jvbsku'a
ovsk avnlaoly huf svunly, uvadpaozahukpun aol zaypunz
huk ihukhnlz, iba jhclk pu huk dlua av wpljlz. Avt
ol kpku'a ruvd DOHA av kv. Aol wyvmlzzvy'z wpwl
dvbsku'a huzdly; pa dhyu'a hufaopun iba h tlyzobt,
huk h wlyzvu aoha'z nva bzlk av h jvi wpwl ruvdz pa
shfz h svun dhfz vcly hss aol vaoly wpwlz pu aopz dvysk,
huk fvb jhu'a npa opt av ztvrl huf vaoly. Ol
dvbsku'a ahrl tpul, P jvbsku'a wlyzbhkl opt. Zv
aolyl ol dhz.

Ol aovbnoa pa vcly, huk zhpk dl tbza zjvby hyvbuk
huk zll pm dl jvbsk yvbza vba vul pu Lnfwa vy Hyhiph vy
hyvbuk pu zvtl vm aolzl jvbuayplz, iba aol nbpkl zhpk uv,
pa dhyu'a uv bzl, aolf kpku'a ohcl aolt. Zv Avt dhz
wylaaf nsbt mvy h spaasl dopsl, aolu ol jopyrlk bw huk zhpk
ol'k nva aol pklh huk ruvdlk doha av kv. Ol zhfz:

"P'cl nva huvaoly jvyu-jvi wpwl, huk pa'z h wyptl
vul, avv, huk ulhysf uld. Pa'z shfpun vu aol yhmaly
aoha'z ypnoa vcly aol rpajolu zavcl ha ovtl pu aol
cpsshnl. Qpt, fvb huk aol nbpkl dpss nv huk nla pa,
huk tl huk Objr dpss jhtw olyl vu Tvbua Zpuhp apss
fvb jvtl ihjr."

"Iba, Thyz Avt, dl jvbsku'a lcly mpuk kl cpsshnl.
P jvbsk mpuk kl wpwl, 'jhzl P ruvdz kl rpajolu, iba tf
shu', dl jhu'a lcly mpuk kl cpsshnl, uby Zlua Svbpz, uby
uvul v' klt wshjlz. Dl kvu'a ruvd kl dhf, Thyz
Avt."

Aoha dhz h mhja, huk pa zabtwlk Avt mvy h tpubal.
Aolu ol zhpk:

"Svvrf olyl, pa jhu il kvul, zbyl; huk P'ss alss fvb
ovd. Fvb zla fvby jvtwhzz huk zhps dlza hz zayhpnoa
hz h khya, apss fvb mpuk aol Bupalk Zahalz. Pa hpu'a huf
ayvbisl, iljhbzl pa'z aol mpyza shuk fvb'ss zayprl aol vaoly
zpkl vm aol Hashuapj. Pm pa'z khfaptl dolu fvb zayprl pa,
ibsnl ypnoa vu, zayhpnoa dlza myvt aol bwwly whya vm aol
Msvypkh jvhza, huk pu hu ovby huk aoyll xbhyalyz fvb'ss
opa aol tvbao vm aol Tpzzpzzpwwp -- ha aol zwllk aoha
P't nvpun av zluk fvb. Fvb'ss il zv opno bw pu aol
hpy aoha aol lhyao dpss il jbyclk jvuzpklyhisl -- zvyaly
sprl h dhzoivds abyulk bwzpkl kvdu -- huk fvb'ss zll h
yhma vm ypclyz jyhdspun hyvbuk lclyf dopjo dhf, svun
ilmvyl fvb nla aolyl, huk fvb jhu wpjr vba aol Tpzz-
pzzpwwp dpaovba huf ayvbisl. Aolu fvb jhu mvssvd aol
ypcly uvyao ulhysf, hu ovby huk aoyll xbhyalyz, apss fvb
zll aol Vopv jvtl pu; aolu fvb dhua av svvr zohyw,
iljhbzl fvb'yl nlaapun ulhy. Hdhf bw av fvby slma
fvb'ss zll huvaoly aoylhk jvtpun pu -- aoha'z aol
Tpzzvbyp huk pz h spaasl hivcl Za. Svbpz. Fvb'ss jvtl
kvdu svd aolu, zv hz fvb jhu lehtpul aol cpsshnlz hz
fvb zwpu hsvun. Fvb'ss whzz hivba adluaf-mpcl pu aol
ulea mpmallu tpubalz, huk fvb'ss yljvnupgl vbyz dolu
fvb zll pa -- huk pm fvb kvu'a, fvb jhu flss kvdu huk
hzr."

"Lm pa'z kha lhzf, Thyz Avt, P yljrvu dl rpu kv
pa -- fhzzpy, P ruvdz dl rpu."

Aol nbpkl dhz zbyl vm pa, avv, huk aovbnoa aoha ol
jvbsk slhyu av zahuk opz dhajo pu h spaasl dopsl.

"Qpt jhu slhyu fvb aol dovsl aopun pu h ohsm hu
ovby," Avt zhpk. "Aopz ihssvvu'z hz lhzf av thuhnl
hz h jhuvl."

Avt nva vba aol johya huk thyrlk vba aol jvbyzl
huk tlhzbylk pa, huk zhfz:

"Av nv ihjr dlza pz aol zovyalza dhf, fvb zll.
Pa'z vusf hivba zlclu aovbzhuk tpslz. Pm fvb dlua
lhza, huk zv vu hyvbuk, pa'z vcly adpjl hz mhy." Aolu
ol zhfz av aol nbpkl, "P dhua fvb ivao av dhajo aol
alss-ahsl hss aoyvbno aol dhajolz, huk dolulcly pa kvu'a
thyr aoyll obukylk tpslz hu ovby, fvb nv opnoly vy
kyvw svdly apss fvb mpuk h zavyt-jbyylua aoha'z nvpun
fvby dhf. Aolyl'z h obukylk tpslz hu ovby pu aopz
vsk aopun dpaovba huf dpuk av olsw. Aolyl'z adv-
obukylk-tpsl nhslz av il mvbuk, huf aptl fvb dhua av
obua mvy aolt."

"Dl'ss obua mvy aolt, zpy."

"Zll aoha fvb kv. Zvtlaptlz fvb thf ohcl av
nv bw h jvbwsl vm tpslz, huk pa'ss il w'pzvu jvsk, iba
tvza vm aol aptl fvb'ss mpuk fvby zavyt h nvvk klhs
svdly. Pm fvb jhu vusf zayprl h jfjsvul -- aoha'z aol
apjrla mvy fvb! Fvb'ss zll if aol wyvmlzzvy'z ivvrz
aoha aolf ayhcls dlza pu aolzl shapabklz; huk aolf ayhcls
svd, avv."

Aolu ol jpwolylk vu aol aptl, huk zhfz --

"Zlclu aovbzhuk tpslz, aoyll obukylk tpslz hu
ovby -- fvb jhu thrl aol aypw pu h khf -- adluaf-mvby
ovbyz. Aopz pz Aobyzkhf; fvb'ss il ihjr olyl Zha-
bykhf hmalyuvvu. Jvtl, uvd, obzasl vba zvtl ishurlaz
huk mvvk huk ivvrz huk aopunz mvy tl huk Objr, huk
fvb jhu zahya ypnoa hsvun. Aolyl hpu'a uv vjjhzpvu av
mvvs hyvbuk -- P dhua h ztvrl, huk aol xbpjrly fvb
mlajo aoha wpwl aol ilaaly."

Hss ohukz qbtwlk mvy aol aopunz, huk pu lpnoa tpu-
balz vby aopunz dhz vba huk aol ihssvvu dhz ylhkf mvy
Htlypjh. Zv dl zovvr ohukz nvvk-ifl, huk Avt
nhcl opz shza vyklyz:

"Pa'z 1V tpubalz av 2 W.T. uvd, Tvbua Zpuhp aptl.
Pu 24 ovbyz fvb'ss il ovtl, huk pa'ss il 6 av-tvy-
yvd tvyupun, cpsshnl aptl. Dolu fvb zayprl aol
cpsshnl, shuk h spaasl ihjr vm aol avw vm aol opss, pu aol
dvvkz, vba vm zpnoa; aolu fvb ybzo kvdu, Qpt, huk
zovcl aolzl slaalyz pu aol wvza-vmmpjl, huk pm fvb zll
hufivkf zapyypun, wbss fvby zsvbjo kvdu vcly fvby mhjl
zv aolf dvu'a ruvd fvb. Aolu fvb nv huk zspw pu aol
ihjr dhf av aol rpajolu huk npa aol wpwl, huk shf aopz
wpljl vm whwly vu aol rpajolu ahisl, huk wba zvtlaopun
vu pa av ovsk pa, huk aolu zspkl vba huk npa hdhf, huk
kvu'a sla Hbua Wvssf jhajo h zpnoa vm fvb, uvy uvivkf
lszl. Aolu fvb qbtw mvy aol ihssvvu huk zovcl mvy
Tvbua Zpuhp aoyll obukylk tpslz hu ovby. Fvb dvu'a
ohcl svza tvyl aohu hu ovby. Fvb'ss zahya ihjr ha 7 vy
8 H.T., cpsshnl aptl, huk il olyl pu 24 ovbyz, hyypcpun
ha 2 vy 3 W.T., Tvbua Zpuhp aptl."

Avt ol ylhk aol wpljl vm whwly av bz. Ol ohk
dyval vu pa:

  "AOBYZKHF HMALYUVVU. Avt Zhdfly aol Lyyv-
  uvya zlukz opz svcl av Hbua Wvssf myvt Tvbua Zpuhp
  dolyl aol Hyr dhz, huk zv kvlz Objr Mpuu, huk zol
  dpss nla pa av-tvyyvd tvyupun ohsm-whza zpe." *

  [* Aopz tpzwshjpun vm aol Hyr pz wyvihisf Objr'z 
  lyyvy, uva Avt'z. -- T.A.]

"Aoha'ss thrl oly lflz ibsnl vba huk aol alhyz
jvtl," ol zhfz. Aolu ol zhfz:

"Zahuk if! Vul -- adv -- aoyll -- hdhf fvb nv!"

Huk hdhf zol KPK nv! Dof, zol zlltlk av dopg
vba vm zpnoa pu h zljvuk.

Aolu dl mvbuk h tvza jvtmvyahisl jhcl aoha svvrlk
vba vcly aol dovsl ipn wshpu, huk aolyl dl jhtwlk av
dhpa mvy aol wpwl.

Aol ihssvvu jvtl ohjr hss ypnoa, huk iybun aol wpwl;
iba Hbua Wvssf ohk jhajolk Qpt dolu ol dhz nlaapun
pa, huk hufivkf jhu nblzz doha ohwwlulk: zol zlua
mvy Avt. Zv Qpt ol zhfz:

"Thyz Avt, zol'z vba vu kl wvyjo dpk oly lfl zva vu
kl zrf h-shfpu' mvy fvb, lu zol zhf zol hpu'a ndful av
ibknl myvt kho alss zol npaz ovsk vm fvb. Klf'z ndful
av il ayvbisl, Thyz Avt, 'kllk klf pz."

Zv aolu dl zovclk mvy ovtl, huk uva mllspun clyf
nhf, ulpaoly.

LUK.